I don't know what Dr. Goldberg was like before  moving to Arizona, but let me tell you, STAY AWAY from this doctor and this office. I was going to Dr. Johnson before he left and Goldberg took over when Johnson left. He is not a caring doctor. He is only interested in the co-pay and having you come in for medication refills every month. He will not give refills and could less about patients's financial situations. Trying to get your 90 days mail away pharmacy prescriptions through this guy is a joke. And to make matters even worse, his office staff is incompetent. 90% of the time when you call the office, they'll put you through to a voice mail, that NO ONE ever answers or returns your call. Both my adult children and husband have decided to leave this practice after experiencing such frustration. The entire office has an attitude like they are doing you a favor. Give me a break! Stay away from this doc and the practice. You deserve better and they will not be there when you really need them. I have never felt compelled to write a bad review about anyone until I met this pathetic excuse for a doctor who is all about the money.
I'm writing this review to give you a heads up before you see this Doctor. The office staff and administration are very unprofessional. I left a message with multiple people regarding my bill, and no one ever called me back. I had to hound them to get an answer about my bill. \n\nSecond, and most important, make sure your insurance is going to cover Dr. Goldberg's visits and blood work. He recommended to me that I get a physical, and he knew I was a student because I told him. I got the physical done. Later, I found out my health insurance doesn't pay for preventative visits. I received an $800.00 bill for the blood work. I can't pay for my bill because I'm a student and don't have any cash flow at this current time. I can't believe the Doctor wouldn't give me a heads up to make sure my insurance would cover work that wasn't necessary and was strictly preventative. The office can't do anything to help me cover the bill. In addition, the office staff said the onus is on me to make sure my insurance covers visits. Frustrating situation!
Owning a driving range inside the city limits is like a license to print money.  I don't think I ask much out of a driving range.  Decent mats, clean balls and accessible hours.  Hell you need even less people now with the advent of the machine that doles out the balls.  This place has none of them.  It is april and there are no grass tees yet.  BTW they opened for the season this week although it has been golfing weather for a month.  The mats look like the carpet at my 107 year old aunt Irene's house.  Worn and thread bare.  Let's talk about the hours.  This place is equipped with lights yet they only sell buckets of balls until 730.  It is still light out.  Finally lets you have the pit to hit into.  When I arrived I wasn't sure if this was a driving range or an excavation site for a mastodon or a strip mining operation.  There is no grass on the range. Just mud.  Makes it a good tool to figure out how far you actually are hitting the ball.  Oh, they are cash only also.\n\nBottom line, this place sucks.  The best hope is that the owner sells it to someone that actually wants to make money and service golfers in Pittsburgh.
This place is absolute garbage...  Half of the tees are not available, including all the grass tees.  It is cash only, and they sell the last bucket at 8, despite having lights.  And if you finish even a minute after 8, don't plan on getting a drink.  The vending machines are sold out (of course) and they sell drinks inside, but close the drawers at 8 on the dot.  There are weeds grown all over the place.  I noticed some sort of batting cage, but it looks like those are out of order as well.  Someone should buy this place and turn it into what it should be.
Used to go there for tires, brakes, etc.  Their prices have gone way up-$400 for 4 mid-level tires for a Toyota.  Plus, 1 of the new tires went flat within 3 weeks.  Since they don\"t make appointments,  the wait to get the tire looked at was ~2 hours.  Sorry--can't wait that long to get a warranted repair,  They lost my business for good.
Terrible. Preordered my tires and when I arrived they couldn't find the order anywhere. Once we got through that process I waited over 2 hours for them to be put on... I was originally told it would take 30 mins. Slow, over priced, I'll go elsewhere next time.
Last summer I had an appointment to get new tires and had to wait a super long time. I also went in this week for them to fix a minor problem with a tire they put on. They \"fixed\" it for free, and the very next morning I had the same issue. I called to complain, and the \"manager\" didn't even apologize!!! So frustrated. Never going back.  They seem overpriced, too.
If I could give this place less than one star, I would. I have no idea who gave this place high reviews but they must either own the place or be time travelers from back in the day when this place might not have sucked. The decor is tired and grimy, the place reeked of smoke, and the bartender/server was surly, to put it mildly. We went there on a Saturday night with a mind to try the Irish food. Apparently, we were out of luck. I've always thought that the secrets of restaurant success is to actually stock food for people to eat. He told us before we ordered that they had no \"pies\". No chicken pot pie, no shepherds pie, etc. So, we gamely tried to order other things. We placed our order. My wife, for example, ordered the Irish stew and he came back 5 min later telling us they were out of that and even more things for several people in our party. At that point my wife picked out a third option, ham and cabbage, only to be told again that \"they were out\". At that point, realizing that the only food to be had in the place was what was crusted on the menus, we asked to pay for our drinks and left. They actually then gave us flack for not having enough to put it on a debit card. In short, unless you like your dinner with a side of disappointment and depression, I'd probably avoid this place like the plague. Speaking of the plague, I suppose we should thank Mr. Surly for inspiring us to walk out. I only have two bathrooms at my house and would've been hard pressed to accommodate several violently ill people at once.
The delivery driver mistakenly rang my doorbell, having confused 133 and 113.\n\nRather than taking a step back and analyzing the situation, he begins to accuse my wife and I of ordering and refusing to pay for this pizza.\n\nThe driver then gets on his cell phone and rather than calling the number than was given when the order was placed, begins to call his bosses and starts threatening me with felony charges. \n\nSo I take the initiative and ask the fine upstanding gentleman what the phone number of the order-er was, phone my neighbor and discover the mistake. Rather than a thank you or a sorry, he just speeds off (breaking the speed limit on our block) to reach his destination 50 feet away.\n\nI would call to complain, but based on the other reviews, its clear the owners do not care about Carnegie or it's residents, and its pretty well known around town just how awful their food is, so it would be pointless to boycott a place I'd never order from again anyway.\n\nDo yourself a favor and order from ANY other establishment in town.
Some of the worst pizza I've ever had.  We used a coupon from the paper for a 2 topping 8 cut Sicilian. First of all the pizza wasn't even cut through, and the sad attempt at cutting was so uneven that 4 of the slices were about an inch wide, while the others were about 4\" each. The toppings were scarce, they used mini pepperoni and put maybe 8 on the whole pizza. The onions were huge chunks and the mushrooms were straight from a can. The worst part though was the thick doughy crust that tasted more like a fishy sourdough roll. I'm serious... It was so noticeable that it made me wonder if the dough was bad or if they for some weird reason put fish sauce in it. It was gross. \n\nWe also ordered steak and Italian hoagies. The veggies were old and wilted, and there was no dressing on either. The Italian had deli meat that was clearly bottom of the line and not very generous. The \"steak\" (if you an call it that) was greyish instead of brown and looked like it was a processed meat chopped into pieces. No flavor or seasoning and the texture was reminiscent of spam. It was so bad that I only ate 1/4 of it and tossed the rest. \n\nI have ordered from here in the past and always been disappointed. I thought I would give them another try since I'd never ordered a Sicilian pizza from there. What a mistake. I will never order from them again!
By far the worst most unprofessional dentist I have ever experienced her staff is too busy watching soap operas on all the TVs in each room instead of cleaning and she gave me a filling which was too deep which could have been understandable as her son had his pictures delivered from Hawaii and she had to stop 3 times to pay for them and show her whole staff all of them must be nice to have a 14 year old go to Hawaii on her moms dime and have her patience wait to see all of this happen I had to have oral surgery and have the tooth removed because she put the filling in too deep an abscessed tooth was the result I wouldn't recommend her to an ex girlfriend or someone I hate because of the three months of extreme tooth pain I had to deal with because of her lack of care and follow through even after I called and asked them for advice and follow up they simply could care less and did not even offer to reschedule an appointment other than prescribing me vicodin and antibiotics do not recommend and do not go to her license should be pulled!!
In all fairness - I did not see this dentist but did schedule an appointment and waited 15 minutes for them to open.\n\nWhen I look at Yelp reviews, I usually weed out the outliers (the best and the worst).   Unfortunately, there are only two reviews.\n\nIt was my first time at the office.   The office admin (very nice) asked for me to come early (before 9am) to complete paperwork.   I arrived at 8:50.    I waited.   I watched 2 employees walk by me (unlocked the door and re-locked it).    They did not acknowledge me.\n\nThe door I was at had signage (open hours).    I decided to leave because of a review where the staff seemed distracted or disinterested in my presence.\n\nThe office admin (very nice) called me to inform I am missing my appointment.   I explained to her that there were too many indications where this was not going to be a good fit and wished her the best of luck.\n\nI recommend if you see this dentist you go to the front door (furthest away from the parking lot) for the entrance.\n\nPoor recommendation because the staff who walked by me seemed to be distracted which was pointed out in a previous review.
I've been to this office a good amount of times.  Each time the receptionists give of a vibe of entitlement and it is very uncomfortable.  Dr. Weinberg herself is very nice, but I doubt her ability. Every procedure she has done to my teeth has backfired. The third and last issue I have is that i always paid cash at the end of my visits and somehow I have received an invoice for $55. I called and of course the receptionist was sassy and rude so I gave up. Will never go back or refer anyone else
Take it from me; avoid this place at all cost.  The only time I go is when I am starved and don't have the energy to cook or get edible food.  And then after I have been kicking myself.
We went on a weeknight.  Place was not busy waited over 20 minutes for drinks and to have our order taken.  We ordered an app and it came out with the meals and that was another 20 minutes or so.  Food was luke warm at best.  I would not go back.
If you like being greeted in the morning by a gym worker slopping down eggs from a frying pany instead of working....this is your gym....complain to the manager and she gets nasty....try getting in touch with the owner....impossible!  Most unprofessional gym ever!!!!
Terrible service.  Food unremarkable.  Waiter disappeared for 45 minutes to serve larger group due to staffing mismanagement.  Saved his tip by discounting meal after I complained.  All and all, a very crude and unpleasant dining experience for me and my guests.  Not to be repeated, never again!
Terrible service...terrible food...this place smells like rotten wet wood
Absolutely Awful Service.  Went to Papa J's awhile ago and the service was bad - the waiter was surly, rude and unhelpful..  Decided to try it again since it is close to Stage 62.  Big mistake.  Greeted by a dour manager that seemed mad that we had a reservation. 30 minutes to get a glass of wine.  At one hour and 45 minutes complained to the manager that we still had not received out entrees.  He said 'What do you want me to do about it?\" and said they had a busy night.  This is when tables around us sat empty. I then had to go back to the manager to give us our bill so we could get away from this ruined evening.  The bill was prepared incorrectly. If you want average food and terrible service, this is your place.  We will never go back.
We stopped at Papa J's last Friday night (8/1) for a round of drinks. There were 7 of us altogether and we had eaten at another restaurant earlier in the evening.  One member of our party walked up to the bar to let them know we were sitting on the couches along the wall, as it was fairly busy that night. In the short time that he was there, a man who was behind the bar looked at him and then turn away without saying a word or notifying anyone else. He then turned to a waitress who had approached the service area of the bar and asked her if  we could have a server take our drink order. She said \"yep\" and then abruptly turned and walked away. At that point, he asked to see the manager  who came a few minutes later. When my friend told him of what had occurred, the manager said \"What do you want me to do\"?\n\nMy friend said \"An apology would be a good start\" whereupon the manager looked back at him and said \"Get out and don't come back\" ???????? Are you kidding????\n\nMy friend is well traveled and frequently stays at higher end hotels and dines at quality restaurants. He was not screaming or belligerent in any way, shape, or form; simply informing the manager of what had occurred. \n\nThat being said, we left and went back to 131 East, where we had previously eaten. The service there was fabulous, as was the meal and the drinks creative and exquisite.\n\nThere are new restaurants that have opened in Carnegie as of late. Papa J's is no longer the only game in town.  Obviously this is the way a simple complaint is handled by management. Appalling!!  Do yourself a favor and frequent any of the other restaurants that are within walking distance of Papa J's. They understand the concept of  customer service.
I've decided where I stand with Emmert Dental. They are unprofessional, rude and have no clue what they're doing (behind the desk). I will not be going back nor will I have nice things to say about them.
THE WORST DENTAL EXPERIENCE OF MY LIFE.  THEY ARE BUTCHERS!  My husband and I went to Emmert Dental in Bethel Park for a routine cleaning and check up.  I had one tooth that I had a recent root canal on and a few small cavities that needed filled.  After the so called dentist - Dr Carnavali - did my exam, I needed 3 additional root canals and an extraction! An extraction on the tooth that just had a root canal. I was told that part of the tooth had broken off and that a crown was no longer possible.  I didn't know any better, so I agreed to schedule the extraction for a few weeks later. The \"dentist\" wanted to extract it that day, but I had plans for the weekend and was not about to be in pain. So, 2 weeks later, I went in for the extraction.  After they gave me novocaine they get me with \"you need a bone graft also in that area since we are extracting that tooth\". I have never had any issues with bone loss with previous extractions so I didn't feel it was necessary. I had 3 employees surrounding me, pressuring me for this bone graft. So, I reluctantly agreed. I had to pay $259.00 for this \"bone graft\". So, I signed everything. I wasn't even given enough time to read the document, so I should have known and got up and left right then and there. The \"dentist\" started the extraction. I have never been so uncomfortable in my life. He pulled on my tooth, used a metal instrument to pound on my tooth and was pulling so hard that my head was coming up and slamming back down against the head rest.  Finally, after a good 15 minutes of this torture, he ripped the tooth out of the side of my jaw. I was literally ganging from all the blood running down the back of my throat. He then stuck some pink powder up in the extraction area. I'm assuming this was the bone graft.  I ended up with many stitches. I was given an antibiotic and instructed to schedule an appointment for the following Saturday so they could start the bridge. Then I was hit with a bill of $569.00! My insurance covers 100% of extractions.  I was in so much pain for 2 weeks following the extraction. Pain severe enough that I had to call off work and I couldn't sleep at night.  I refused to go back to Emmert Dental.  And after a visit to a very reputable dentist, an endodontist and an oral surgeon, I have to have oral surgery to try and repair the damage Emmert Dental has done to my mouth.  They caused a very large deformity in my jaw and I am at risk to lose additional teeth.  Save yourself a lot of time, money and pain.  Emmert dental only cares about the money, will over charge you and leave you less than happy with the dental work.  They are butchers and should not even call themselves dentist. And if you have an issue with their billing practices, don't expect to that resolved easily.  I have called numerous times and I am always told that the manager and or billing department is not in.  I have contacted the BBB and a lawyer.  I expect and want a full refund.  No one should have to go thru what I am currently going thru.  They do unnecessary extractions so they can do a more expensive procedure such as a bridge or an implant.  Now I have to go thru oral surgery, more pain and suffering and more time missed from work because of Emmert Dental.  And the root canals they said I needed, my current dentist and my endodontist both agreed that I do not need tooth canals.  In fact, the teeth are perfectly healthy.  They are crooks and butchers.
The worst dental office I ever been. No one can beat it!!! You should avoid it at any time.
Eat at your own risk. The service is terrible, the staff seem to be generally clueless, the management is inclined to blame the staff for their own mistakes, and there's no sense of FAST in their fast food. When we came, half of the menu board was still on breakfast, and it was 4:30p. The only thing they have going for them is that the food is hot and tastes just like McDonald's should. \n\nThen again, the franchise is owned by Rice, and I've come to take terrible service is their MO.
My expectations for McDonalds are t rarely high. But for one to still fail so spectacularly...that takes something special!\nThe cashier took my friends's order, then promptly ignored me. I had to force myself in front of a cashier who opened his register to wait on the person BEHIND me. I waited over five minutes for a gigantic order that included precisely one kid's meal. After watching two people who ordered after me be handed their food, I asked where mine was. The manager started yelling at the cashiers for \"serving off their orders\" when they didn't have their food. But neither cashier was anywhere near those controls, and the manager was the one serving food to customers and clearing the boards.\nThe manager was rude when giving me my order. She didn't make sure that I had everything ON MY RECEIPT, and never even had the decency to apologize that I felt I was getting poor service.\nI've eaten at various McDonalds restaurants for over 30 years. I've worked at more than one location. I expect bad days, bad moods, and the occasional mistake. But I have yet to have a decent experience at this store. It will remain a place I avoid unless someone in my party needs to avoid illness from low blood sugar. Perhaps I should go back to the racially biased service of Steak n Shake instead!
I've tried to give this McDonalds a chance but my patience has run out. The only reason why I came here as much as I did is because I like the $1 iced coffees. But it's not even worth it. This McDonalds is poo and so is most of the staff. \n\nWhenever I want to go through the drive-thru I can't because there is a line of cars wrapped half away around the building. And even when the line is shorter there's always a hold up of some sort. So most of the time I just park and go inside the restaurant. \n\nToday was a horrible day. I ordered an iced coffee (no cream or sugar) and a chocolate chip cookie. It only takes 30 seconds to fill a cup with coffee and 30 seconds to take a cookie out of the case. I waited 10 minutes!! Sorry but that's too long just to get a coffee and a cookie! It's not like I ordered a meal! During that time I saw people come in after me and get their milkshakes and iced coffees within two minutes! WTH?! I told the petite sleepy eyed cashier I wanted my money back! Her eyes opened wide in surprise, like I really woke her up or something. She said,\"Youre the one who ordered the iced coffee? I can get it for you!\" For real? She was the one who took my order! I told her I waited too long and I just want my money back. The manager offered to make my iced coffee, but  I refused because I had just had enough.\n\nThere are *few* employees there who work hard but everyone else is dragging their feet. There is no organization or teamwork, everyone is scrabbling. It looks like none of them want to be there. I used to work in fast food and I know it sucks, but come on!\n\nI'm sorry but I can't recommend this Mcdonalds. It's poo. I'm not coming back here anymore. Guess I'll be going to Starbucks- and their iced coffees taste better anyway!
This McDonald's is so bad it's amazing.  \n\nOrder:  Big mac, large fries, diet coke.\n\nThe soda machine was broken.   No sodas.\n\nThen I got to the window.  \"We rang you up for medium fries.\"   (Not what I asked for)  \"Well, if you want a large, you're gonna have to wait 4 minutes.  We just started a new batch.\"\n\nLeft with:  Big mac, medium fries, no coke.\n\nActually, now that I think about it, this was one of my better experiences there...
We had the worst possible experience at the Eat N Park at Waterfront on 2/12/10 at around 10pm. Our waitress (Annemarie) was inattentive and got us the wrong order. We ended up with a dish we had not even ordered and still got charged for it on the check. \n\nOne of my friends ordered a Buffalo Chicken Sandwich, which according to the menu description, should've had lettuce and tomato in it. But the sandwich that arrived on our table had none of those ingredients. When pointed out to the waitress, she just brought some lettuce and tomatoes in a plate! How crude! \n\nSpoke to the manager after paying the full check and first of all, she did not even offer to re-imburse for the item we did not even order, and that had been forcibly thrust upon us. \n\nWhen I asked the manager about the Buffalo Chicken sandwich not having any lettuce and tomato, she said they just got new menus and that description is not correct and that Buffalo Chicken Sandwich is supposed to be without lettuce and tomato! What a lame excuse! Even your online menu says under the description for a Buffalo Chicken sandwich that its supposed to have both those ingredients - \"Served with lettuce and tomato on a fresh-baked Kaiser roll.\" - That's what the last line in the description of Buffalo Chicken Sandwich says. Shame on you Manager for lying! Instead of admitting her fault, she was blaming it to a new menu!\n\nNot only did we have to pay for something that we didn't order or eat, but we got sub-standard food that was different from what was described in the menu, and had to deal with a really bad waitress and insensitive and deceitful manager to top off the whole experience. \n\nI am never going to come back to any Eat N Park location ever again, and will never recommend one to any of my friends either. What a waste of time and money! Plus dealing with callous and lying people - my goodness, I surely had my patience tested this evening!
This is the absolute WORST Steak N Shake I've ever been to. \n\nThe bf and I got lost around Pittsburgh for 40 min. trying to find this location and on top of the unnecessary 1 hour wait for our food, the food itself was just so crappily made. It was so bad and we had waited a ridiculous amount of time (c'mon, Steak N Shake is basically a glorified McD's), our waiter comped our WHOLE MEAL.\n\nIf not for the compensation, I would have been pissed that we had to pay for such a crappy meal. The bf, on the other hand, was more upset about the principle of the matter... we had trekked all that way just to get our Steak N Shake fix (since both of us haven't had it since our undergraduate days) and it was a major fail.\n\nI think I'm good with my Steak N Shake craving for a long time now...\n\n\n\nPS. The whole joint smells like major B.O.
I went here at 3 PM between the lunch rush and the dinner rush, and the restaurant was maybe 20% full. I ordered the Chili Mac Supreme to go. I thought I would be in and out within 5-10 minutes. Keep in mind that this restaurant even has a drive-thru; the expectation is quick service.\n\nLong story short, my food never came... the waitress told me (after I had been sitting there waiting for thirty minutes) that the kitchen hadn't even started on my order yet, so I told her to cancel it and walked out. Now I see that others on Yelp have warned about the slow service at this location. Wish I had looked it up earlier.
The only thing worse than the food is the service.
Terrible wait staff  couldn't even seat us. Before we, and another party walked out without even being greeted properly, I observed several employees traipse out the front door, several tables who were waiting for their food for a long time,  several employees just standing around out of direct view of the tables, a morbidly obese hostess that could barely physically walk from one end of the store to the other. I think one server was high. \n  \n  Going there was a  special request by a 7 year old getting over a long-ish illness, so that makes the shabby treatment more enraging.
Food is good, what you'd expect from Steak n Shake. THE SERVICE IS AWFUL. so incredibly awful. expect to take at least an hour for your meal, even when it's slow. I've been going here for years when I want a cheap meal, but the service is so so so awful. Go to McDonalds.
The service was fast but the food was terrible and so was the service. I had a bus to catch so I couldn't wait around waiting for the check so I went to the counter to pay. She never brought my check, never checked to see if my drink needed refilled, she just mopped the floors. \n\nThe burger was really greasy, the fries were Luke warm and the cheese on them wasn't as flavorful as it should be. As a new Pittsburgher I'm not impressed.
I should have known better than to stop here, but I was nursing a hangover and just wanted something quick and simple.  I should kick myself for thinking of this place.\n\nGranted I decided to go to the drive thru and knew there would be a wait.  The sign actually says that the food is prepared when you order it.  I sat for almost ten minutes at the window while my food was prepared.  During that time I wished I could have taken back my order and also wished that I hadn't paid already.  \n\nWhile sitting at the window I decided to just stare inside and watch some of the employees doing their job.  What disturbed me the most was watching the employee making the milkshakes.  Making a milkshake isn't that hard or glamorous of a thing to watch.  What disgusted me was that the guy actually lifted several of the containers for the milkshakes and smelt them.  I mean smelt them to see if they were clean, instead of actually taking the extra minute or two to clean the container.  After witnessing this my food was finally ready and I drove away.\n\nWhen I finally got to eating my food I was underwhelmed.  The fries had no flavor and with the size of the cut it appears you get more than what you ordered.  The \"steakburger\" really, they should just call it a burger, was overpowered by the BBQ sauce on it.  It was all I could taste.\n\nAll this has cemented me in not wanting to ever step foot in one of these establishments ever again.
You know what you're getting with a Steak N Shake: it's about one rung up from a McD's in quality, and about two rungs down in quickness. At least, you think you know. \n\nI used to have a small place in my heart (though the salt and fat weren't very kind to said organ) for Steak N Shake, because hey, who can argue with beef and drinkable ice cream? But after my last trip, I can think of nothing more disgusting than having to eat here, this location in particular. I haven't been back in over year, and I will never step foot into a Steak N Shake as long as I have an immune system that I care about. \n\nAfter having eaten here, I hit the restroom on my way out (along with my two friends....hey, we're girls, it's acceptable!). One stall was already taken, so two of us are stuck waiting while this occupant does her....shall we say, business? After a few seconds, we realize that she's not only there to relieve herself, but to also take drive-through orders. Yes, that's right....\"You want fries with that? *flush* Okay, that will be $5.50\". I have never, ever witnessed anything so insane as a drive-through restroom. To top it off, after finishing her \"bathroom break\", she walks straight out of the stall and into the restaurant. I guess she was in too much of a rush to complete the order she had just taken that she didn't have time to wash her hands. And I was in too much of a rush to choke back up what I had just eaten before it wreaked mayhem on my stomach.
I love Steak N Shake. This one, however, leaves a lot to be desired. The food often comes out cold and the servers are apathetic at best. Most of the time, they're downright rude. I highly recommend avoiding this location if possible. There's one on Route 51 that's worth the 15 minutes it'll take you to get there.
Every time we come here the service is laughably bad. On this visit a tabe which was sat after us had their food before our server graced us with her surly presence. Good restaurant elsewhere, just avoid this location if you want to get your food inside an hour.
Wow. Dirty and slow.  The floors felt like they had the days burger grease spilled all over, and it took 30 m8n to get our take out order.
This location is terrible. The drive-thru workers are rude and they give you crap food. I waited 5 minutes before being able to order, even when there was only 1 car ahead of me. Then the lady proceeded to ask me if I would like anything on my burger, and (thinking the pictures on the menu are what they're supposed to look like and they would never false advertise) I asked \"doesn't it come with the fixings like in the picture?\" she then told me it only comes with cheese. So I then went on to tell her what I wanted on my burger. Pulled around and got my order pretty quick, but later when I open my burger its just meat and cheese. The meat is badly burned and cold. It was clear to me this burger was not fresh. I didn't even attempt to eat it, what a waste of a place. They definitely need better workers.
He was incredibly sexist/homophobic. He could barely play the piano and when we finally recognized a song we could actually dance to he literally asked me to get off stage because he didn't like another on stage who could actually dance with the girls.
When making a Customer's paymento atLowe's, we have our checklist:\n\n1. Do the phone numbers match?  Nope, but that's fine since people are always changing their phone numbers anyways.\n2. Does the name on account match name on check?  Nope, but mistakes happen at those pesky check companies.\n3. Does the account number on the check match the account number on the screen?  Why should it, those computers are always making mistakes.\n\nNow that we have verified that all the information is correct, we can process the payment.  The customer will be so happy that we didn't have to bother them with any silly questions.\n\n******\nI am sad to say that this is an actual occurrence.  What was originally an average Lowe's has turned into Lowe's Hell.  If the associates do not have basic logic comprehension, how do they survive?
Would like to give NO STARS.  bought all new kitchen appliances there.  Refrigerator is defective.  They\nsend an outside company to repair.  Man arrives with NO TOOLS and wrong size seal for freezer.  not once, twice.  The first time, he tries to use my spoon from counter to install it!  I complain, too bad...they have to comeTHREE times before replacing it!  NEVER AGAIN.
Before today I probably would have given this place three stars based mostly on their beer selection; however, today the service was terrible. We waited two hours for a pizza sub, French onion soup, fries, and buffalo chicken tenders. About an hour and a half in we finally got the small pizza sub and the wrongly made buffalo chicken tenders (ie, no hot sauce). We were told by the waitress that she realized it was wrong, but decided to still bring it out to see if my gf would eat it. She sent it back. By a half hour later, we still had not received the buffalo chicken tenders, nor the French onion soup (which should have been mostly made already), and no fries.  We were told the chef was new, but no effort was made really to make the situation better. No quick and easy app or beers on the house. To boot, the beer was pretty expensive. I will probably give the place another chance based on their beer selection, but it won't be for a while. The food has always been average at best, and the pizza sub was no different. We ended up leaving after two hours without receiving 75% of our order.
The food was absolutely gross! I ordered a turkey club which comes on a wheat bun with avocado, bacon, and turkey breast. What I got was TOTALLY different from the picture! First of all the sandwich was on sliced bread (lame)! There was no avocado, 1 slice of bacon, no lettuce, and to TOP it off instead of turkey breast they used freaking LUNCH MEAT! lol No, not the kind that you get from the deli, the other sweaty nasty looking stuff! Gross! \n\nOur waitress was awful but they were extremely understaffed so I would have a bit of an attitude if I had to wait 10 tables without assistance too.   \n\nThe manager was really nice... Of course that disgusting sandwich that I didn't eat was free.
Mediocre service. COLD food! Our food waited so long the lettuce & pickles wilted. Bland food. Crazy overpriced. Long waits in the arcade. 1 beer per hour maximum.  Avoid at all costs. Fair manager.
This place just plain sucks\nBad management lost them biz\nDumb arcade drama*\n\n* they have recently changed their under 21 policy so no one underage can even be in the arcade or restaurant after 10pm despite having a guardian over 30 years old
Visited the Dave and Busters in Homestead, PA last night. Waitress mixed up our credit cards and gave my brothers credit card to someone else and he theirs. Charged them already too - both incorrectly My brother had to walk around and find out who it was. Waitress never apologized. GM was extremely rude and refused to give my brother his original receipt back saying they had thrown it out. DID NOTHING TO REMEDY the situation and ignored us the rest of our visit - not even a refill. After spending over $300 plus games, we will never go back. Whatever happened to the customer is always right? HORRIBLE service
Most of the games were out of order and I had to find one of those referee looking people to fix 2 of them that took some of our credits.  Apathetic service staff all around, the Peanut and I were really disappointed.  Won't be back.
I was here on 10/3 and I have to say this was a horrible experience.  Me and a friend went here to eat and play a couple games afterwards.  It took the waitress at least 10-15 minutes to greet us and by that time we knew we should just order then because we might not see her again.  We ordered and got our drinks and well let's just say we didn't see the waitress again until she was giving us our check (some manager delivered the food to the table).  No refill on my beverage, no how is your food, no ketchup for my burger or fries was offered.  Lots of people running around like crazy and if your understaffed hire more people!  I will not be back again to eat.
Horrible beer, horrible service, horrible menu
My friends got everyhing from steak(they didn't even get a well done steak right) to mahi tacos and the only great menu item was the seasoned vegetables- give it a miss. Sing sing next door is awesome but get dinner somewere else. After we were done the waiter asked if we were ready for the checks and I had ordered meal that came with a desert! Really dissapointing all around.
For a brewery who is attempting to take advantage of Oktoberfest you wonder how at 7 pm they could be out of mashed potatoes & sauerkraut then a sausage platter with sweet mustard guess they have not been to Germany. Not worth $5.95 unfortunately the sausage platter was $15.95.
Came with my BF we started with the crab artichoke dip. It was very greasy and had virtually no crab. The wedge salad was good and crisp. I had the hazelnut crusted chicken. This has to be one of the worst dishes I've ever had it was like pancake syrup over breaded chicken. To finish the meal we had the homemade chocolate chip cookies served with hot fudge. Well there was no hot fudge it was chocolate syrup the ice cream was so crystallized from melting and re-freezing all around disappointing.
Poor service and food. I waited 20 minutes at the bar for someone to just acknowledge my presence. They finally brought my food out and left it without asking for me to pay.... So I had to wait an additional 15 minutes to find someone to pay. Yes, I had to TRY and give them money.\n\nOn to the important part... Food was terrible. I had a burger and it was pathetic.
Be careful. The servers can't pay attention to save their lives, and the management cares even less. I want to make sure people know how careless the management is, particularly Mark who seems to let his staff run around.
My friends & I all purchased Groupons  for the Pittsburgh Improv on or around March 22nd, 2012. At that time, only a few big name comedians were listed on the Improv's website as Special Events. You can use the Groupon on anything that isn't a Special Event. That seemd reasonable. The day the Groupons were purchased, my friend Katrina called & reserved two tickets to Jim Jeffries for 3/30 at 10pm. They allowed her to use her Groupon & gave her a confirmation code & everything! Shortly after, they changed many of the comedians on their website, including Jim Jeffries, to Special Events. When I called I was told I could not use my Groupon. The same thing happened to many of my friends. It's a classic bait & switch. These comedians were NOT Special Events until after the Groupon came out. In addition, other restrictions, such not being able to use the Groupons on Saturdays & having to use the additional four vouchers for one show, were NOT listed under the restrictions when the Groupon was for sale. \n\nSo tonight, my friends & I had pretty much resolved ourselves to the fact that we were not going to the Improv because they wouldn't allow us to use our Groupons. But I walked over to the Will Call window with my friend Katrina so she could at least get her tickets. Big surprise - she was told they didn't have her reservation or her name in their computers! They wouldn't give her the tickets. It's an absolute joke of a deal. How is everyone going to use their Groupons by Sept. if all of the shows are Special Events now? \n\nIn addition, no one at the Improv answers the phones or responds to emails. \n\nMy friends & I (about 10 of us total) are all getting refunds through Groupon and/or our credit card companies & we are all reporting the Improv to the Better Business Bureau, etc. \n\nThe Pittsburgh Improv is extremely shady & does not care about their customers.
This review is specifically for the DFS cleaners at this Giant Eagle location.  I dropped clothing off for the sake of convenience once (I really should have known better).  Never again.  My items came back completely covered in lint.  I could let this slide, however my pencil skirt was safety pinned to the hanger.  The weight of the skirt caused even larger holes than what were placed there by the pins.  Being that it's a pencil skirt designed to have a blouse tucked in, there's no way that I can wear it again.  This was an expensive skirt, completely ruined.  Very disappointed.  Again, this review is just for the dry cleaners.  The rest of the store is actually better than a lot of other GE's I've been to in Pittsburgh.  Just don't take your dry cleaning here.
We were going to see a movie that started at 9:40pm. The 2 of us got to Bar Louie at 8:30.  We sat outside, and it was nearly 30 minutes before the waiter even stopped to get our order.  I tried stopping a waitress but was told 'this isn't my table'.  Finally the waiter took our order.  1 Sam Adams light bottle, and one Pineapple Juice+Vodka.  After about 15minutes another waiter (maybe the manager I don't know) asked if we had been waited on. We said yes, and told him we had been waiting.  He left, and another (different) waitress came to bring us our drinks.. they were wrong.. My date was given vodka on the rocks. and I was given a Sam Adams.. \nThey took these back, and another 10 minutes before the correct order was served.. We told them to bring another round and the check.  It was 20 minutes before they returned.. and they forgot the check.\n\nBy this time we had to go to be on time for the movie.. my date asked for the check again so we could leave.. finally they brought it and I gave him my card, when he came back we signed it and left in a hurry to catch the movie.\n\nfor 2 bottle beers, and 2 pineapple juice + vodka I was charged $31.03. I didn't have time to complain or ask. I won't be going back.
When the ratio to wait staff to diners is 3:1 you'd think you could get service!!!\n\nNothing erks me more then seeing idol wait staff and hungry patrons. I very rarely walk out of a restaurant with out having eaten first. I came here on Saturday ay 6pm. Almost none of the diners had food on their table and many of them didn't have drinks in the 15 minutes I was there I counted 9 waitress again I counted 9 waitresses and not a one of them came over to our table to get even a drink order. Just from the looks of it I could tell staying any longer would be a total train wreck. So after 15 minutes of waitress counting we left with empty bellies.
I came here last night to get a few appetizers before a movie, and was hoping to be able to write a review on the food. Unfortunately, I cannot because the service was so bad that I left before I had the chance to order. We found seats at the bar behind the taps. After sitting there for 5 minutes and not being acknowledged, we thought that they might not be able to see us, and so we moved to a different pair of seats in the middle of the bar, grabbing a few menus on the way so we would be ready to order. It was fairly busy, but it is not like there were people standing at the bar trying to get drinks - everyone was seated and I'm sure they face much busier times. We sat in our new seats for almost 15 minutes (I timed it - I am not exaggerating), and were not even acknowledged. You would at least think the bartender would acknowledge us and tell us he would be with us when he could, but despite staring him down almost the whole time, we could not even make eye contact. I hope this is a fluke but will probably not be back to find out.
The absolute worst service I have ever had at any bar or restaraunt.  And, in looking at other reviews, I am not the first.  There are many options at the Waterfront, and I would suggest you try any of them; but stay far away from this place!
Servers are chatting, not paying attention to tables. I can see my salad is ready at the window. Worst serves ever.
Meh, I just don't see the appeal Bar Louis has to Pittsburghers. I guess this particular restaurant benefits from people who work at the Waterfront stopping in after a shift. It's always packed. Being so close to the AMC theater, they get traffic before and after movies. \n\nIt's expensive, the food is so so. Before I get ahead of myself, I had the BBQ ranch chicken salad without chicken. The BBQ ranch dressing was very good, but it's very easy to duplicate at home. It's equal parts ranch dressing and KC Masterpiece hickory BBQ sauce and a drop or two of Worcestershire and a drop of franks hot sauce. \n\nTuesday is dollar burgers 5 until midnight, daily drink and happy hour selections, but even that's not enough to get me here. Skip it. One caveat for this location, free parking. At Station Square's location you gotta pay to park the jalopy.\n\nI'm eager to see if this place sees a huge drop in business when Burgatory opens across the street.
We stopped here to enjoy a drink before our movie. Our server, was friendly. My husband had a margarita and my server suggested a berry mojito to me.\nBoth drinks were overly sweet and barely any alcohol.  After I finished my drink, I used my fork to dig for the blackberries at the bottom only to find (to my disgust), a decent sized piece of clear saran wrap! Ugg! Did they muddle the mint into the saran wrap?!!! She comped the drink but we won't be back.\nCan't speak about the food since we didn't have any but atmosphere was loud and it was difficult to have a conversation without repeating yourself.
I can't even review this place. We sat ourselves and waited for a waitress to take our order, and we waited and waited until we got tired and just left. And I have to be clear it was a Saturday afternoon, maybe like 10 tables with people at them and I saw 3 waitress walking around. I think it's probably a bad idea to ignore people that come into your restaurant, especially since burgatory just opened across the street.
Other people may have had a better experience with this company but that was not the case for us.  We had rented a limo/bus for a bachelor party.  Our driver Scott, was completely clueless in navigating the city. Constantly making wrong turns and missing exits. All of this after very thorough instruction as to where to go. Each destination took 3-4 times longer to reach due to his incompetence. This caused us to have to skip a couple of our originally planned stops. After returning to the bus after one of our stops we were informed by Scott that the police had come onto the bus and searched it with dogs. Really?!??!  Why??!!  How??!!  We found that our bags had been rifled through and we all felt a little violated and confused. By this point we decided to call it a night. More than half of our passengers didn't care to step back onto the bus and took cabs home. \n\nJust when we thought the worst was over we were wrong. As we enter the highway we realize that Scott has driven all the way up the ramp and onto the highway going THE WRONG WAY!!!  He starts slowly reversing down the ramp while oncoming cars honk and swerve all around us!  Truly terrifying. After that, we were very upset and just wanted to get home. So after several more wrong turns we finally get home. Absolutely terrible night. \n\nSo if you'd like to book a party bus that will include a geographically blind driver, unecessary police involvement, a near death experience and just an overall sense of frustration mixed with panic then go with these guys. Otherwise, I would suggest staying far, far away!
The worse \"Chinese food\", even the white rice which came with the ogle sweet and sour chicken is really bad.  Please don't eat this food.
Boo!  What happened to this location?  It used to be happy and fun!  It just feels depressing and nearly everyone there is just doing the bare minimum to get by?  So sad.
Awful everything. From the bad service, to the diluted soup, to the lame-no chicken on the chicken salad, to the PRE-fabricated pizza. AVOID THIS PLACE!
Well, it started well. Food was okay. Deep dish pizza was good. But the salad we had - too tiny portion!!!\nWe were greeted and seated well. But later the service was not all good. Bad bad service. First of all we had to ask for everything we wanted. The server didn't even had courtesy to ask if we wanted anything more or would like to go for deserts. She just handed over the check when we even didn't ask for it (we wanted to order more).\nLater when we talked about this in the front, the girl there also just listened and said \"okay\", not even a sorry once!!!\nI would not like to go there again... :(
Nope!
Interesting the reviews here are less than stellar already. I would normally not review a chain retail store, but the service I received today just really got my blood boiling.\n\nI will state, as I always do in these types of situations, that I have worked many years in retail. I know what you're supposed to do. I know the ways I've displayed exemplary service and I know the ways I've slacked off. I get it, I really do.\n\nSo I'm in the store early. Hardly any people in there. Weird for the Semi-Annual Sale time of year. Usually it doesn't matter what time you're there during the sale, it's always busy. \n\nI went through my usual bins and picked up a mess of undies and bras. Since no one was at the check out counter and I needed a spot to go through things, I set them down and started to try and chat with the sales chick. I actually always like to do this, just to shoot the breeze, but also to get their opinions on items I'm buying. \n\nThe girl behind the counter was having non of this though.I asked her about a bra and she said she didn't know about that one, but said it should work. I understand, you can't try them all. But the thing that really irked me was that she was definitely not hiding her annoyance at me setting down my things on the counter. I even looked back to make sure there were no people checking out behind me. Ghost town. Tumbleweed rolled by. No one.\n\nSo I'm going through my stuff and separating what I want and don't want and she's sighing and grabbing things saying \"Soooo, you DON'T want these???\" Um, I'm not asking you to help me sort things. I'm not holding up a line. I'm just trying to not spend $$$ on an accidental XS pair of undies that got mixed in! \n\nAfter that, it's not exactly what she said, but how she acted. I have never felt more uncomfortable in a retail store before. I ended up grabbing my discards and putting them back myself (which I really don't mind doing, but after she huffed and puffed, I didn't even want to deal with her). \n\nThe thing is, I was nice the entire time. I don't expect you to sit there and be sugary sweet either. Just do what you were hired to do. Be nice and sell some bras. If you come to work in a bad mood, the real world is not going to give you a hug. Suck it up and do your job or work where you don't have to talk to anyone else ever.
Honestly, I'm furious. I enjoyed PF Chang's restaurants in the Chicago area, and my wife and I have eaten a few times at this Pittsburgh-area location. Over the last year, we have tried repeatedly, but the 90-120 minute wait for dinner is unacceptable. We tried going early, late -- it never made any difference. The front staff was rude, and the wait was too long.\n\nTonight, we had a special date planned, and made reservations a week in advance. We came in the door exactly on time, waited in the line to see the front staff, and we were promptly handed a pager. They couldn't tell us when we would be seated.\n\nI imagined a short wait, so we went outside, crossed into a store to wait (since the entrance of this location is so packed, it's impossible to wait at the bar or in the meager seating).\n\nAfter 20 minutes we gave up. We went back to PF Chang's and the front office staff still couldn't tell us when we would be seated. I saw open tables.\n\nWhat on earth is the point of accepting reservations if you do not honor them?\n\nThe food here is good, but certainly not great. We went to a local Thai place and were seated with no problem in 5 minutes. The food was much better, the service was good even in a crowded busy restaurant. Oh, and the local place was a much more reasonable price.\n\nWe certainly will never visit PF Chang's again.
This was my first time at this PF Chang's and I was not impressed. The service was extremely slow even though it was a Sunday night and the restaurant was not very busy. The portions were small. \n\nThey were also playing 5 year old pop music really loud. Pop music?! Come on--this is an \"Asian Bistro.\"
Walked in tonight, Wednesday, at 9:50, the place was empty. Asked for a table, the hostess told us one moment when she finds one for us, then proceeded to walk to a dirty table and clean it!  The phone rang and she answered it as we stood at the door. When she hung up the phone she walked back to the table and proceeded to clean it again!!  Didn't say a word to us. Unbelievable!  Will not be back there-- rude hostess!
We went last night Saturday night to P.F.Chang located at the Kierlands in Scottsdale. Terrible Experience!!! after waiting over one hour to be seated, we ordered calamari for appetizer which came with a horrible strange salty sauce and salt and pepper mix on the side. then I ordered beef and broccoli and my husband ordered a vegetarian dish with peanut sauce . After a long wait my food came so salty that I could not even eat and as much as I hate to complain but I had to let the waiter know, so he went to get me one with less salt. My husband's dish was OK. then the second one was a bit less salty but the meat had a terrible liver kind of taste which totally turned my stomach. I feel the reason they added so much salt was to hide the bad tasting rotted meat. Very bad experience. Our waiter was kind and sympathetic. ruined my evening out :(
Let me start off by saying I have mostly simple tastes, and my favorite lunch spot for Chinese has been the New Dumpling House in Squirrel Hill. But since that restaurant is undergoing renovations, I was forced to try something new.\n\nSo... I thought I'd try the chain PF Chang's Chinese Restaurant at the Waterfront. Wow, what an unsatisfying mistake that turned out to be.\n\nI started with a cup of their Wonton soup. At $2.95 it wasn't too outrageous of a price, the broth had some flavor and there was much more in it than I was used to, including three giant basil (I think?) leafs that covered everything beneath. In the broth were chunks of chicken, two shrimp, some sliced water chestnuts and two \"pork\"-filled wontons. As I said, the broth had decent flavor, but the wontons were thick, doughy and under-cooked, and the chicken chunks were dry, which is amazing since they were drowned in broth! On a scale of bad to good, it was kind of meh.\n\nNext came my \"lunch-portion\" order of Chang's Kung Pao Chicken (the dinner portion is $5 more). \n\nAt the New Dumpling House, this dish is served with a delectable dark, rich, tangy sauce, which I was really hoping for... Not at PF Chang's. \n\nOn my plate I received about 8 quarter-size chunks of lightly breaded and browned chicken, 7 hot Chinese red chili peppers (mostly inedible unless they are diced into a sauce), a handful of blanched, unsalted peanuts, a few sliced scallions, and a bed of the most bland brown rice I have ever encountered. Uncle Ben would've been ashamed if that stuff came out of one of his boxes.\n\nGlaringly, there was NO SAUCE!. None at all.\n\nI've had Kung Pao Chicken in New York City, San Francisco, and even from a hole in the wall in Bethel Park, PA that was much, much better. Never have I had it served in such a bland, skimpy, and overpriced way! The \"lunch-portion\" cost was $9.95.\n\nAt The New Dumpling House, I could have a delicious lunch, with soup, entree and complimentary hot tea, and I could leave satisfied with just $8 out-of-pocket -- and that includes the tip.\n\nThe service was decent. However, lesson learned. One and done. Never going back to PF Changs.
The food was fine. It's a chain. I'm not rating it. \n\nThe service was absolutely horrible. It started well enough when we ordered lunch, but ended horribly when my daughter said we should get a treat for my husband. \n\nBetween being ignored by the girl at the counter, her not listening to the order, then arguing with me when I told her I did not ask for what she brought me, I really can't decide which is worse. I rather spend my money somewhere local where they appreciate my business, rather than take attitude from Panera employees.
Let's start this review by saying that when we are at that point, my girlfriend and I will be going to Jos. A. Bank for mine and my groomsman's suits.  Allow me to give you a numbered breakdown of the issues we encountered when renting from Men's Wearhouse to be the groomsmen in our friends wedding.\n\n1- They never contacted us after the fitting after saying there would be a followup call.  The other groomsmen and I had to follow up repeatedly to get an answer as to when our tuxedos would arrive and the staff were very short with our honest questions over the phone.\n2- They sent two of our tuxedos to Homestead when we asked for them to be sent to Ross Park Mall during the fitting.\n3- When one of us called two days prior to the wedding to ask if our tux's had arrived the guy answering the phone said \"Oh... I don't know\" (insert an awkward, pregnant pause here while waiting for him to say \"Let me check that for you\") he instead said \"Well, I'm going to hang up now.\"  And he made good on that promise, and hung up.\n4- Despite saying we'd get a call a few weeks ahead of the wedding to be resized in case one of us gained a few lbs over the winter, this call never came so we basically had to hope that everything fit as it needed to.\n5- We were at one point informed that MW had our emails on file and that when our tuxes arrived at the store we would receive an email letting us know.  Not a single groomsman received any such email to that effect.\n6- One of the groomsmen randomly received a black tie while everybody else had white.  Another received no studs.  We discovered this approximately two hours to show-time while relatively far from civilization.\n7- On picking up my tux I informed the associate \"I'll be unable to get to a Men's Wearhouse for a few days after the wedding, is this alright?\" to which she responded \"Yeah that should be fine\" so when my girlfriend graciously dropped off my tux for me a few days later and learned of the $100 late fee, I was totally caught off guard.\n8- My girlfriend was also caught totally off guard by the associate at Ross Park Mall who was incredibly rude to her when  he informed her of said late fee.\n9- As the Best Man I was given a coupon card for $50 off my next rental at Men's Wearhouse.  Since I am in another wedding next month with rentals from MW I figured this would be an opportune time to use it.  Imagine my shock while paying for the next weddings rental, when I presented the coupon and was told \"Oh, that isn't for this.  That is intended for YOUR wedding.  Oh and it expires on December 31st of this year.\" \n10- The groom himself decided to use a coupon to purchase a suit for the wedding and to own, rather than rent a tux for the occasion.  He was ensured by the Homestead staff that the coupon would be fine for this purpose and got fitted for it.  When he went to pick up his suit and pay with the aid of said approved coupon he was instead forced into an argument with an associate who insisted he could not use the coupon towards the suit that an associate a few weeks earlier had insisted he could use.  Granted, now I am speaking for another person so take that with as much salt as you may, but he reiterated this fact to me several times prior to his wedding last week.\n\nOver my friends wedding weekend, any time anything even went slightly wrong at and around his wedding, the joke between the Groom and his Groomsmen was \"Effing Men's Wearhouse.\"  For example, at a restaurant, \"Wait I asked for no onions on this sandwich. - Effing Men's Wearhouse!\"  \"Noise complaint at the hotel room? Men's Wearhouse.\"\n\nAnother groomsman looked at me when we discovered the wrong color tie one of us received and said to me \"I hope you're taking notes for your own impending wedding\" to which I replied \"Perhaps I could find better service from GoodWill of Western PA\"\n\nCongrats Men's Wearhouse.  You became the butt of every joke for every mishap for an entire weekend around a wedding to which you provided the suits.\n\nTL;DR - 10 mistakes, several rude associates and 1 future groom going to Jos. A. Bank.
This store has such bad service. The service staff are rude rude rude.  Save your money, shop elsewhere.
I'm not a mean reviewer, if you look at the other places I've reviewed, but this was just so so so disappointing. The Shanghai style Merlin was very poorly done. The meat was extremely bland, with very little seasoning. I have a very low sodium tolerance and yet I still found this fish to be made too bland. The rice was entirely uncooked and it made crunching sounds as I took my first bite. I talked to the waitress and she offered to bring out another side. It wasn't the same. The whole dish was a fail and I don't think I am ever coming back again :(
Will I come here again?  Yes absolutely for drinks, they knocked the Ketel One extra dirty blue cheese olive martini outta the park.  The ambiance is very nice.  Of the 4 types of reviews I give (awesome, OK, bad where they get slammed and bad where I hope they improve) here I am giving the heartfelt \"bad where I hope they improve.\"  Our waitress was very friendly and did a good job.  I mentioned the gritty redskins of the mashed potato.  We went with appetizers she recommended.  Not good.  \n\nSeared ahi tuna: horrible flavors mixed with the rub, the prep, the tuna wasn't cool inside, the chips were not good, there was no soy sauce but there was wasabi.  NOT good.  With heartfelt advice, compare this against Outback's ahi tuna appetizer and it's no contest.  The chef should do so.  (He's a nice guy like me I hope.)  \n\nBBQ shrimp: go try Redstone's (Philly) buffalo shrimp appetizer.  It is chilled, very delicious.  This appetizer was recommended and was garbage.  The barbecue sauce was horrible, overwhelmed and left an unsavory aftertaste in both my and my clients' palate.  Gordon Food Service or Sysco BBQ sauce.  A real \"must-miss\".  \n\nCod entree was OK.  The skillet beans were too firm, too mature, they need petite green beans.  Potato skin had grit in the mashed.  Why 1 star?  The price was close to Capital Grille, but far from the cuisine.  I hope they spruce it up.  The place is nice.
Very bad purchase experience. I bought a shirt with a hole covered in the rolled up sleeves, but they denied my request to return it. I am so angery at this and will never shop their chothes anymore.
A group of us traveld here to go kenneywood park across the road but we decided not to after what we drove throuhg to get there so we atleast decided to get somthing to eat and man where we happey to get out alive. We where the only normal people in this place. The kids next to us who where only 14 where bragging and saying that they went to jail 2 times in their life. You had people selling their food outsdie the resturant. after seeing that we quickly left and hid in our cars with the doors locked. While we where in there my friend got hit on by 2 girls and they gave him there numbers while the other young guy across the table yeld dont do it dont do it. Must I say more? bottom line is dont go if you are normal and get the hell out of that area cause if you call a shank a happey meal toy then that is the resturant for you.
By far the worst McDonald's in the world.  Employees are to busy playing grab ass behind the counter, to get your order correct.  Ninety percent of the time you receive the wrong order, after waiting what seems an eternity.  I've even enjoyed the experience of going through the drive thru, only to get home and find no beef patties on my Big Mac.  Save yourself the aggravation, and do not go here.
By far the absolute worst Mcdonalds in the\nWorld. You can pretty much rest assured that, after your long wait in the drive thru, your order will most definitely be wrong.  Calls to the owner go ignored. Rice Enterprises own a majority of the McDonalds in the South Hills.  They have all gone down hill in quality, service and cleanliness.  The owner has to be the problem.
Well for my first time here I was way less than impressed. The lady at the front counter was a crab and  the Pierogies really weren't that great. Rather than be kind and answering my questions I settled with the potato and cheese pierogies. I guess Bloomfield Bridge tavern or Mrs. T's is still my go to place. And plus this place is way out of my way to be treated poorly. I wouldn't go back
ewwww
I have never gotten an order correct from this specific McDonald's. I'm not sure what the problem is, but it is never, ever right. It is never quick. The staff is always rude. After trying at least 12-15 times over the past year, I've finally given up hope on this place. Do not recommend.
My orders have come out bad pretty much every time I have ordered from here. The chicken nuggets come out under par. I'm lucky if the fries come out right. My last experience is the last straw. I recently posted a photo of my Chicken Ranch Club. That has no chicken. This is ridiculous. I am done going to this Mcd's.
Delivery is slow and not even close to the best Chinese in the area.  No matter if it's rice or noodles or chicken or pork, everything tastes off--like it's been overcooked in mop-bucket-water.  Try House of Lee instead.
Wow. What a shame. My family just moved to the area and have been sampling the local cuisine. We are a very large family and love foods of all kind. We've eaten Chinese food from a hundred different places in a dozen different cities. Hands down, this was the worst we've ever had. Cold, tough, congealed, and tasteless - that's the only way to describe it. I'll never order from here again. Quite frankly, the fact that I took time away from my kids to type this out should tell you how awful it was. My complaints fell on deaf ears. I guess they were shocked that someone thought that they were serving low grade dog food. I understand that sometimes restaurants crank out bad food. It happens. But when it does, you bend over backwards to make it right. Not at this place. I was told that he would have to speak with the owner in order to help me. I guess that's how they deflect complaints - blame it on the owners that aren't there and make the customer for away angry.  Too bad. Because we will be visiting a competitor in the future. This family of 7 won't be visiting China Sea ever again. Oh, and by the way, why can't I give this place zero stars?
The pros:\nYou get a TON of food for your money. If the food was actually decent, this would have been even better because... LEFTOVERS. \nThey have coupons on their website that you can use whenever. \n\n\nThe cons:\nThe woman who answers the phone is kinda rude. You try to ask her questions and she gets an attitude with you like you're wasting her time. \nMy pork dumplings were \"fried\" only on one side and were raw in the middle. \nEverything was pretty darn salty. Yeah, I get it. Chinese food tends to be a little salty, but this was unacceptably salty. \nLeftovers... Yes this is also a con because I threw it away. Suffering through it once was enough! \n\nIf you're craving something made fresh that is spicy and sweet, you're not going to find it here. Just very greasy, very salty, poor excuse for Chinese takeout.
If you have any common sense at all, please don't stay here.  Once, it almost burnt down...and I'm pretty sure most of the locals were chanting \"burn, baby, burn.\"
Horrifying.  This place should be ashamed of itself.  DO NOT STAY HERE.  Beyond dirty, just absolutely rank.
OMG who wrote the review below? A big fat liar/someone that was paid to write that! I stayed there for an hour this past weekend (my friend and I were both intoxicated and figured laying down a few hours would get us better suited to finish driving home). This place looks like it hasb't been cleaned (or furnished) since the 80s. Literally there was grime on the walls, and squashed, unwiped bug smears too. Ok, so not the best, but for two hours, we could deal. We looked for bed bugs, and didn't see any immediate signs of them- so we laid down to rest. After about 20-30 minutes, we both started itching like crazy. I ran to the bathroom mirror (there was mold all over the bathroom) and saw bed bug bites all on my shoulders, arms, and legs. HORRIBLE!! PLEASE Health Department, shut them down! It's deplorable in there!!
I got a pedicure here. Not bad, they were pretty thorough. But two days later both of my big toes were infected and oozing pus where she trimmed my toenails on the sides (which was weird anyway). I hate to rate a local shop down, but man my toes hurt.
STAY AWAY, the owners are so rude, they blatantly say they are not doing well and then try to pretend they have the best hairdressers in Pittsburgh. they make you feel so unwelcome, advertise they offer a bunch of services and then when you ask they snap at you that they only do hair.  it was so awkward and weird .  i received warnings not to get my hair done there so i was going to get a pedicure because i had a gift certificate.  she told me her employees will only take cash if they have to touch a client's feet.  I may go there just to get bangs trimmed since i do not want to completely waste the certificate, but this place gives me the creeps, sounds dirty, and has beyond bad customer service.  They definitely do NOT know how to run a business and it is obvious why they are not doing well. Sue and Kristi pass the phone back and forth because noone wants to take a call.  she reiterates that the business is doing bad and they need more clients.  i have never experienced a ruder salon, or should i say dead beat shack.
I think it is ridiculous that they say they need more clients!  I was all ready to be a new client.  I had a 12:30 appointment with them, and when I arrived at 12:30 on the dot, the place was locked and dark and no one was there!  I waited for five minutes (in the rain), and they still didn't show.  I called and left a voicemail saying that I was still willing to wait, and I understood if there was some confusion, but could they call my cell (I gave them the number, as I had previously given my home number when I made the appointment).  I waited nearby at a coffee shop, went back after another five minutes, and it was still locked and I hadn't received a call.  And I am definitely not estimating the time, either.  I was willing to wait a bit, and I looked very closely at the time on my phone to be sure that I wasn't jumping the gun on calling and then leaving.  Finally, I went on with my day and when I got home, they had left a voicemail on my HOME PHONE, which I had specifically asked them not to call, saying, \"Oh hi.  Sorry you missed me, but I was MAYBE two minutes late at the most.  I hope you haven't left, but you should just call back to reschedule.'  Seriously?  When I was waiting, another woman came to the door.  I thought she worked there, but she was just another client, also trying to get in!  When I told this story at another local business, the women there said that I was probably the fourth person who had had this same experience at this place.  I couldn't believe it.  This place is the worst, and I have never even stepped inside!
Now I'm picky about my hair, but Mane Attractions was so bad that I walked out after about 15 minutes of watching the stylists work on other clients.\n\nI had desperately needed a haircut and walked in for a major trim and re-shaping of my layers.  First, the girl at the counter said my hair might be \"difficult\" due to the length (it was nearly long enough to sit on at the time) and that I would probably have to stand while it was cut.  Weird, but okay.  Second, no one there knew anything about donating to \"Locks of Love,\" and I feel like salons should be aware of things like that.  I needed a cut so I went for it anyway.\n\nI watched the two stylists while I waited for my turn.  One stylist told the client whose hair she was cutting that she was going to do something other than what they discussed because it \"wasn't looking right.\"  Ummm, okay.  The other stylist was too busy checking her phone every three seconds to notice she was yanking on her client's hair so hard with the comb that she was giving her poor client whiplash.\n\nAt that point, I just pretended like I had received an urgent text and said, \"I have to leave, so sorry \"as I bolted for the door.
Got a key lime pie from this place. It was horrid. Icing was stale cake thick, crust was not even crunchy or had taste, and the key lime was weak. Pie looked it it was sitting out for a day or 2.
I cannot imagine a more miserable place to shop than this jam-packed monstrosity.  This is a store that makes me thankful for Goodwill and The Salvation Army resale stores.  The customers and the staff are miserable at Red White and Blue.  The clothes are priced far higher than other such shops.  Merchandise is not refundable or exchangeable, and there are no fitting rooms!  One purchases clothes at their own risk!  What person would buy a suit under these conditions, hoping the pants will fit?  Unlike other stores, there is no senior discount and no credit cards accepted, a rare cash only business.  To the reviewer who boasts that everything is 50% off every day, how is that a sale?  It is bogus pricing.  Red White and Blue, uggh!
Love the store. Great stuff, High price. Buyer BEWARE of the RUDE cashier SYLVIA, extremely unpleasant, unwilling to help and always with NEGATIVE attitude. She needs customer service training....Someone please tell her to stop complaining about other customers or employees....Cashier that does window display is always kind, friendly and helpful.
This place is overpriced and the service is not good at all.  When we where there children were riding bikes in the lot near the tables.  One almost hit our child.  Another customer said that if the owner had been there she would have not allowed the bikes to be there.  The cone was large to say the least but the taste left something to be desired.  Not the best neighborhood either with a bar nearby.  Our children were exposed to language that would have made a sailor blush.  We will not be back.  Also they will accept a credit card but not a debit card?????  Please get up with the times.
I had a very unfortunate experience with this groomer. My dog  was not groomed to my specifications; infact she was butchered. I went to the trouble of taking a photo of my dog with  the haircut that I wanted, as well as speaking with the woman who assured me she would be grooming my dog. The owner groomed my dog, not the woman that I spoke with and she looked nothing like my dog when I picked her up. The owner was rude and did not even apologize for the horrible service. Do not take your dog there to be groomed!
They made my Portuguese Water Dog look horrible. \n\nThey actually sheared all the fur from my dog claiming that it was matted and therefore they had no choice. This isn't true as I personally brush my dog every morning. When I complained, the owner said: \"But we did tell you that we will cut the dog's fur short.\"  Yes, they did, and I thought that considering that the days are hot in August, they are proposing a little cooler grooming. I never expected them to just shear the dog to the skin. \nI think they did it because they are hopelessly irresponsible. Although they charged $70 for this brutally simple operation they have not even trimmed dog's ears and tail. Consequently, the dog has disproportionally long hair on its tail and the ears. \nI used Animal Elegance for more than a decade. Long before current management took over. Over all these years I sometimes took in stride their accessional compromise of standards and always paid their exorbitant prices without complaint. However, this fragrant negligence, combined with their total disregard of the fact that I was an old and loyal customer did it. I will avoid this place from now on and would like to suggest that you do the same.
I've been told several times that this place had a great brunch.  Upon arrival, the menu was very limited and the service was abysmal despite a nearly empty restaurant.  We literally waited 15 mins. at our table and then left prior to ordering.
The food here is ok but not worth the price. $15 corking fee? $9 a glass of garbage wine? Me thinks not.\n\nWhat really tops it off is the owner is beyond rude and doesn't care about the business. I heard it used to be much better but now I don't know anyone who eats there...
I went to Pino's with my three other friends for Restaurant Week and was underwhelmed and completely disappointed. We chose an option for each course of  the very limited Restaurant Week menu. I selected the baked eggplant caprese appetizer, Lazy Man lasagna Florentine and then the panna cotta for dessert. \n\nBaked eggplant caprese: the breaded eggplant was a soggy mess. \nLazy Man Lasagna Florentine: it was essentially two huge lasagna noodles sandwiching huge clumps of spinach (I'm talking like a 3-inch high pile of clumped spinach) with a few mushrooms peppered in. The spinach ratio was out of control and I honestly ate a few bites and couldn't even continue. \nPanna cotta: this was the most decent of the items we ordered.\n\nMy friend ordered off the regular menu, which she advised not to do since her food would come out at a different time?? Why? \nWe tried my friend's appetizer of the Italian Fries, which are described on the menu as sounding very similar to the amazing fries at Point Brugge...but it was just a bowl of regular French fries, which were lackluster and misleading. She also got the house soup with chickpeas and it looked like Spaghetti-o's and tasted even worse.\n\nI don't know where all the positive reviews are coming from. There was not one thing we ate that was impressive in any way. All of it was overpriced and below mediocre. I wasted my money, and I will never, ever go back there.
I went to Pino's recently, only to be disappointed by the owner himself. I guess I should have read the reviews on here before going, seeing as a lot of people echo the sentiments that I feel.\n\nAfter my mother sent back her extremely oversalted steak, the chef came out to \"apologize\". It was very embarrassing how he chastised her for not enjoying her meal. He then snidely commented, as walking away, that he would \"never salt his steak again\". I don't really take kindly to people speaking so rudely to my mother. She was very polite about sending it back and certainly didn't deserve any attitude. We had an event to attend, which we were very clear with to our waitress. So when my mother reordered another meal (a salad), which took another twenty minutes, my mom asked for it to be immediately wrapped up. The chef returned, obviously chewing to make a point, and sneered at my mother, announcing her steak that she refused to eat was actually quiet good. Well, I have never felt more embarrassed in a situation. I said he was being rude to my mother, a paying customer. He proceeded to get heated and tell me it was not his job to make people happy (!??!) and that everyone else seemed to enjoy their meal and we just had to get to the inside of the steak to appreciate it. \n\nThe drama continued when he did not have change for $100 for a $57 bill. Sorry, how can you not have $33 in change?! He ended the night by throwing our bill in a crumbled mess on the floor and walking out. \n\nOverall, embarrassing. It was an embarrassing situation for anyone to witness. Take heed of the negative comments on this site. I certainly wish I would have.
Very disappointing meal.  After waiting for a half hour, my meal arrived and we were told that my friend's meal would be coming in a few minutes. Very awkward.t.  Salad was average at best.  The beets tasted like canned beets and the chicken was covered with blackish oil from a burnt oil pan.\n\n  Then, to make matters worse the chef came out to argue with a patron who returned her food.  The chef came out to humiliate the customer explaining that her returned steak was great and himself was enjoying it.  Eating food from a customers plate was a real turn-off....what else does he do when cooking? \n\nTo make matters worse, when paying the bill, the chef did not have change for a $100 bill for the customer who returned her steak..  It was very uncomfortable watching the elderly customer and her young friend deal with the situation. He kept  loudly requesting a credit card  and the women did not have one.   Another customer provided them with change as the chef crumbled the check. I think I would have just left and not paid....give the lady great for dealing with such a lunatic.\n\nLong story short....if you want to eat below average food and watch a chef loose it....this is your place!
This was the place I brought friends visiting from out of town when I wanted to show them the classy Italian  spots in Pittsburgh. After my visit last night, I have no desire to ever go again. \n\nI don't know the owner, Joe, personally but he has stopped by our table a few times and said \"dish looks beautiful.\" He was always confident in his food which I guess is a good thing if the good is delicious,  which it usually is  \n\nThe table next to ours had a two women, a mother and daughter. The mother asked the server for a new steak as hers was a bit salty (I've never had the steak as I'm vegetarian but my guests have mentioned the abundance of salt). The server apologizes and returns to the kitchen. The owner comes out and fakes an apology claiming his steaks are perfect. At this point the whole restaurant is listening it's that crazy.  The  best part? He comes out again and says \"I really enjoyed the steak you sent back.\" He was eating the steak and had some in his mouth! I can't make stuff like this up!\nAt this point the whole place feels bad for the mother and daughter. Clearly an awkward situation. The owner got so nasty the daughter tried to reason with him and he said \"it's not my job to make people happy\" that's strange considering he wants our business. \nSo the mother tries to pay the bill with a $100 and leave but he said they can't make change. Eventually another customer helps make change and they leave.\n\nI couldn't finish my dinner I was so mad.  Maybe Joe was having a bad day but there is no excuse for how he treated those customers.  Sorry, we will never step foot in here again.
If you don't like your food... do not send it back to the kitchen... The \"Chef\" will come out and scream at you... Stay away from this place.
Great
Definitely overpriced for what they offered.  Took my car in to check my AC, they didn't get back to me for the whole day, and decided to fix whatever the problem was without asking me and charging me an insane about (approximately $150 more than most places).  Definitely will not go back there again.
Been yelled at by other customers (today for instance)...place is super ghetto...avoid at all cost. Today, left a full cart bacause a woman (with a baby in a stoller) shouted at me for \"cutting in line\". Will never go back. At night it is a nightmare.
Figure I'd give Supercuts a shot since Giant Eagle sells their gift cards so it is great for fuelperks.  I don't remember her name but she is one of the \"bigger\" woman there.  I wanted to grow out my hair longer but it was looking messy.  So I asked her for a trim to get the sides/back cleaned up.  She said ok and off she goes.  5 minutes later, we were done.   Yes, just like a bad date, we were done in 5 minutes.\n\nI got home, showered, and saw the damage.  It was messy.  What's worst is every day it grows, it looked even worst.\n\nI'll just stick to my usual barber.
I wish I could return a haircut.\n\nUnfortunately Kelly, Melissa, and Jen were not there so I settled for whoever was free at the time. \n\nWorst trim of my life:\nshe cut off over an inch more than just the dead/split ends\nshe did not cut the hair how I described initially\nshe did not change the cut to how I repeated during the cut when I noticed she was cutting it straight across instead of curving it in the back, which does NOT mix well with my curly hair\nafter retelling her how I wanted it cut, she compared this tragedy to deaths of family/friends and how I should get over it\nthe beautiful long layers I had and wanted again are now choppy, medium layers\nmy left side is even choppier than the right side of my hair\nI fear straightening my hair to make this unevenness less evident\n\nI regret tipping her because I understand how the service industry works because my minimum tip of 20% for all service people is undeserved for her lack of work.\n\nI want everyone to know how the only good hair stylists there are Kelly (who moved to Philly), Melissa and Jen. If they are not available, do NOT risk going.\n\nAlso, the Supercuts Oakland location is horrible at waxing eyebrows unless you are lucky to get the only woman of color there.\n\nWhile it was a $20 cut (after the 20% tip), I know had to buy biotin to grow my hair faster so it is more expensive to me in the end. I hope this proves helpful to all perspective customers!
I went there today! The cut was terrible! I have an awful experience. They lady that cut my hair was nice but she wanted to leave early so she made a disaster in my head!
Tasteless food that arrived over an hour after it was ordered and was cold.  Will never order from here again.
Never received my order and was left in a bad mood. The driver did not carry GPS for delivery, did not know my address which is right in squirrel hill, did not listen to me (or did not understand me?) when I tried to give him directions, asked me to pick up food from an intersection 0.3 miles away from my apartment in snow, and finally yelled at me to cancel my order. \n\nCannot comment about food, but whatever experience I had left a bad taste.
We were visiting from out of town and just spent 6 hours driving. Found this place, read reviews on Yelp which were OK, and decided to ordered two slices. Hum...sorry not slices. More like two squares of cheesy bread. When we said these aren't slices, the lady at the register looked confused as though pizzas always look like that. We obviously aren't locals by the way we were dressed so the lady (who talked terribly) should have notified us when we first ordered it! They also have pictures of real pizzas on the wall -_-\nIt also took a really long time to cook those little things because they weren't pizzas. Since I was so hungry, i ordered another square of unhappiness and it was handed to me in the cooking wrapper not a paper plate, ugh. Definitely never going there if we come to visit again!
Horrible Food don't waste your money\n\nThis is the worse cardboard covered cheese & sauce so called pizza I've ever had, I haven't had this garbage since grade school cafeteria food, Most of the reviews on here rant about what a great place this is how much fun you'll have there. IDK where that place is cuz the one I wan in today in East Liberty by the Home Depot was getto beyond belief the food is bad & the people aren't nice & friendly.\n\nLoudness is an issue there when the lottery area has a sign saying because of back round noise your number may be wrong. Not one person there had decent customer service skills I had to ask the girl 3 times to speak up and I have excellent hearing. I ordered a small pizza I got a medium that was greasy on top but the crust was stale. \n\nI looked forward to getting some great pizza man this place really disappointed me today.
This place has the worst service I've ever seen. I called in two cold sandwiches and was told it would be 15 mins. When I got to the counter, the lady working rudely told me to wait for my name to be called because she didn't have my ticket to ring up the order. Um, okay...then walk over and get it so i can pay for it! So I waited and waited as people who came in long after me got their orders. The \"workers\" just stand around and spend more time talking to the regulars and trying to act like they are a big deal. I had to leave without my order after 40 minutes. DO NOT GO HERE!
Please do not adopt any pets from here until they update their standards.  I hate to think of animals living in cages, but...\n\n!! At least two cats adopted from here in September have diagnosed with the herpes virus by the vet, and this is contagious to other cats. !!\n\nAKA, it is likely that the shelter staff is not washing hands between handling pets and they are not testing for a virus that can be fatal in kittens.\n\nI recently adopted a kitten from their shelter--I picked him up from their Pittsburgh Public Market adoption station.  I was told that he had been tested for common feline viruses and up-to-date on vaccinations.  These were both untrue statements.  The kitten has the herpes virus and was not vaccinated against this.  My roommate, who was with me, and I were warned about the upper respiratory infection (URI) that can occur because of this virus and others, but we were not told that he was neither tested nor vaccinated for the herpes virus.  They gave me a paper with his vaccinations, but it was in vet-speak, so I took their word for it. \n\nFurthermore, the shelter staff put my kitten in my roommate's name mistakenly (and claimed that if we just called in that they would fix this mistake, but then wouldn't), so when he got sick, no one from their clinic would return my calls--I'm guessing this was since I wasn't the owner according to their records.  I had to email them to get a response, which basically said sorry that we didn't return your calls but this is your problem now.  They never apologized for the kitten's health or asked if he was feeling better.  Where's the compassion for the animal?\n\nSo now I have a very sick kitten on my hands.  I took him to the Big Easy in Lawrenceville when he stopped eating, and Dr. Ruiz is the best.  She took care of him, but it cost $160 to treat the virus he picked up at the shelter.\n\nThe Animal Rescue League shelter/clinic said that it does not and will not cover expenses for this.  After I had already taken him elsewhere, the clinic staff said that they would have given me a discount if I had waited two days to go to their clinic, but who would wait two days while the kitten wouldn't eat??  And now this virus makes him ineligible for pet insurance.  It  will cost hundreds of extra dollars a year to keep him healthy. \n\nHad I not fallen in love with the little monster, I would have taken him back to another shelter.  That's what the person who adopted the other kitten with virus did.  Whenever he gets an outbreak, he will get another URI.  This means a lethargic cat who sneezes, gags, and coughs because he can't breathe and who won't eat because he's too congested to smell his food.  It's very sad--protect your cats with the herpes vaccination, please!\n\nOh, and in case you were wondering: just like in humans, cat herpes is fo' life.  Poor little guy.  This also ruins my plan of getting another cat in the future.  Bad shelter!
Staff members here have always come up short. A past kennel worker  sold his litter of pit bull puppies in east liberty and the shelter was made aware of it  but excused it. \n\nThey will lie to surrendering families because they don't  want the cold hard truth, the good, bad and the ugly to leak out to the public. They lie ! \nThey kill many many animals because of a very subjective behavioral test that their dog hating staff performs .\n\nThey kill more pets for space than any other pittsburgh shelter.\n\nMany volunteers walk on eggshells here because they know an animals life is hanging in the balance and they are afraid to speak up or not allowed back in to volunteer . \n\nWeak leadership. This is the cities highest cat and dog death rate of any shelter or rescue in western pa
This is a terrible shelter.  It appears that they routinely turn away (or kill, unless you state you will take them back) cats because they are \"overcrowded.\"  They will tell you that your cat has a \" behavioral issue\" to address turning said animal away. Mark that you will take your cat (or dog, etc.) back or else you risk having them \"put down.\"
Never again. Let me repeat, never again. \n\nThe primary reason I used to visit this store was to fill medical prescriptions. Due to their repeated inability and ineptness in fulfilling simple requests, I cannot continue to patronize this store.\n\nWalking into the store, you are given the stink-eye by a minimum wage security guard, which automatically gives you as a customer the warm and fuzzy \"guilty-until-proven guilty\" feeling a shoplifter would get, which is what this store assumes everyone is based upon their decision to lock up the mouthwash and shampoo.\n\nThe pharmacy seems to be staffed by high school interns.  They have no concept of customer service, nor do they display any attention to detail, which is quite frankly frightening in a pharmacy.  I really think my chihuahua would make a better pharmacist than the people who work here - my chihuahua lick you to death before you got your prescriptions, but at least you'd get greeted when you approach the counter, and you'd get what you ask for.\n\nThe first mishap was when my wife and I changed prescription insurance providers.  i handed wanna-be pharmacist #1 my new insurance card.  After spending about 5 minutes staring into a computer screen behind the counter, he assured me that they had my insurance information in the computer.  I then returned in the following days to fill a prescription, trusting in what wanna-be pharmacist #1 had told me in the days prior.  When I went to check out the bill came to over $300, which I chalked up \"maybe I have to meet a deductible before the coverage kicks in.\"  Upon further research, we discovered that wanna-be pharmacist #1 had NOT updated my insurance information and had run the numerous prescriptions I filled under my old insurance.\n\nThe latest of many \"adventures\" involved my wife calling in a prescription refill.  We stopped to pick it up on the way home from work, only to be told when we arrived that the insurance won't cover the refill until tomorrow.  Again, she CALLED and SPOKE to one of them to refill the prescription before showing up.  I guess it's too much to ask to TELL someone you're speaking to on the phone that they need to wait a day for the insurance to work before coming into a ghetto pharmacy to not pick up a prescription.  But hey, at least wanna-be pharmacist #2 behind the counter was dressed like a stripper, which gave me and my wife some comic relief for the moment.  \n\nWe then returned the following day to (again) pick up the prescription we called to have refilled 2 days prior.  We were first told by wanna-be pharmacist #3 that there weren't any prescriptions waiting for us.  After searching around for a few minutes, they \"found\" my wife's prescription refill, but it would take 10 minutes to be ready.  Yes, the prescription that we tried to pick up yesterday would need another 10 minutes to be prepared.  Hence, I am now here, writing this review.\n\nNever, ever again.
This place is a disaster. I made an appointment online for 5:30PM. When I got there they refused me service, asserting they close at 6:00PM. Nevermind that online published hours are from 7AM to 7PM. Furthermore, their own system sent me a confirmation email for my 5:30PM appointment. Finally, this building is an absolute dump... Goodyear should be ashamed to have the brand attached to it.
Tire replacement, was told it would take about 1.5 hours (when I had an existing appointment). It's almost been 2.5 hours and I'm still waiting. Ridiculous.
I was just there this morning for a 10am appointment to get my summer tires swapped out for my winter tires.  My regular mechanic was overbooked and there is snow coming on Monday.  Receptionist scheduled me in just fine and the quoted price was reasonable, so I said OK.  Upon arrival, store manager stated that they will not touch the car as it has aftermarket rims and lug nuts.  He did not state any restrictions about aftermarket parts as they could not guarantee the work.  I asked if this was the case for all rims and he became a little snotty.  I had heart surgery a while back and I can't do the jack and tire work as not to tear at my incision/breastplate, if this was not the case with my health, I'd certainly take care of it.  Aftermarket rims are common - should not be an issue.  Last time I ever set foot in that place.
Poor service that leaves tenants to fight mildew on their own. When asked to repair something, Rockwel Realty will do it on their terms and refuse to give you notice of when they will enter your apartment despite multiple requests\n\nWhen asked to clean mildew, they did in fact clean it with bleach while also spilling bleach on my sheets and ruining them. When told about this problem and that the mildew returned they said it was my fault for not turning the heat up and that damage done during service is an inherent risk the tenant is responsible for and nothing could be done. Their solution was for me to clean the mildew instead of properly insulating the unit to prevent mildew. \n\nThe entire building also has severe electrical problems that causes all lights to be replaced twice a month. No permanent fixes are made to existing units, but there is constant construction to expand an old building so they can collect more rent.
Exceptionally poor maintenance service. They refused to start heat before mid-October and the centrally heated apartment grew very chilly as Fall progressed. On another occasion, they refused to change a rusted and weak lock. The lock eventually gave way and I locked myself into the bathroom. After the incident, I requested that the lock be changed immediately, and one of the owners threatened saying that we were in default of our lease agreement for not keeping our apartment as clean as when it had been leased to us. Dealing with Rocco and Elisabeth is nice, but good luck getting anything done with Nick who seems to be increasingly handling the operations of Rockwel.
I'm a lawyer in NY and I'm visiting a friend in Pittsburgh. I am blown away by the code violations in this unit. The tenants said they have reported these issues to the owner and to no avail. I am hoping to direct these tenants to a lawyer in PA.
The people who work here are very rude. I have gone back a few times thinking it may have just been the person working that day was just a rude person, but no it happen every time. I am not a young hip person and felt very out of place there. It is like you are walking into someone's house and bothering them. The people working behind the counter act like you are interfering with there conversation. Plus it is very dirty. Perhaps the people working there should try cleaning the place instead of talking to each other. I will not go back again.
This is the worst service (or worst non-service) I have ever experienced. Since I can't give zero stars, I'm giving the service one. We didn't eat anything so I can't comment on the food. \n\nMy husband and I went to Buffalo Blues last night. We stood at the empty hostess stand for a while. When no one came to seat us, and we couldn't find anyone to seat us, we seated ourselves figuring that's what we were supposed to do.\n\nThe bar was full, but not packed. There were only two other tables with guests, one of which had empty plates on the table during this entire experience. After what seemed like forever, my husband got up to find a server. He literally walked around the restaurant to find someone, but couldn't. He then tried to ask the bartender, but she was just as elusive. When he finally found a server,  she acted totally shocked that we were there. Maybe if someone had been doing their job, they wouldn't be surprised to find hungry people in a restaurant.\n\nShe came to our table, got our drinks (a soda and a water) and asked us if we were ready to order. When we said no she said she would be back. We could see her chit chatting with another server, but again, couldn't get her attention to come back to take our order. After another ten minutes of waiting for her to return, we put a few dollars on the table for my soda and we left. We ordered a pizza at a local shop and picked it up on our way home.\n\nTwenty-five minutes passed and we only get drinks? Such a waste of time. It took us 20 minutes just to make the drive there, 25 of waiting, and another 20 to get home. That's over an hour of our evening completely wasted which left us starving after a hard days work. I used to work as a server so I could understand if the place was busy and the staff was short handed, but it was basically a dead night table top wise. I will NEVER go back.
I hate this place. I have been here many times and I am just finally getting around to writing a review.  Let me state that my wife made me go here tonight because my friends wanted to and she said I need to indulge their interests. Even if they suck. \n\nBuffalo Blues is like a Hooters, except the girls where more clothes and are not as good looking. The service is horrendous and the food may be better at Hooters.  The beer selection is decent at Buffalo Blues but it is expensive and they often run out of things that are still on the board.\n\nMy friends like going for all you can eat wing night but frankly I don't get it. You get 10 wings up front they will give more wings 5 at a time. The problem is that you get those wings in 30 minute intervals.  So the max you could eat is 55 wings. Did I mention that  the wings are really tiny and the sauce is tossed on like a Jackson Pollack painting.  They also charge extra for blue cheese or ranch.  The wings do not come with celery. This is a crime against humanity and the city of Buffalo.  \n\nI chose to detour from wings tonight and ordered a chicken sandwich. Apparently this was a bad choice.  It took a full hour to get my food. It was so long that the rest of the table ate their wings and ordered more and the waitress didn't think this was a problem. When my meal did arrive everything was cold. The sandwich was ok, but the fries were just tiny pieces that were limp and flavorless.\n\nI paid $16 for a beer and a sandwich that my friends had to wait for me to eat to leave.  I would say I won't go back, but apparently I like my friends more than I like good food and service.
Went here this past Saturday afternoon, 11/2. My friends and I sat at the pretty much empty bar for over 5 minutes with no service. The bartender walked by us a few times and didn't even acknowledge we were there. As we walked out, we saw the bartender on the phone and other staff members standing in the back chatting. We went next door to Mad Mex and got much better service!
To be honest, I think this is one of the worst bars in the entire city.  The food was sub-par, even for bar food, the service was awful, especially during a game. I do enjoy a good sports bar, but I think the thing I hated most about this place was the other people that frequent there. It's the quintessential Shadyside bar, equipped with doughebag bros that went to the same fraternity in college and the Jersey Shore bimbos who pine for them. The last time that I went there were two guys throwing up outside of the bar on the sidewalk. I fully admit this is a subjective review, because this bar was obviously not my scene- but I still do not like this place at all.
Unfortunately, the service we were given ruined our overall experience at Buffalo Blues. We sat down and put in our drink order.  My husband was excited about the amount of beers they had on tap. Fifteen minutes later and still without drinks, we saw our server trying to hunt the bartender down. Once the bartender finally started working on our drinks, she realized the keg for the beer my husband ordered was tapped. We were sitting at the booths right next to the bar but instead of the bartender just telling us so we could make another decision and get our drinks as soon as possible, she waited for the waitress to come back to tell her. Then, the waitress came back and did not apologize at all but simply said that he had to pick a different beer because they were out of that one. Anyway, long story short, it took way too long to get drinks and there was never any recognition from the staff of the issue. The restaurant seemed poorly managed and subpar. We will not be back.
I've been to Buffalo Blues a few times at Happy Hour, and met my daughter there last night for Happy Hour specials as advertised on the web site.  First clue:  no Happy Hour promos mentioned in the bar except for the Yeungs and Wings (which was not what we were looking for).  We came close to leaving as my beer was off the draft list, but we decided to stay and were disappointed that my daughter's choice was already gone although still ilsted.  The food was awful, the service worse.  Maybe a busser should clean the table after removing the dirty dishes--our table was a sticky  mess.  The service:  one beer to the table at a time.  Next round I saw two beers go to a three-top, removed and sent to the bar, poured out and the glasses refilled and brought to us.  Someone else's food was brought to our table, our fries came out --lukewarm---but our wing order never went in.  So we got our garlic parm wings which tasted like old overcooked chicken and was way too crispy and greasy for my taste.  We ate two each, then told the server we didn't want them.  She offered to take them off, but we told her that wasn't necessary, so they took off 1/2 the price as a Customer service gesture.  Still, we had a Happy Hour bill for 1/2 eaten fries, barely touched wings, and 6 drafts total of $45 at a dirty table.  At least the place was quiet--there were empty tables everywhere.  I think we're done here.
That is a great cat they have working, but they only have 3 brands of cat food, all of them expensive.  Funny enough though not as expensive as what I was looking for.  They followed me around like I was going to stuff my pockets and that just ruined the whole mom and pop thing.
Dr. Eric Segal was a complete ass. He was rude and obnoxious to me and my wife. We went to him for an adjustment and I left wanting to adjust this idiot's face. I will deter all of my clients from going here and will personally make sure that this man doesn't disrespect anyone else like he did to us.
Made an appointment for 3:30. They completely forgot I was coming but said they could start on my car in ten minutes and be done in an hour. Came back an hour later only to see my car in the same spot. They said it would take another two hours to start work. Completely unhelpful and unapologetic.
I came in with a flat.  They said they couldn't repair the tire because there was cracking on the edges.  True there were cracks, but they were hairline cracks and superficial.  The diagnosis was done just from examining the exterior, which I discovered, is not sufficient to adequately judge if the cracking is bad enough--you have to actually take the tire off.\n\nCoincidentally, all four tires had the light cracking and therefore all four tires would probably need replacing.  Hmmm....  How convenient for Monro?\n\nWell, even if I give them the benefit of the doubt on the tire cracking, the pricing on the tires was ridiculous.  My tires, which were under warranty, would have cost over $500 to get replaced with crap tires (that's with the warranty credit applied).  Oh but wait, they could make me a deal with some in-house tires that were even crappier for $480.  How did I know they were crappy?  I looked them up online.  Guess what else I found.  Both sets of tires were significantly cheaper according to the Manufacturer's website even when including installation, balancing, and disposal!  \n\nSo no, no thank you.  I don't want to pay $500 to get cheap tires on my car.\n\nFortunately, my tire would hold air for a few hours so I drove to another place.  They fixed the flat no problem for $20.  Guess that cracking wasn't so bad after all.
I came in here to have a diagnosis done on my car because the ABS light was on. \nThey removed all the tires, showed me how the sensor and ABS work, did not perform the diagnosis I originally went in for and told me that I should have the back wheel hubs replaced for a total of $1,222, this with a new set of breaks (that I knew about) and \"without\" charging me labor. \nI may not know much about cars but I know how to search the internet and ask for advice. I found the cost of wheel hubs, they are no more than $150 each (for my car) and here they said that they cost $550 each (before labor). \n\nI also found out that the sensors get so soiled from all the dirt and salt that most of the time all the car needs is a simple wash on the undercarriage. You should always have your car washed, specially in the winter. It may save you $100's.\n\nThis place will rob you blind.\n\nNever have work done in a place like this until you do your homework!
I took a subaru outback here for the annual state safety and emissions inspections.  First I was charged more for this service than what was clearly posted on the service station wall.  Secondly I was failed for a lug nut that had rusted to the point that the technicians could not get it off.   I was quoted $425 for them to get it off.  I was able to accomplish this with a $6 bottle of penetrating oil and a breaker bar.  \n\nWhen I returned to have the reinspection I was charged for it (their policy posted on the service wall clearly states you get a second inspection within 30 days of initially failing free of charge).  This time they were able to get the lug nut off but supposedly could not get it back on.  This was odd as I had taken it off and put it back on numerous times to ensure it was okay to pass.  They once again quoted me $425, stating they would have to replace the wheel stud.  The new wheel stud cost me $3.50 at the local parts store and I did the job in under an hour without a single power tool.  \n\nThis shop is not following the guidelines they have clearly posted on their wall and are fabricating problems in an effort to overcharge you for simple repairs.  Avoid this shop.
Have taken my car here a few times because there's a bus stop out front so it's convenient to drop my car off and get to work. But after what happened I will never be back. They just cost me money and lost my tires. \n\nIn March I blew a tire on a pothole (naturally) and they replaced the two front tires for me. The second tire was fine but you have to replace both, I kept it so that I would have a spare if another one blew out. Put the tires in my basement, no problem. Saved for a rainy day. \n\nThis week I ran over a nail and the tire wasn't fixable so I had to get it replaced. Luckily I've got a spare! I called Monro early this morning to see if I could get in but they said it would be tomorrow at the earliest. I needed my car so I took it to pep boys (three hour turnaround - also the last time I needed an oil change they said they were booked for three days, good lord). \n\nI drop the car off at Pep Boys and tell them the extra tire is in the back. They call me up and tell me the tire is the wrong size. What? Monro gave me the wrong tires back when they replaced them in March. So I had to buy a new tire when I had a perfectly good one that is now god knows where. The tire was the wrong size and definitely didn't come from my car as it wouldn't have fit on the rim. \n\nAfter paying for the tire at Pep Boys I went over to Monro to see what they would do about it. They informed me that because I already had the new tire put on they couldn't do anything but the next time I came in they \"would work with me\". Why the hell would I come back when you just screwed me out of a hundred bucks and a good tire? Not worth chancing. Because you couldn't fit me in within a day I get screwed? \n\nIf you need tires go to Pep Boys on Milvalle. If you need an oil change go to Midas on Penn Circle they'll be able to get you in and not wait three days.
Ah Monro, where \"45 minutes\" is actually 2 hours and running at the time of this post. My car is on a lift with no tires and the employees are smoking cigarettes laughing. I can't even escape if I wanted to. At least they turned the heat off in the waiting room. Not like it's November in Pittsburgh or anything...
I wish we had a way to hold this corporation accountable for its crimes against our society.
Please go to the other McDonalds (not too far from here at 120 Penn Cir W).\n\nOne time while using their drive-thru service, we realized they forgot to add an item on our receipt. We asked how much the real total is and the employee told me, \"like $5.00.\" WHAT!?!!?!!  CAN YOU PLEASE USE YOUR REGISTER TO TELL ME HOW MUCH THE ACTUAL TOTAL IS!
Prepare to be wowed. \n\nHigh class dining in one of pittsburgh's up and coming hip neighborhoods. I thought I would try some of the world famous cuisine so I pulled up on a Thursday evening. \"Gar\u00e7on\" I asked, \"may I try some of your french fried potatoes?\" I was greeted with a crackled mutter as I inched my vehicle forward. I was then treated to a relaxing 15 minute wait as nobody moved in line. Perhaps it was the clientele, a 1992 minivan filled with some savvy locals. Perhaps it was the professional waitstaff, whom I could hear laughing and socializing through my window. Whatever it was, the dining experience was filled with culinary magic and spa-like service. After some deep meditation, I realized that perhaps tonight was not the best night to sample such fine delicacies so I pulled away. I cannot wait to return to this location and try my luck at trying these elusive fries. I highly recommend this palace of excellence.
I would rather drive out of my way to another Home Depot than give this location my business. \n\nEmployees are unhelpful and the most of them are too busy talking to each other and complaining about their jobs to notice you're standing there in front of them. Strike that... I'm certain they notice, they just don't care.\n\nI'm a pretty understanding person, but when this sort of thing happens more than once on the same visit, it's time to go. There are plenty of HD's around, seek them out and skip this one (especially if you're going to have questions)!
What has happened to the East Liberty Home Depot?  It used to be my \"go-to\" place for everything DIY, but no longer.  \n\nI stopped by yesterday to pick up about nine items, all of them basic home improvement supplies: cabinet handles, tension rods, quarter round molding, etc.  I came away with NONE of it.  Everything we wanted was OUT OF STOCK!  When I asked if I could order it and have it delivered to the store (to save the shipping costs) I was told that the items I wanted were not \"qualified\" for delivery to the store.  \"When will the items be restocked?\"  \"Don't know.\"  \"Would it be possible to get the items delivered from another store in the region?\"  \"No, that 'messes with' our inventory controls.\"  Oh, but I was told I could haul my sorry butt out to Monroeville where the stock of everything I wanted was plentiful.  Really? \n\nThe staff I dealt with could not have cared less about helping me.  Maybe because it was a holiday (New Year's Eve).  Dunno.  Don't care.  Customer service should not ebb and flow based on the day/date.  \n\nThe East Liberty HD used to have shelves full of product and plenty of choices.  And the staff was helpful and eager to engage with customers.  No longer.  It appears that the company has given up on the location and is letting it die a slow and painful (for its customers) death.  \n\nVERY disappointing to me.
Waiting 20 minutes to get one piece of wood cut in an empty store on a Friday afternoon.  Priceless!
This is the greasiest pizza I've ever had in Pittsburgh, I couldn't eat it.
Provolone sticks arrived undercooked, cheese was fully solid, they tasted okay. The pizza also arrived undercooked, the dough itself was partially uncooked in the middle. I had to put it back into my own oven to finish it off, and then it was greasy and just okay.
When my boyfriend and I were down with the flu, we ordered some food here through Eat24. I got a chicken noodle soup and he got the seafood calzone. When I unpacked the food and tried a sip of my soup, I found that it was cold and had bubbles in it, as if there was soap in it. I couldn't really taste anything, but my boyfriend said it smelled like dishwater. To say the least, I was disappointed in my soup. When my boyfriend cut into his calzone, he said the cheese was barely melted. We thought it was undercooked and touched the outside. It was cold, as if it was sitting out in the open for a long time. He tried to take a bite, but the dough was barely even cooked and the contents of the seafood calzone was cold and tasted sour.\nThis was our first time ordering from here and it was such a sad experience to have, since our food was inedible. I heard this place was good and had great calzones and tasty soup, but what we received was the complete opposite from the praise I've heard about this place.
I was all set to want to give this place 3 stars simply because another laundry place put me in a bind and this place was open 24 hrs.  I thought the late hours alone should give it a star. Then I had this experience\n\n--Poor ventilation I could barely breath its cramped and small with dryers and washers lining two narrow corridors. \n\n---- misleading advertising it boasts \"high capacity\" washers an says its air conditioned, well the air conditioners and vents in the ceiling both were dripping in black dust and look like they were installed in 1963. which might have been why I felt an instant asthma attack coming on. \n\nThen the high capacity washers were all of 2.... not great enough to meet demand as it turns out one girl took up both of them while I was waiting. Then another woman waited for hers to wash and took up two again this was at 1030-11:00  pm at night so I can only Imagine what its like to try and get one at other hours. \n\nThen there was this guy I guess he was an attendant or the owner, he was wiping down the machines and dryers. I was moving my clothes out of the dryer and I had put my bras hangers and a few shirts on top of my washer. I was literally loading right in the same area and was heading back to grab my things when he touched them!!\n\nUgh laundry violation ya don't touch someone's wet clothes it feels like that time in college when someone would mess with you and dump your clothes behind the washers if you didn't move them out quickly enough. Sooo that pissed me off...... but I have to get the job done so I load up my clothes. \n\nI come back in to check on drying clothes.... and what do I find but my dryer mysteriously switched from high heat to low heat. Now I am forced to put in another quarter to finish my load. All in all I spent 8$ at the econowash for 2 large loads I wasn't able to do my third load in the washers he had for under that. I can do that much at Laundry Factory around the corner though. So I will be going there. I don't need a creepy dude changing my dryer settings and touching my stuff.
Food poisoning a la Tomato Bisque Soup.\n\nForever skeptical.\n\nThat's too bad, I don't mind paying extra for better produce or better brands. But, I KIND OF mind getting extremely sick, so sick that anything I ever would vouch for goes down the toilet, with my vomit.
everything is a cluster.  the store.  the parking lot.  the people -- customers included.  full-on cluster. barely any parking for a massive, heavily polluting pick up truck.\n\ninside: avocados are the price of gold, and there are no goddamn vegan taco spices at a place that's supposed to be so fancy.  \n\nmeh.  go to market district where they keep it real.  real classy!!!
the parking lot @ this wholefoods is an ABOMINATION!  to compound the issue, whole foods allows their purveyors to park on centre ave (a road that is already miserable enough to drive on) and block traffic. this past monday, a shearer potato chip truck was blocking the right lane. doesn't whole foods have a loading dock? i wrote an email to the district president and he had one of his store minions respond: \"you can park @ walgreens\". sorry, i am shopping @ wholefoods NOT walgreens. translation: whole foods developers were TOO CHEAP to buy the proper amount of real estate. dont even bother coming here fri-sun unless you like a clusterF*** lot full of zombies. this is the 5th WF i have shopped @ (4 in florida) wholefoods should have opened in the south hills. the demographics out there would support it. this wholefoods is BUSH LEAGUE!
I have tried Whole Foods recently even after hearing about the attitude of the butthole, hipster employees and presumptuous, anti-bourgeois customers that will literally push you aside a turn their noses up at you a million times. The rumors were true!!! \n\nEven though I was only there one time, first impressions are a bitch! The selection is great! I can't afford any of it, but it's great! I have never seen such expensive rice! Here is the bro-down...\n\nThe food: Plentiful and too expensive to even think of buying. The freshest fish that isn't in the Strip...but you need to take a second mortgage to buy fish for a family. I bought sushi rice, a piece of fish and a salad, my bill: $25! The salad with lettuce, carrots, chick peas, onions and about 5 pieces of chicken was $11+\n\nThe employees: Hipsters with thick-rimmed glasses, tattoos and facial piercings that slack like I have never seen \"workers\" slack before. In fact there was a sign above some fresh fish stating \"We will prepare you fish any way you want, just ask\" HA...HA! When I asked to have a tiny fish to be filleted (something that would take me about 10 seconds at home) I was scoffed at by the so called fish monger who was obviously not a trained fish monger, but got his job because of his Progressive music of the soviet era bachelors degree . It took him the better part of 20 minutes to fillet a f-ing fish! All I got was a chopped up piece of crap that was useless. And scoffing is what these people are good at. Pushing your cart down the aisles is like running a scoffing gauntlet. Staff huff and puff when you get in their way?! The cashiers just stand and talk to each other or run to get organic iced tea to drink WHILE they ring you up...they don't even do that at Giant Eagle!\n\nThe other customers: This one is a peach! If you're not pulling in a good $60K a year you are dirt to these people. I was at the salad bar (it is a good salad bar, but expensive) an older woman in a mink coat bumped, no, pushed into me then stared at me and turned her nose up at me, can you believe it? She actually turned her nose up at me! Others in the aisles will grunt like cantankerous old people if they can't get through. They push ahead in line, give you dirty looks, and act like it's a class struggle...it kind of is!\n\nSo unless you have a lot (i mean A LOT) of disposable income, have never needed to use coupons, drive a $50K car (parking is terrible there), are the president of the United States, CEO of Microsoft, a widow whose wardrobe is more extensive than the explanation of the formula explaining an event horizon or a hipster who looks poor, but lives off daddy and mommy (though they'll never admit it) you shouldn't and really won't be able to afford this place...but why would you want to?\n\nI'll stick with Trader Joe's for my alternative market, thank you! I prefer employees with edges that are a little rough to ones with pants so tight, I can see their junk.
I always thought 1-star reviews on Yelp were written by bitter, resentful people who had nothing better to do than just complain. But now I feel their pain. It really doesn't hit you, until it... hits you.\n\nYou pay a premium at WF, you expect a premium, right? Well parking is part of the shopping experience. It's why they have parking lots in the first place. But never mind the atrocious parking lot and not being able to easily maneuver in it.\n\nI'm talking about being TOWED. Towed, not for leaving the parking lot, but for legitimately shopping at WF. Yes, this could happen to you too.\n\nUpon contacting the towing company, they demanded $135 (cash only) to return my vehicle. Upon contacting WF (since I was a legitimate shopper there and didn't leave the lot) they just shrugged their shoulders and just told me the name of the company that managed the lot.\n\nAnd that's it?! $135 is no chump change, but it seems like WF wants me to carry an extra $135 every time I frequent them (thankfully, never, since I don't live in Pittsburgh). This whole parking/towing situation is extremely shady, but the only company I'm going to point my finger at is Whole Foods for doing business with such a shady complex and passing the burden on to its customers.\n\nTip: Bring an extra $135 to pay for parking, or just go to Trader Joe's/Giant Eagle for a better parking/shopping experience.
I loved it, parking and all, after all, they had Palak Paneer! Mmmmm. It was tasty. I spent a lot, but I was ok with the occasional splurge. the second trip, i again bought my hit foods Palak Paneer and it had obviously gone over. \n\nEver have whoopsies after green Indian cuisine?\n\nIt's off my list now. Forever.
If I could give them zero stars, I would. Awful! My car wouldn't start so I called the tow and he managed to get it started, but it's been acting up so I brought it in anyways. After having my car for an entire week and not calling me once, after I've called twice, the man on the phone told me it was ready to pick up, nothing wrong with it. When I went to pick it up, I turned it on and before I could even leave the lot, it died! I went back in and told him that the tow truck operator hooked it up to a jumper box and pumped the gas to start it. That's what he did. Then told me it probably didn't start because it was sitting so long. Then he told me \"I don't know anything about your car\"! I left and sure enough had trouble getting it started at my next destination, had to pump the gas pedal. Yeah, that sounds like \"nothing's wrong\". DO NOT BRING YOUR CAR HERE. THEY ADMITTEDLY KNOW NOTHING ABOUT CARS!
I really feel bad about giving a one-star review.  First, it's not about the service, price, decor, or the food.  I'm writing this review after going there twice.  The first time my husband and I went, the dinner was good.  We thought this place has the potential to be our go-to Chinese restaurant in Pgh.  Today I remembered that they have an early-bird special 3-6pm (m-sat).  The won ton soup was not authentic (more like chicken noodle soup) but wasn't bad.  The entree was fine.  \n\nWhat really knocked the score down to 1 is the awful tobacco/cigarette smell from the tea!! ? !!   I had to go to the grocery store and buy a pack of gum.  The smell wouldn't leave me so I came home to rinse my mouth with Listerine (2-3 minutes) then brush (as long as I could) to get rid of the smell.  Did they use the tea pot as an ash tray?  \n\n[first visit: 3 stars] + [second visit: -5 stars] = [ -2 stars]
Closed.  Signage down.  Boarded up tight.  Phone disconnected.
For our last lunch in Pittsburgh we decided to return to the Big Burrito Group; Eleven was quite good and both Gayot and Pittsburgh Magazine compared the experience at Casbah favorably to that of Big Burrito's crown jewel.  Citing a mix of Mediterranean and Northern African influences with a bargain Piccola Gusto Menu for lunch and the option for indoor or al fresco dining it seemed as if Casbah was a can't miss option...well, sometimes things don't turn out quite as you expect - almost everything that transpired from the moment we arrived until the moment we left was a failure.\n\nWhen our server, a young woman named Amanda L who would prove quite inept and inefficient from start to finish, finally did arrive our menus were delivered with a brief hello before she wandered away - another server later stopped by to fill our water and drinks were never even offered.  When Amanda finally did return she was capable of answering a couple questions about portion size and our orders were placed.  With my mom and sister opting for the two-course Gusto lunch and myself choosing two courses a la carte we sat and sipped our water.\n\nWaiting approximately 10 minutes another ancillary server arrived with bread and butter - a light and airy white bread with a hefty crust paired with a sweet and salted cow's milk butter - decent, but nothing to write home about compared to the myriad bread options at Eleven.  After this point we would not see another staff member for 30 minutes...well, we would see them, they just wouldn't be walking anywhere near our table - instead bussing tables and running around while the hostess flirted with a man at the bar...I'll note that my water glass remained empty for greater than 15 minutes.\n\nFinished with our first courses approximately 10 minutes would pass - long enough for me to actively collect each and every plate and stack them at the empty seat of our four-top - before Amanda would finally return to collect the dirty plates...we'd not see her again until 15 minutes later when she filled our water glasses and told us our main courses would be \"right out.\"  While I guess she didn't define \"right out,\" what this actually meant was \"in 25 minutes.\"  Starting first with my mother's combo - Jumbo Lump Crab, pepper bacon, avocado, radish sprouts, on a paesano bun and Orecchiette Pasta with grilled chicken, dried cranberries, Riverview Farms goat cheese, sage cream. While the sandwich may not be memorable, the pasta was actually quite impressive.  Using a less salty cheese and mild cream to flavor the al dente little ears of pasta worked wonders while the sweet/savory m\u00e9lange of craisins and grilled chicken were a nice match.\n\nVastly less well done than my mother's plate would be my sister's option - the Grilled Vegetables, portobello, zucchini, eggplant, arugula, chickpea hummus, on baguette and Maccheretto pasta with wild mushrooms, white beans, sun-dried tomatoes, rapini pesto, fontina, walnuts.  Beginning with the sandwich, the bite I had was good in taste but rather mushy in consistency - too many similar vegetable textures and the hummus spread too thickly.  Moving on to the pasta - we all tasted it, but I'm still not sure what we were supposed to be tasting - it tasted like watery cheese...no spice, no salt, and certainly nothing resembling pesto or tomatoes.  For the first time in the meal Amanda actually opted to check on us approximately 10 minutes into our main courses and when told of the watery pasta she did apologize and offered to replace it with something else - more Orcchiette.\n\nFor my main course I received a simple side salad-fresh greens, crispy onion strings, and a pleasant vinaigrette.  The salad, of course, was served alongside Elysian Fields Lamb \"Mac and Cheese\", tubetti pasta, mascarpone, cheddar, Pecorino-Romano, and bread crumbs.  Piping hot and browned with crispy bread crumbs the dish was a decent Macaroni and Cheese, but honestly the lamb was so scarce and thinly cut that it added little.\n\nCompleting our mains approximately 110 minutes after entering Casbah we again waited nearly ten minutes before anyone would stop by to collect dirty plates-a different ancillary server this time.  With my mother and sister already deciding enough was enough they stood up to use the restroom before leaving-by the time Amanda would stop by to ask if anyone would care for dessert our two course meal had lasted 2:05 and I skipped on a menu entailing bread pudding, carrot cake, and panna cotta with \"just the bill.\"\n\nSettling the bill via credit card no tip was left because no tip was deserved - in reality Amanda may have actually be the worst server I've encountered at a fine dining establishment in the last 2 years.  I will note that when I wrote to Big Burrito was met by a (seemingly) sincere apology without excuses - the Manager stated things don't' normally happen like that and he'd be sure the issue was addressed.  He closed with \"I hope you will join us again.\" I will not.
Not a good vegan experience.  We were meeting friends at Casbah for dinner -their choice.  Since I follow a version of vegan, I called ahead and was assured that they had vegan versions of a couple of pasta dishes.  Server was very cooperative and said she would instruct the kitchen to omit the meat and  increase the veggies on their cavatelli.   Well, they omitted the meat, but I was left with one of the smallest servings of pasta that I have ever seen.  At about $20, it was close to the price of caviar!
Three strikes and you're out!  We had brunch there a few months back, and the meal was so salty that we could barely begin to eat it.  That meal was comped and I figured it was an off day.  We went back about a month later for dinner, and that meal was also very salty and we could not finish it.  We were willing to try again, so we went for dinner tonight.  I ordered the filet, and it was like eating a salt shaker.  I was shocked that, for a third time, I had a piss poor meal at Casbah.  I sent that back, and ordered the sea bass.  When I got to the end of the piece of fish, it was raw.  Needless to say, I will NEVER return to this restaurant.  Looking back, what should I have expected from the sister restaurant of Mad Mex?
I must be a glutton for punishment, because I keep finding myself hungrily returning to the Quiet Storm. The menu has slightly changed, and they are no longer cash only... This time it was the \"8th Ward\" that inflicted extreme disappointment. Not sure what 8th Ward is supposed to mean, but I will forever associate it with a dry boring place. And I thought we were getting a party platter! This appetizer sampler included THE WORST hummus evaar; I am near positive that they forgot to add garlic, lemon, salt and tahini to this chickpea paste that which was described as \"garlicky\" on the menu. Sooo wrong. \"The Butter,\" another WTF of a name, was also very dry and bland. The salsa was good! And there were plenty of dipping accessories, too many really, given the smallness of the unappetizing dip portions.\n\nAt this point, I've tried most of the vegan options QS has to offer and the only luck I've had has been with the B.Y.O.B. Go figure. \n\nI wouldn't care so much about how much of a tease this place is if I didn't REALLY desire a comfortable neighborhood place to eat comfortable food with a comfortable view of a cute waitress who writes fiction. And it frustrates me that few others seem to recognize the culinary (I shutter at even calling it that) mediocrity of \"the best\" vegetarian restaurant Pittsburgh has to offer.
Well, I think Heidi S. pretty much covered all of the bases here. The lemon-ginger tea that I ordered was weak, perhaps not steeped hot enough? The hummus, wow, definitely the worst; tasted like paste. Yuck with a capital whY. I considered giving two stars because the service and atmosphere were pleasant, but since I do not plan to return, I guess methinks not.
I'm a vegetarian and have lived behind the restaurant for over 3 years. Every time I have ever gone, the service is awful. It's as if they're doing you a favor by waiting on you. I think their breakfasts are pretty good and their lentil loaf is good but usually your sides consist of yellow nacho chips with brown jalopeno slaw. Also, the cooks look like they are lacking hygeine. the one great thing about this place is their coffee, and that's it.
Yes, it is reasonably priced.  Yes, my food was tasty (6 on a scale of 1-10).  However, the place did not look clean to me--I won't be back because of that.
Ugh... I got a plate with seisage, tofu scramble, and sundried tomato toast. My whole plate was entirely dry, chewy, and unpalatable. I had high hopes for the tofu scramble, especially after seeing positive reviews about it. But honestly... It tasted like nothing. I thought it'd be moister with a creamy consistency that might come from silken tofu, but it was hard, dry, and chewy. Hubby got a country burrito that was much better in comparison to my plate... But that might have been due to the fact that his whole plate was doused in gravy. Anything will taste better drenched in gravy. We think the gravy tastes like the powdered packet kind where you just add water. On top of all this service wasn't the greatest. I had to fish around for my own ketchup and they didn't even bother to ask me what kind of toast (3 options on the menu)I wanted when I ordered the toast option for my meal. Then they didn't bother to ask hubby if he wanted anything to drink after he had picked one of the $12 entrees that come with coffee or juice. We had to tell someone else to get it for us. Also they don't really wash their cups. There are 2 sink basins at the front where they just dunk the cups in one soapy basin then dunk the cups in a second water basin and then stack them next to the sink. It made me not want to drink my water even though I was thirsty. Good idea, but poorly executed food. I've had good vegan and vegetarian food before that's consisted of a lot of fresh greens, avocados, and more. For a vegetarian place, there was nothing green on our plates. This experience sadly fell enormously short of our expectations... Could've eaten at kaya or meat and potatoes for the same price.
Worst tofu scramble ever. Days old, cold, hard, inedible.  Sent it back and had no time to wait for another dish. I can't even believe that the server, let alone the  \"chef\" thought it appropriate to serve. \n\nBrought my 2 year old along, had to get a high chair, I'm able to do this just would have been nice if asked by server if we needed one.
I was pretty disappointed with this place. I thought from the good reviews that the pizza would taste okay. I went here around 12am on a Friday so maybe their ingredients weren't as fresh. I ordered a medium veggie pizza with a side of fries. The fries were super soggy and the pizza was pretty flavorless. There are only about 2 seats inside so you pretty much have to take it to go which was fine with me. \n\nThe people working there are really nice though which is a plus. Overall, i wouldn't go back.
They have inaccurate hours posted. I tried to order at 11:30 pm when yelp says they close at 2am and they were already closed. When I told them they have inaccurate hours posted the guy on the phone said \"oh that's ok....\" And hung up on me. I will never be ordering from them again, which is a shame since they are so close to me. I immediately called Pizza Parma which gladly delivered to me. I recommend ordering from Pizza Parma since they have similar menu items, they post accurate hours, and they don't hang up on you! Seriously? Why answer the phone?
The vet met with us for a very short amount of time. She was rushed, seemed distracted, and was abrupt. She very quickly said that it seemed like SCC, or oral cancer, and that there was no cure and the prognosis wasn't good. She left the room seconds after and only came back in to say that they would get blood work and schedule a biopsy. After she said she thought it was SCC, she didn't give us a chance to ask questions or respond. \n\nThe technician didn't have any demeanor with our cat, nor with us as clients. She seemed tired, and overworked.\n\nAll in all, this was a negative experience. I recommend that you take your pets to another vet :(
The blonde woman who tuns the gym was extremely rude to us. First time we went she refused yo.get off the phone on a personal call to help us. Then she gave us the rules for the bouldering area in a rapid bored monotone. Compared to other climbing gyms I have gone to this gym is less safe (no gri-gris), unfriendly, and more expensive. Definitely not worth it. Worst customer service I've seen in a while.
Pros:\n- At least there's a climbing gym in this area\n- Walls get reset often\n\nCons:\n- I've been coming here a couple times a week for the past few months now, and I have felt like some of the walls really need some padding besides the not-so-great spring board they have. The walls are pretty high and the height + lack of mats retract me from climbing certain routes, which is really disappointing because it ruins my climbing experience. \n- I brought up the aforementioned lack of mats to the woman who works here, and she snapped at me: \"Mats are only supposed to be under walls that are sloped.\" I told her the wall I was talking about was sloped, and she replied curtly \"If you don't feel comfortable climbing those walls without a mat, then you shouldn't even be climbing them.\" I was in shock. Is this a way you should be addressing your climbers' legitimate concerns? Even if it isn't possible to have mats, she could have at least told me in a nicer way instead of talking to me as if I knew nothing. \n- The gym closes at 11PM on Fridays. I usually go at night until they close, but the staff passive aggressively starts turning off the gym lights around 10:50PM. I get it, it's a Friday night and you want to get outta here. But the business hours are until 11PM, so let me enjoy my last ten minutes of climbing because I am paying for my climbing membership and I want to get as much climbing as I can get out of my sessions at the gym. \n- The holds are old and covered in rubber from the shoes. It would be nice if they could at least pressure wash them every once in a while. \n- The fees are unreasonable for the customer experience we get here.
I was home for the holidays and wanted to take some friends of mine climbing.  They've never belayed and don't have equipment so my hope was that we could go, I could test out of the belay class and we could top rope some easy climbs.\n\nDreams crushed.  Only people that are belay certified can even be in the top rope room.  I would've had to pay $5 to test out of the certification and even if my friends wanted to take a quick lesson on how to belay, its only at very specific times and you need to give advanced notice.\n\nSo we bouldered.  The walls are old, made of smooth plywood and though the walls are a good variety, you eventually end up right on top of one another.  You can only top out on one tiny section, everything else backs right up to another wall or and abyss.  With someone who isn't super comfortable down climbing or jumping from the top, I wasn't always super excited to fall when there wasn't a nice big cushion.  Those were only on the overhanging walls.\n\nThe place was super busy on a Sunday afternoon and group after group rolled in.  I understood why there were so many VB and VB+ routes (easier than V0's).\n\nSide note: cubbies are completely separate from the bouldering area and no food or drinks are allowed inside the bouldering area.  Therefore your water stays in your cubby, plan carefully.\n\nI expected better from Pittsburgh and heard that there is a new gym coming, so I'll be waiting for that one before I try to climb again in da burgh.
Don't go. I got more problems and sounds on my car after I spent $800 there. unbelievable!
This place is looking to make money and rip you off.  The door of my car had a dent in it for over three years when I took it here for my annual inspection.  Never before did anywhere else have a problem with it, but this place said they would not pass it.  Weird how it passed inspection 3 times already with no other place mentioning the door being a problem.  Never giving this place any business again, I went to a different Meineke in Homestead where they are helpful and work with you.
I've eaten here once after having it suggested by numerous people, I was totally disappointed with the service, food, and the place itself, I will not be headed back......ever\nSave your money, or starve either would be a better option
This was the first time for me and my wife at the celebrated Cafe Zinho. Parking in the residential area in which the restaurant is located is next to impossible on a busy Saturday night; the diner should be prepared to walk a distance to get to the restaurant from where he or she is ultimately able to park.  The greatest drawback is that the restaurant is tiny and the seating so tight that at our table, it was necessary to sit uncomfortably in order to avoid being bumped by anyone that walked by, which happened repeatedly as we were in a busy thoroughfare of food delivery.  No other table offered a much better situation and all others were occupied at the busy time we arrived, 6:45 p. m. The online menu boasts of a daily vegetarian and vegan special entree, but there was no such entree on this night.  There was only one non-meat item on the small menu, ravioli.  Our gracious server, Ramon, said that the kitchen could prepare a couscous and vegetable dish if the vegetarian in our party wanted it, and that was what we did.  The restaurant permits customers to bring their own alcoholic beverages, a nice convenience and savings for the diner.  A small portion of bread was served with a tiny amount of rock-hard butter.  My mushroom and cheese soup was a large portion, served piping hot, which was great, but it was a puree with no distinct mushroom pieces.  I would not have been able to distinguish it as mushroom soup.  All of our entrees were attractively presented and were tasty, average size portions.  All were served with a small amount of good, fresh vegetables. It would be helpful if the menu offered some description of the following entree so that the diner with an interest in a chicken dish would not have to inquire about it of the server:  \"chicken maputo\nRoasted w/ piri piri & chocolate scented sauce\".  Does the average diner know what \"maputo\" and \"piri piri\" are? The lemon tart dessert was a small piece not suitable for sharing, served with two minute pieces of strawberries and a small dollop of whipped cream.  It was not flavorful or moist nor worth the calories.  The gracious owner, Tony Pais, stopped at our table for a moment to greet us, a nice touch, and there were quality checks by a manager and Ramon.  I noticed a number of prominent people from the community dining here, individuals whom I was surprised were willing to spend a good deal of money to be packed into a sardine can of a restaurant.  Apparently they consider this to be the only restaurant in town.  The rest rooms are small, one-person facilities, naturally. An unfortunate surprise occurred when the individual that was picking up the check for my party presented his credit card only to be told that the restaurant accepts only cash and checks, this for a tariff of $148 plus gratuity.  It is supposed to be of some consolation that there is an Automatic Teller Machine on site.  I imagine less than 1% of expensive restaurants today are cash only.  Cafe Zinho is a highly flawed restaurant, demonstrating that there is more to a fine dining experience than simply offering fine cuisine.  If one is able to get beyond the feeling one has when visiting the rest room on a commercial airliner, the diner might enjoy it: not us.\n\nI posted comments about the restaurant at its Facebook page, in which I noted my displeasure with being cramped and uncomfortable, and about the restaurant being unique in its unwillingness to accept credit cards for a $148 check.  An individual identifying himself as the manager, who apparently had never received constructive criticism from anyone, initially demonstrated rage, posting a message that I can go to the Oiive Garden the next time I dine out.  He later added with similar condescension that I can use a coupon and a credit card at The Olive Garden.  Later, he thought better of his outburst and removed the comments...along with mine.  He ultimately offered me and my wife the opportunity to return to the restaurant at his expense.  I thanked him for the offer, but told him that one experience at Cafe Zinho was enough.  I had no intention of returning even if he had responded to my comments like a gentleman.
My partner and I were visiting my family in Pittsburgh we live in San Diego. my partner was born and raised in Portugal. My mom heard about this resaurant and was excited to take my partner and I to a Portuguese restaurant in Pittsburgh. We went, looked at the menu and did not find anything Portuguese on the menu. Why does this restaurant promote itself as Portuguese, fly the Portuguese flag and not have ANY Portuguese dishes. We left.
These people could not care less.\n\n I am still waiting for my washer dryer to get fixed -its been almost a month now and I am being told that they don't even know when the technician will return. The technician has been here 4 times already. Each time there is supposedly something else wrong and so they have to order another part. Miraculously the part is wrong (first week), They forgot to order the second part (2nd week), Part comes in but they need a suppossed other part and it will be \"another 3-5 days\"(3rd week), Fourth week rolls by and they \"don't know\" when its coming in (thats up to the distributor). When I ask for an ETA (because I am wearing dirty clothes, and I am sick of technicians coming back 5 times and I already took off a week of work to meet these people) the cus.t service rep gets mad at me and offers me a refund. (The washer is on warranty) They obviously don't want to deal with any problems they created. So now I have to call the distributor to see when the part is coming in (yup,  thats YOUR job Appliance Service Center!).
Sadly, the professionalism of the front desk never got better.  Despite Emilio's assurances that changes were being made, my latest visit proved otherwise.  I called ahead and was assured that Marshall was on time...in fact, he didn't have an appointment ahead of mine and could take me as soon as I got there.  I was there a few minutes before my appointment.  I waited.  And waited.  Fifteen minutes later, I asked if Marshall knew I was waiting.  I was told by the brunette that they had been busy.  Odd, she, the blonde and two other employees had been standing there talking for a while.  She went back to notify Marshall.  When Marshall came up front to get me, the brunette admonished him that he should keep an eye out for his clients - she shouldn't have to notify him that his appointment is there.  Wow.  And the purpose of a receptionist is....what?  I'm done.  I'm out.  Apparently nothing will help Izzazu's but getting rid of the front desk staff.  \n\nOn a positive note, it was another great cut.  Not good enough to lure me back, though.
I had an appointment that was made 2 months in advance and when I turned up they told me that the person I had the appointment with quit 6 weeks ago and they didn't have anyone available to take me. They made no attempt to reschedule me with someone else or call me to cancel. To make things worse, the battleax at the front desk had such an attitude. Here's a tip, when you are in the beauty salon business, staff the front desk with someone who looks like they have actually BEEN to a salon. Not with rude women that have hairdos from 20 years ago. Will never go back.
Emailed and called several times to get a pricing on having several services done at once as a graduation present to myself. I was put on hold twice and never picked back up. Emails went unanswered.  :(\n\nI was going to have SO MUCH done, too!! Hair cut, color with highlights, spa manicure/pedicure and an hour massage! All as a graduation present to myself but if they can't be attentive to prospective customers then I can't imagine that they'd be attentive in the store. I'll spend my money elsewhere!
A
Unbelievable experience! Literally unbelievable. I waited 50 minutes and finally walked out. Receptionists were beyond awful. I booked 3 style appointments in advance for a wedding. One person was taken right away, 20 minutes later the second person was taken.  I WAITED 50 MINUTES while being ignored by the receptionists.  I can celled because the others were almost done and we would be running late. My stylist finally came out and said he'd quickly do my hair. What !! I'm not paying $100 to get rushed service. We were looking forward to a relaxing, fun experience. More unbelievable, I waited 20 minutes to pay for the two services. One receptionist couldn't take transactions and another was occupied with a wedding party.  I was so close to walking out and not paying. Unfortunately the two stylists didn't get a tip through no fault of their own. I can't give an unbiased opinion of their work as I am still furious in the way I was treated.  I would expect some ambiance at $100 for shampoo & style. I could never recommend Izzazu. Denham & Company is on Market Square, their rates are reasonable and within walking distance of the Fairmont. I am calling the concierge tomorrow informing her of my experience.
Horrible - they use chicken that's been out uncover all day . And they smoke around the food.:(
The menu online gives no prices, and the entrees are ridiculously overpriced for what you get - a good meal, but far too much food, and nothing extraordinary. The entrees are $50 - $60. BE WARNED - if you want atmosphere to go with your $60 entree, you'd better REQUEST DOWNSTAIRS! Otherwise you can have your anniversary dinner in a small room in front of large televisions. Who knew? And the staff will definitely not accommodate your request for a more romantic spot - even if they know it is your tenth anniversary! Wow. Should have walked out.
No better in taste than a Fazoli or even an Olive Garden.  Inflated prices, like the cheapest entree was $40, try to disguise this place as something it is not.  Went with a group of co workers, so we pretty much got everything on the menu and not one thing stuck out really good.  Service is incredibly slow.  Not worth it at all.  Even if you tell yourself that atleast the portions are large, the food is just not good enough to warrant wasting a meal eating there.
The first time I went here was with a group - we had reserved the entire restaurant for a retirement party.   I had a horrible experience.  Vowed never to go back!  At that time, I even had a terrible interaction with the owner.\n\nThis time I was invited with a couple of girlfriends because they love it. Decided to try again since it was more about the \"get together\" than the food/location.\n\nThis time, overpriced food and bad service.  Overall, it was not anything out of the ordinary and not worth the price.   I had the veal speciality.   Large portion, but ok.  Staff was not very attentive for the small amount of customers present.\n\nI am a Pittsburgh native.  This is a bad neighborhood. \n\nI am NOT interested in ever going back!
Yesterday I had the misfortune of getting a pizza from Bishops. It was my first time getting a pizza from there in a long time. Needless to say. I won't be getting one again. I got a pepperoni and sausage pizza. The pizza was bland , tasteless. Crust tasted like frozen pizza crust. The sauce was meh. Cheese was okay. Sausage was disgusting. Bishops used to use a delicious hot sausage. I don't know what this sausage was other then disgusting. I don't recommend getting a pizza from Bishops
The customer service is absolutely horrible. They made me wait an hour before anybody got to me, and there were 3 available beauticians in the back. I complained and got waited on right away. I thought the customer always came first. Why would they want to risk a customer not coming back. I mean I can just go down the road to Borics. These women are old middle aged miserable employees with no passion for their jobs. I won't be back. DISAPPOINTED...:(
I'm in the market for a fun little scooter to have fun and commute on, and at the suggestion of a friend, I went to Bohn Cycle Shop to check out what they had in the shop. Immediately upon walking in, it took 15 minutes for someone to ask if we were helped. When I mentioned that I wanted to learn more about a Zuma over in the corner, the dude at the desk was disinterested and unhelpful.\n\nWhen I tried to pay for the scooter and roll it out, an older woman stewed around and gave me annoyed looks for coming into the store and not calling ahead. When I tried to pay with a bank-issued check, I had to wait around for nearly 20 minutes before they told me that they have never seen a bank-issued check and sent me on my way.\n\nThe entire time I was there, it felt like they thought I just stole a bunch of money and were treating me like a crook. I am definitely not going back to complete the transaction. If I'm going to be buying an expensive piece of machinery, I really expect the service to at least be a little more enthusiastic.\n\nLike Nick T. said, I guess it's a good place if you wanna grab a used bike or know exactly what you want. If you're looking to broker a new bike, go to a bigger shop with salesmen that actually sound like they're living beings.
I am kind to all service workers! always! This place has the worst service I have ever seen. I do not expect four star treatment from fast food but this place is ridiculous. You better check your bag because they are going to forget something. Yesterday my husband went to get a quickie family fish dinner. He was told that no sorry we are out of hushpuppies and Pepsi. Okay thats fine but what can we have to replace the hushpuppies? He was told to go down the street there is a store. This is inside, not the drive thru. It seems that this is a common experience at this restaurant. I already sparingly frequent fast food establishments but this will definitely be the last attempt. And yes I have contacted the corp. I dont want anything from them though, they can keep it.
I developed my 120 film here the other day, and they charged me an extra 4 dollars a roll for no reason.  On the website they say $8 but they charged me $12.  The owner is very pretentious and rude.  When I told him that it says 8 dollars online he didn't care at all.  When I dropped my film off the high school kid didn't even tell me the price because \"it is too much for me to calculate\"  Also, the photo equipment, darkroom equipment and film are way over priced.  I am never going back to this place.  I strongly urge everyone to never enter or deal with Bernie's Photo.  Rather, use the websites of companies like B&H, Adorama, or Calumet.  The have MUCH better customer service and better prices.  Very disappointed that this is the only photo store in the city.
Went in to buy a cold shoe adapter in a pinch on my way to a shoot. He charged me $20 for the same exact item that sells for $6.29 at B&H. I bought it without thinking, as I was stressing on the way to a gig, but was furious when I thought about it in the car.\nUnfortunately, this is the only game in town. Makes me glad I live in New York City. You would think a store in a dying industry would thrive to provide better customer service, pretty much the only reason why I would go to a small store rather than a big one. They don't even offer that.
Just stopped in to see about selling my Canon Rebel T3 to buy a 60D (that they don't have in stock because it's \"old\"). I was offered $50 for my T3, that is currently being sold online for over $300. I asked why such a low price and was told that since it was an older model it wasn't worth as much. Needless to say, I walked out with my T3. Sucks that this is the ONLY camera shop in Pittsburgh.
Despite living in PIttsburgh for most of my life, I've somehow managed to never eat at Max's Allegheny Tavern until recently.  \n\nMy initial impression of the restaurant was positive - the place had an old neighborhood feel to it, a small crowd was drinking at the end of the antique hardwood bar, and the German murals on the walls made me crave an icy-cold German lager with a stout head of foam.  I thought about how well German potato salad would taste with that beer.  So I grabbed a seat at the bar and eagerly awaited the first taste of my beer.\n\nAnd I waited...and waited...and waited some more - for over 15 minutes before someone came around to take the order.  Actually that isn't quite accurate.  Two employees came around - one to the end of the bar, and one behind the bar directly opposite me.  Both of them stared at me.  Neither one greeted me or asked me what I would have like to order.  I stared back, incredulously, and even made a \"what's going on here\" palms-extended-upward-shoulder-shrug gesture.  Neither one took the hint.\n\nFinally a third employee came around the bar and took my order.  Great, I thought to myself, finally that beer.  She served the beer in a Mason jar.  WTF?!?  Who serves imported German lager at a German restaurant in a freaking Mason jar?  Max's does.  The beer was devoid of its head, likely the result of a bad beer pour and/or a less than perfectly clean glass (an endemic problem with Pittsburgh restaurants, in my observation).  I was sad.  I quaffed my beer quickly in an attempt to salve my irritation and opened the menu.\n\nMy first impression of the menu can be summed as follows: \"Uh-oh\".  The menu is huge with a number of \"slow-food\" stews and braises.  The restaurant is more than half-empty.  How can a restaurant prepare such a large number of menu items, including more than a few labor-intensive dishes, freshly every day and still stay in business when the place isn't even half-full?  Answer: They can't.  The food isn't fresh.\n\nI ordered the Wiener Schnitzel.  I love properly prepared Wiener Schnitzel.  Made with fresh butterflied veal breast, slightly pounded and seasoned, well-coated in fresh bread crumbs, and pan-fried in clarified butter until golden brown on the outside and juicy on the inside, Wiener Schnitzel is the ultimate comfort food.  \n\nSadly, Max's Wiener Schnitzel had nothing to do with properly prepared Schnitzel.  The veal was super-thin, had a texture that strongly suggested it had been mechanically processed, and tasted as if it was pre-breaded and frozen.  It wasn't pan fried either.  The breaded, frozen, puck was simply dropped into a fryolater - where the breading puffed out and fell off of the meat in places (which doesn't happen when the cutlet is resting against the cooking surface under its own weight as when the dish is properly pan-fried).  The edges of the sad Schnitzel had curled up and it looked a horrible mess on the plate.  Curly Schnitzel?!?  My stomach dropped.\n\nMy sides, German potato salad and braised red cabbage, were equally awful.  The German potato salad had an unnatural glossy sheen - the kind that typically comes from bottled sauces that contain high fructose corn syrup.  The \"bacon\" in the dressing was nothing more than tiny flecks of some sort of processed, possibly faux, \"meat\".  The potatoes were suspiciously uniform in thickness and roundness - exactly the homogeneity that is found in pre-peeled, pre-sliced, vacuum-sealed processed potatoes.  It was a gluey, sickly sweet, mess.  I didn't have more than a bite or two.  The braised red cabbage didn't taste fresh - it tasted like it had been sitting in a steam table for a day or two and my order was its last chance to be eaten.  \n\nMax's Allegheny Tavern bills itself on their web site as, \"The Best in German Fare.  The Best in Service\".\n\nThat's total bullshit.  It's awful - both for service and fare.\n\nIf you want good, authentic, German fare (in which the Schnitzel is properly pan-fried to order and delicious), join the Teutonia Mannerchor down the street.  \n\nI'll never return.
I must of been eating at another Max's in a pararell universe!\n\nFood was terriable, service was worse! Went and got Sushi!
My husband and I have been to this restaurant many times over the past 20 years and went for sandwiches tonight. Sorry to say it was the worst food we have ever eaten at this place. Reuben sandwich was greasy and had little meat. Sweet potato fries were not edible. We ate at a table at the bar and told Andy our bartender but got zero satisfaction. Since we've had such a bad experience and no effort by the restaurant to remedy a BAD MEAL, be warned!
I really wanted to like this place. Great reviews and a renovated priory--what a great idea! The pictures on the website are beautiful.\n\nWe found a grumpy old man at the front desk, and he could not have been less interested in our arrival. It felt like we were disturbing him to ask for our room key. But the fun started when we returned later in the evening. We found the rollaway we had requested (and paid for) not present, and I went back down to the old gentleman. He stared at me and then went back to pecking at his computer. I waited. Suddenly he looked up at me and started yelling, something to the effect that there wasn't anything that he could do, and that he would see if someone could do something but probably not. He also angrily admitted that the reservation did show the rollaway.\n\nI slunk away with my guest who had by now come down, too, embarrassed and insulted. It shouldn't be this way. If this is personalized service, I'd rather stay at a motel.\n\nEven without grumpy old man, there's nothing special about this place. The rooms were ok, but the bathrooms tiny (I guess they should be called showerrooms). Everything else was sub-par. The dining room breakfast was served in was tacky and the coffee awful. We did not dare try the free wine. The hotel is in a bad neighborhood.\n\nFor the money, find a special at the William Penn on the Omni Hotels website. If you want a boutique hotel, try the Inn on the Mexican War Streets--a beautiful building with friendly owners just across from the National Aviary and that beautiful park. The Priory does not feel boutique and is not worth the hassle.\n\nPriory, get grumpy old man out of a customer-facing role.
We stayed here and was initially disappointed-- being new to town, our first impression was that Pittsburgh was a very very bad town full of homeless and degenerates (the area, I find out later, is one of the worst spots in the city!).  The hotel is located across the street from a housing authority building.  Projects?  UGH.  Great.  \n\nThen we were put into a \"historical\" room that was similar to that of a rundown cheap apartment-- old shower stall, moldy threadbare carpeting, lumpy squeaky bed.  \n\nI find out an hour later (after freaking out about the lo-end aspect of this room) that they have new rooms that were just recently renovated.  I asked to see the room, and then ultimately change to that room-- for a fee, of course.  About 50% more expensive.  But I pay more because NO WAY would I be able to exist in this old \"historical\" creepy room.  \n\nFinally, a regular room-- the \"renovated\" room was similar to that of an acceptable hotel room.  Why even keep this historical, old, dingy, dirty room?  Do they figure unsuspecting people who don't know any better will just accept it b/c they have no other choice?? \n\nI slept well in the \"new\" renovated room, and would have been freaked out all night in the old room. What a difference. Actually, the bed and linens were very, very comfortable.  The bathroom was nice and clean.  The room was what I expected a hotel room to be... not high end four seasons, but not cheap and nasty either. \n\nThe hotel obviously had availabilities of the new, renovated rooms, so why put us in an old, unrenovated, ugly old apartment looking room? If they believed in upgrading, then they would have at least gotten repeat business!! For those who are going to book here, pay more for the new rooms, or go somewhere else.  The option of staying in the old room should not be an option at all.  \n\nI don't think I will ever go back here if I ever go back to Pittsburgh.  I will stay at a chain hotel-- marriot or whatever.  What is money except a means to be comfortable and live?  I will spend more next time.\n\nBreakfast was \"eh\".  It was free-- small stations of some fruit, cheese, small pastries, cereal, yougurt and two hot items:  sausage + bacon.  OJ, Cranberry, Milk and Coffee also available.  Honestly, I felt like I was in college, and watching my pennies (poor), staying here...
Was at a beautiful wedding.  Staff was terrible, unpleasant, and the two slobs at the front desk need to be in the back with their people skills.  Nice hotel but make sure you take some warm bodies with you because the \"people\" at the priory are cold, miserable and just plain miserable. I get better guest service at Holiday Inn
We decided to have a little staycation at the Priory earlier this month.  My husband made the reservation with a special they were having for a dinner date night.  With the special, they give you a few Pittsburgh restaurants to choose from and you get a $50 voucher to that restaurant.  When my husband called the Priory, they said they would make the reservations and call us back on the time.  We never got a call about the reservation time which was annoying.  But the main issue was we checked in, talked to the girl at the front desk about having the shuttle take us to this reservation at Meat and Potatoes, and she set us up with the shuttle.  We go in the room, look around for the $50 voucher, and it's not in the room so we assumed (i know we should never assume) that it was taken care of with Meat and Potatoes when they  made our reservation.  We had a fabulous dinner at M&P, great food, great service, and the bill comes.  We asked the server about this Priory $50 voucher and he had never heard about it so the manager comes over and says they didn't give them anything but to have them call and ask for him and he'll work it out.  We called the Priory and told them this, the girl who answered gave us an attitude and said you should have asked for it.  Then refused to call M&P to talk to the manager.  She just said to pay the full bill and we can work it out when we get back to the hotel.  We gave the manager our phone and he was yelled at as well about this.  He took our word that the Priory would deliver it to him the next day and he deducted the $50 from our bill.  It was embarrassing and it wasn't the issue with the money, just the service with the priory.  This showed us two things: We won't be going back to the Priory due to the lack of service and lack of respect and we WILL be going back to M&P because their service was impeccable.
I really don't know how this place got any good reviews. One big problem is that the place is dirty, the carpets, the lighting above the tables and the furniture. I have tried this place 5 times in the past 2 years and this is how it went. The 1st time I had a burger which tasted funny and I didn't finish it. I got food poisoning and was so sick. This I thought might have been a stomach flu so I did try this place again. The 2nd time I was with some friends from the neighborhood and 3/5 of us had the spaghetti and meatballs and we got food poisoning.Now I'm thinking that they have a hygiene problem with the ground meat. I was going to stay away from the place but a friend from Troy hill liked to stop there because it was close to her home. No problem,next time I got french fries with gravy. How could this be a problem?.When they got to the table they had put cold canned gravy on my fries.When I told the waitress about it she took it back to the kitchen and microwaved it till it was the heat of lava. Needless to say I refused to pay for them. The 4th time my friend dragged me there, I had a salad. I didn't get sick but it wasn't anything special with bagged salad mix and a couple of under ripe tomato pieces and cucumber. The last time I only got a slice of pie and this was good. I no longer have to go to Billy's, my dear friend has passed away and I refuse to go anywhere near the place. To the owner-Please sell the restaurant, you obviously don't care for the place or know how to handle food safely.
How to put this gently?\n\nWhile I may go back to Pittsburgh some day, I will never return to the Carnegie Museum of Art. \n\nIt's not that I mind that its gallery seemed small compared to others I have viewed (sometimes small museums have some hidden treasures) or that one whole gallery was blown glass and I felt like I was at a bong shop on haight st. in sf. \n\nIt comes down to the fact that a docent, while trying to explain a painting with a watchtower in it, told the students it was a watchtower \"from Auschwitz, a place where they basically fried a lot of Jews\".  Seriously? That's how she chose to describe concentration camps to a large class of what I could only guess were middle schoolers? It sounded like she described a bad breakfast joint...\"oh that place? they basically just fry eggs\".\n\nOn top of all that, the description of the piece stated the watchtower was reminiscent of those that were spread throughout East and West Germany during Hitler's rule (i.e. not those in Auschwitz).\n\nIn sum, docents are a reflection of the institution in which they volunteer, and this one sucked. So, Carnegie Museums of Pittsburgh, if you're going to hire racist people to lead your tours, at least make sure they have their facts straight (or can read).
In response to the response I received from the Museum rep, I called and left a message and never received a reply as of yet, but you reponded on Yelp. This week is the 3rd week. your response stated that my refund was sent this week, if you are speaking about this current week, today is the 14th, monday and the week has just begun. If you are talking about last week, can you please tell me what day since leaving messages do not gain a response except to be contacted here on Yelp. Thank you.
Estimated delivery time 45 minutes actually delivery time 120 minutes.\n\nPizza Hut , a pizza of last resort.
If I could give this restaurant a zero, I would. We were just asked by our waitress to leave because someone with a reservation was waiting for our table. My father and father-in-law were still finishing up their coffee and we had not yet finished our dessert! I've never been so humiliated. Do NOT go to this restaurant!\nTheir food was mediocre at best. If you want excellent Italian in a small intimate restaurant, go to Dish on the South Side. I will not be going back.
The best thing about this place is Sam. The worst thing about this place is also Sam.\n\nWhat was great was that Sam made me feel at home and treated me like someone he had known for a long time. He took me to the back of his warehouse, gave me a free beer to drink, and engaged me in plenty of conversation. At one point, though, he said, \"You look oriental, but you also look American.\" I'm pretty sure he wasn't meaning for it to be offensive, and I just discounted it as his being an old man who didn't know it was no longer politically correct to say things like that.\n\nThis is not why I recommend against Caruso's, however. The reason why I'll never go there again is because Sam knowingly sold me expired beer.\n\nI was on my way back from the North Side to the East End where I live and after seeing these good reviews, I decided to stop by. I wanted a case of Yuengling, but Sam said, \"Why don't you try this instead,\" and popped open a fresh bottle of Castello, an Italian beer. He had me drink it, all the while espousing its comparative taste to Yuengling at a cheaper price point. It certainly tasted alright, and a case of it was a couple dollars less than what Yuengling was going for.\n\nSince the Castello tasted fine, I ended up buying a case of it on Sam's recommendation. A few days later when I opened the box and drank a couple of the beers, however, I noticed that they tasted funny. That's when I looked at the label and saw how each of the bottles had its \"sell by\" date marked out in black Sharpie. You could see the numbers underneath the Sharpie, and the dates were for well over two years ago. So basically, Sam had convinced me to buy something he hadn't been able to sell, knowing that I lived in the East End and probably wasn't going to visit again anyway.\n\nStale beer aside, there's another big reason not to go to Caruso's: Their prices are steep--$24 for a case of Yuengling. While Sam might be a more charming character than the young folks at my neighborhood distributor Pistella's, at least I know that Pistella's has significantly lower prices and actually has enough customers and product turnover that they won't purposely sell me something that's not fresh.
Awful.  I didn't know how bad it was until I went to a different GE and saw how good it could be.  The lines are long, the produce selection is minimal, and the store is overcrowded.\n\nThe last straw was yesterday when the cashier blew her nose, stuck kleenex up her nose, then put it back in her pocket and continued to scan groceries.  When I complained to the manager, they denied any of their employees were sick.\n\nI'm done shopping at this store.
Scariest/shadiest grocery store experience in my life. Hubby and I pulled in only to see a few cars down, people selling who-knows-what out of their car trunk. Also this is the only Giant Eagle tht gives you a really hard time if you ever forget your advantage card and give your phone no instead (it works at the other ones just fine). Then we leave by waiting for a really dazed/swaying woman to finish wandering around back and forth in front of us, and pass by a drive-by fat cash exchange (drugs?) on our way out of the parking lot. We are definitely scared to return, and will never need grapes (or any other groceries) so desperately again.
The store reeks of rotting fish, the security guards watch you like a hawk and the food selection is the worse I've seen in any Giant Eagle in the city.\n\nOne plus if you must shop here there are plenty of jitney drivers waiting for you to come out to offer you a ride.  That can be a big help if you are like me and don't have a car. \"Need a car\" haha some things about living in the hood just never change. \n\nWith this being the closet G E to Downtown and PNC Park and Heinz field I would think they would renovate but it's been years and still no change.
Awful.  Worst grocery store I've ever been to.  To make it worse, they are supposed to open at 7.  At 7:10, I was told they were \"still getting ready to open\" and I should come back \"around 7:30\"
The store has a weird rotting meat smell sometimes. The selection isn't amazing but there are a few interesting items here. As other people commented there are always people hanging around outside.... But they are friendly at least to me! One thing I like about the store is the proximity to my house. The biggest let down is the sky high prices that I think GE is notorious for... I miss Kroger
Zero stars? Really terrible store. High prices, THE WORST PRODUCE EVER (And no, it isn't the lighting...) and rude employees. \nNever mind the people hanging out out front and in the parking lot, who cares. What I'm truly concerned about is the vast discrepancy between this store and very nearly all of the other Giant Eagle locations in the Pittsburgh area. One would assume that there would be some quality control within their chain of stores. Truly sad that the North Side has so few options at which to shop for reasonably priced, fresh food. \n\nAlso, enjoy getting followed around by the walleyed \"undercover\" employee. Looks like Lurch from the Addams Family. Good riddance.
So I got a call from Giant Eagle asking me to give my opinion of this store. My recommendation was to burn this place to the ground. Buckle up for crappy produce, rotten fish, old meat, and security guards that speck you be stealin! This is the Gh**to Eagle!
The problem with this dry cleaner is poor counter service.  I have never been treated in such a poor manner - and the sad part is that this SERVICE provider doesn't care.  I recommend going elsewhere.  They are not worth my money.
Our bartender didn't know what a pint was or how to pour a beer
STAY AWAY...\nWe've been 3 times over the past few years, each time we say \"let's try it again\" followed by \"wish we'd done something else\".\n\nReminds me of the movie line \"Run away, run very far away\"\n\nLast nite after Steelers/Jets was last straw. I hope the owner or general manager reads this. And think the health department should too.\n\nService is mediocre and slow. consistently. Waitress was ok in attitude.\n\nAfter our soup starter (good french onion soup) we waited and waited and waited and waited for our mains. Noticing us staring at her, waitress stopped by, went into kitchen, came back and said we were next. my watch said 8:31. Then her manager came by and argued with me and said we were next, then at 8:52pm the horrible food finally arrived. That's 21 minutes to be next. In that time we watched 4 tables turn from being seated to drinks to mains to check down while we waited for our main. \n\nManager embarrassed himself. Said they were busy and working our food and he had checked and would come soon. I told him about the 4 tables turning and he said no they didn't. then I said I used to manage restaurants and know what customer service and ticket times are and he challenged me and said no I didn;t and I had no idea what I was talking about. What an idiot! First rule of restaurant business is the customer is always right.\n\nThen the food arrived. How hard is it to do chicken marsala with mushrooms, seriously? It was two soggy fried chicken tenders from the deep fryer (not pan sauteed) over a bowl of bowtie pasta with shrooms and a sauce. While the sauce did have some marsala in it, it was full of sour cream and tasted like stroganoff and a little funny. The Penne ala vodka was sauteed canned tomatoes and no flavor. We were so hungry we ate most and left.\n\n1 hour later I was sick on the side of the road from the dinner and still feel really rough this morning.
My husband and I are Cubs fans and flew into Pittsburgh to see Friday and Saturday's Cubs-Pirates game this past weekend (7/7 & 8).  We got to PNC Park around 5 p.m. and since the gates weren't open we decided to sit and have some drinks before the game.  We stopped first at Atria's.  Although there was only one other table occupied outside, we were told if we weren't going to order food (just drink) we would have to give up our table if people, who were eating food needed it.  This was RIDICULOUS  to us so we left!  We were paying guests just like their other guests!!  Anyway we went a few businesses down and drank at Dominic's.  We went to Dominic's both nights and probably spent close to $100 AND did up getting FOOD.  Atria's better rethink how they treat guests....
Ugh, I hate this place.  People from work drag me here to lunch more often than I would like.  The food is overpriced.  The service is snotty and slow.  I can barely get free in under an hour-and-a-half.  The food is forgettable and the menu sparse.  They're terrible for pick-up too - even when you call way ahead, you're made to wait, and they're surly about taking care of you when you arrive for your food.  You can do better for lunch on the northshore pretty much anywhere.  Try SoHo or Finnegan's instead.
Here before Bucs VICTORY OVER THE CARDS in game 3 of the NLDS, a Sunday. Game at 4:30, got here at 2:30. Packed both inside and out. Can't comment on any other time but this really hectic one. \n\nOrdered Pepsi and brisket nachos. AWFUL. Soggy chips, some shredded beef drenched in sweet generic BBQ sauce, a blanket of cold congealed cheese spotted with jalape\u00f1o slices. Not a degree above room temp. \n\nWill give them 1 star for tasty Pepsi and keeping it filled.
ok, i don't want to judge all atria's by this one. in fact, i wouldn't even judge this atria's solely by this one experience. but let me tell you, i was highly disappointed.\ni will point out the good parts of the night first. we arrived to see a band play. the entertainment was great, didn't cost extra (although there was a $20 minimum per person), and i liked the set up in the room where they played. also, the soup i got (crab bisque) was delicious!\nok, now, for the rest of the experience. first of all, our service was AWFUL. i don't know our server's name, and i know some of the wait wasn't his fault, as there was a large party upstairs. but it took at least ten minutes to even order our drinks, another 15 before we even got them. ten more minutes before we could order our food, and after the meal, we must have waited at least 15 if not 20 minutes for our check before one of the members in our party finally had to go up to our waiter and complain. i saw him checking on other tables, and it didn't seem like he had many tables to keep him so busy. as a server, myself, i always give my servers the benefit of the doubt, but it really got to be too much. the one thing i will say for him though, was that he was very nice. but for how much we waited, we should have had something comped or at least got some sort of apology BEFORE we had to complain.\nthe rest of the food and drinks were okay. good, but not enough to make up for the service. i had the berry mojito to drink and the greek salad to eat.\ni'd try another atria's before i'd go back to this one. but now i'm weary of the restaurant all together.
I came here on the Fourth of July after getting off of work. My friend and I stopped for one drink before the fireworks. Let's just say I will never return. I stood there for a good 15 minutes with maybe 5 people tops at the bar. The bartenders never once acknowledged me yet they did manage to make eye contact. They then all walked out from behind the bar and went outside. It took another ten minutes until finally the manager came over and served me. I am a bartender and I am appalled to see such people being employed at what seems like a decent place. I am a phenomenal tipper being that I am in the industry and sadly I didn't leave a single dollar. Hopefully they can learn from their mistakes instead of probably losing more potential customers.  What a shame.
After eating lunch several days a week at Atrias PNC Park restaurant for many years, I have finally decided that the price has just lost any relation to portions/quality and will not be dining there anytime in the near future.\n\nGradually, over the past year, the prices have continued to increase to the point of being dinner menu prices for lunch size meals.  Recently, the portion size has significantly diminished, to the point of being almost comical today.\n\nThe fish \"special\" today was BBQ salmon with asparagus.  It consisted of about 3oz of salmon and four spears of asparagus.  It actually looked ridiculous on the plate.  The specials used to have 5-6 oz of fish, included a decent portion of vegetables, and rice, all for a dollar or two less.  While a bit more than I wanted to spend for lunch, at least the quality and size of portion made some sense.  Today, I spent $15 plus tax and tip and left feeling like I had eaten an appetizer and still hungry.\n\nThey have pushed it too far, I am no longer willing to waste my money at Atria's.  Too bad, we used to really enjoy lunch there.
I was here on a business dinner and it firmly seated itself as the absolute WORST place I've ever eaten at. \n-hair in the food\n-crab cakes were touted as amazing, in reality disgusting ice cream scoops of poor crab and mayonnaise \n-\"risotto\" uncooked and congealed to plate. \n-vegetables gummy and soaked in oil. Not properly prepped and served with woody stems. \n\nI was shocked this place turns a profit
1 star for your cover-2 defense that lost me $100 on the Super Bowl.  I thought yall were going to shut down Fitzgerald.  You disappointed me.  Wouldn't have mattered if that Big Ben TD didn't get called back and turned into a field goal, but damn your cover-2 D that let Fitz run wild on yall.\n\nNational Fixed League on them spread busters.  Vegas owns the NFL!  Sheiiit!!!
Out of business.
It's cathartic to give this sorry organization 1 star.\n\nNote: this is a review of the baseball club, not the stadium in which they play
Ugh!  Another losing season.  WTF man, weren't we in first place at the All-Star Break?  What happened?  I wasn't expecting a World Series Champ or even a Pennant winner.  But was a winning season too much to ask for?  This marks the 20th anniversary since the Pirates' last winning season.  That's right folks--it's been since 1992.  Let's take a look at the world of 1992.\n\nBASEBALL:  The Pirates' roster that year included Stan Belinda, Doug Drabek, Zane Smith, Denny Neagle, Jay Bell, Orlando Merced, Andy Van Slyke, and of course Barry Bonds.  All have since retired.  The only new ballparks were New Comiskey Park (now U.S. Cellular Field) and Camden Yards.  No stadiums had corporate names.  The Arizona Diamondbacks, the Colorado Rockies, the Miami Marlins, and the Tampa Bay (Devil) Rays didn't exist.  The Washington Nationals were the Montreal Expos.  The Milwaukee Brewers were in the AL.  Both the NL and the AL only had two divisions each.  The minor league Washington Wild Things didn't exist either and nor did their league.  KBL was the big cable sports channel.\n\nTV:  \"Saturday NIght Live's\" cast included Dana Carvey, Ellen Cleghorne, Chris Farley, Tim Meadows, Mike Myers, Kevin Nealon, Phil Hartman,  Chris Rock, Adam Sandler, Rob Schneider, and David Spade.  \"Seinfeld\" hadn't become a huge hit yet and no one knew Kramer's first name.  Monday nights on NBC included \"Murphy Brown\", \"Evening Shade\" and \" Northern Exposure\".\n\nMOVIES:  The top movies included \"Lethal Weapon 3\", \"Basic Instinct\", \"Hone Alone 2\", \"The Bodyguard\" and \"Aladdin\".  When you wanted to watch movies at home, you had to rent them from the video store and you watched them on VHS tapes or laserdiscs.  \n\nMUSIC:  Bruce Springsteen released \"Lucky Town\" and \"Human Touch\"  on the same day.  R.E.M. had \"Automatic for the People\".  Gin Blossoms released their first album \"New Miserable Experience\", which stayed on the charts for almost two years.  Bare Naked Ladies \"Gordon\" featured the cult classic \"If I Had a Million Dollars.\"  You either listened to albums on cassette or CD and you bought them at record stores like National Record Mart.  Doug Hopkins (Gin Blossoms), Kurt Cobain (Nirvana), Shannon Hoon (Bline Melon) and Jerry Garcia (Grateful Dead) were all alive.\n\nTECHNOLOGY:  Few people had internet access.  You also used pay phones because you didn't have a cell phone.  You watched movies on a VCR.  You met up with your friends without texting them.  You ordered merchandise by \"sending in\" or by calling an \"800\" number.  You had to buy tickets by waiting in line.  \n\nAnd OJ Simpson was still a football hero.\n\nSo that's it, Pittsburgh Pirates.  I feel like telling you I'm done with you guys.  I'm no fair weather fan, but 20+ years of losing is enough.
I was raised Catholic (but no longer practice), and have always been fascinated by relics and the stories of saints--so I was really looking forward to our tour of St Anthony's. BEWARE: I can't speak for their other guides, but the gentleman (a lay person, not a priest) who \"led\" ours was far more interested in haranguing the crowd on the nature of TRUE believers, the infallibility of the Catholic faith, and whether we'd all found our \"charisms\" - the gifts we needed to be using if we were going to be saints, too--than showing us any relics. After an hour of his sermon--and nary a single fact about the hundreds of relics that surrounded us--we left. What a disappointment. What a huckster.
So, this is what happened.\n\nI went their complaining about a possible over heating and requesting a change of oil. This was my first visit there. They topped off my coolant for free and changed my oil. I had a check engine light on for which I knew the code and was holding off on repairing it. \n\nThey charged me $20 for reading the check engine light code and turning it off. I didn't want that. I pointed this out on the bill and he said that, its fine, I can just pay for the oil change (~$42). He asked me if I had $42 cash on me. If I did, I could have paid and left a happy customer. But I didn't, so I gave him my card and he went in the back and swiped it for the full price ($42 + $20 + tax). When I was signing the transaction receipt, I told him that he swiped for the full price. This apparently pissed him off a lot, he very rudely handed $20 from his pocket and asked me to \"Get out of there\" - and walked out. I tried to talk to him and explain my reason of asking - it not being the matter of $20 but of the principle that he said he wasn't going to charge me for what I didn't want. But he wouldn't listen, was very rude and said \"You're Done\" and \"Get out\" more times. I left. \n\nI ain't going back where they treat customers like that.
Ordered a lg pizza for pick up, 30-40 min wait. Went to pick up my pizza and I arrived to have no pizza at all. They told a driver must have taken by accident. The skinny, is it took an hour for a new pizza, and they offered me nothing
Terrible. I lived about 2 blocks away - and with no other options - I still can't bring myself to order from here. Ordered twice in the last 90 days and both times it was terrible. Ended up waiting over an hour each time. First time I got home to find a totally different order; the send time waited over 1.5 hrs for a pizza. Both were crappy, at best. Staff was really rude both times.
This place has THE WORST customer relations I've experienced in Pittsburgh since I moved here two months ago. My boyfriend was about to order a gyro, I was waiting for him at the table outside near the street with a drink and hotdog I had gotten elsewhere, there was absolutely no one else in their establishment. The person behind the counter then told my boyfriend that I was not welcome to sit at their outdoor seating area with him while he enjoyed his gyro. He canceled his order and we sat at the friendly place next door. Not only did Knossos lose my boyfriend's business that day, but they also lost both of us as future customers. What a petty and pathetic place.
Very disappointed. Delivery was late, our gyros were cold and fries were soggy. I wont be ordering from here again.
Awful poor excuse for a gyro. Food is always soggy. Meat is pure horsec*ck. Very unfriendly staff, but what do you expect from Greek f@ggots. Will never order from here again, total trash.
This place is terrible and the management has acted like an entitled prick every time I was there lol... Id rather get shot at R Bar
Had a friend who went here. REALLY BAD experience
Coffee and atmosphere are great... but my God, the cupcakes are the worst EVER!!!  There is a bakery right beside them; they should really consider selling the bakery's sweets or none at all.  I think a fake/display cupcake would have been fresher... and maybe even taste better.  Yes, it was that bad!  Mr. Manager... try your stuff before you sell it!
I bought a latte.....no wait! Actually, I bought coffee and espresso and two lattes and something to munch on (not all for me I had a friend with me). When I ordered the 2nd latte I sat down and realized I didn't have any foam so went back to the counter to ask for some and and she wanted to charge me!? Really!? Maybe it sound petty to you but I like my lattes fixed a certain way and foam is the best part! It's all about customer service and considering I had just spent over $25.00 a little foam wasn't much to ask. Good coffee. Bad customer service.
This was my second visit and alas, my last. \n\nOur first visit was at lunch and it was just OK. We weren't blown away nor were we impressed. But I will always opt to support a local Mom & Pop shop if all things are equal. This last visit was the pits.\n\nIt was 5:30pm on a Saturday night. We were one of two tables. This is usually an indication of something fishy (excuse the pun.) Appetizer was edamame. It was overcooked and left uneaten. I am not the adventurous sushi order-er; I had California rolls and spicy tuna. The tuna rolls were mostly spicy sauce then fish, very mayonnaise-y and unsatisfying. As for my CA rolls, the avocado was all brown! Not just the parts on the top (because I checked!) all the way through. When I brought it to the staff's attention her response was \"Oh, yea. Avocado is like banana. They get brown very easily and we cut that yesterday.\" WHAT?!? They did bring me another batch (that was part brown, part green) but it was too late. This was my first sushi restaurant EVER that we left half the rolls on the plate uneaten. Since we were all still hungry, my daughter picked up the table tent listing all the desserts. Yuck! Filthy. Not wiped down in a long while or perhaps ever. When I set it back is when I noticed the wall also needed a good wipe down. Needless to say, we skipped dessert. \n\nOur first visit deserved a 2.5 but this visit was a 1.
Pool hall and pretty crappy bar. Not much else to write home about. Was not a fan and won't be back here.
I've given this place enough 2nd chances and have had my last meal at this DIVE.\nFood is mediocre at best and you can't get any service because the \nwait staff is always outside having a cigarette. Very unappetizing to watch\nthem and the cook smoking then come back inside and NOT WASH THEIR\nHANDS. DISGUSTING !!!!!!!!!!!!!
Read my first review... loved this place... Today I stopped in to look around,my niece was with me and I remembered that they had help wanted postings somewhere.. she inquired and the teenage girl behind the counter was SO rude, full on glaring and rolling of the eyes! NO JOKE. I wish that the manager had been in but hopefully she keeps track and knows what her counter staff is like when she is gone! I will go to party Cake shop from here on...There are too many great places to put up with attitude!
Pastries are nice but I bought a cake for my sisters bridal shower and they PUT THE WORDING ON THE CAKE INCORRECTLY! it was a Saturday and \"could not call a baker in to fix it so they could refund me the cake and just take this one, go somewhere else to buy a new cake, or try to fix the writing ourselves and just remove the word that was INCORRECT.\" I spent hours on the phone with the manager and she was not very helpful or empathetic to the situation.  \n\nI then went to go pick up another cake for my sister for her husbands birthday and THE CAKE TOPPLED OVER IN THE BOX IN THEIR OWN FRIDGE!  I asked the lady if this happens often and she goes nope your just \"special\".  Being really rude about it.  They patched the cake up and THEN showed me the cake and THERE WAS A WOODEN STAKE IN THE CAKE to \"keep it together\".  I then said that there is a hole in the cake now and the counter lady said, \"Just smooth the hole over with your finger a little bit.\" \n\n\nThe counter girls are always rude.  I honestly think they don't like me because they are nice to everyone else but myself. But if I would suggest I would NOT go here.
We were having a Gender Naming Party for our first baby and we were excited to share this moment with friends and family. When we went to pick up our cake we were extremely disappointed in the way the staff handled our order. The mother to be on picking up the cake found out the gender of the baby! Without her husband! This was supposed to be a surprise at the party but it was on the receipt. How terrible! They knew when we placed the order that this was supposed to be a secret. When confronted with their error they were dismissive, condescending, and there was no effort to compensate her for her pain in finding out the gender at the bakery. We have done wedding cakes here, and many special events over the years. Never again!! Potomac Bakery you should be ashamed.
This was the worst hotel that I ever stayed in. my hubby and I  took the smoking room and it stunk sooo bad that I wanted to throw up. I was afraid to sleep in that nasty bed. in the morning at 5am I wanted to leave the room cuz smell was sooo gross that woke me up! I felt so dirty that I took two showers AT Other HOTEL. I never thought that I will have nightmares bcz of bad and stinky hotel.
I've never been to Pittsburgh before and I planned on doing some heavy partying and needed a place to crash that was not on the floor so I booked this hotel the day before I drove up. I saw the reviews & ignored them because I figured I'd be drunk and happy enough to dive into a bed.\n\nI checked in around 2am, the girl who checked me in barely said anything to me besides \"initial here and sign here and your room is over there\". The room smelt like hot dogs, the AC wasn't working at all so I was dripping in sweat all night, none of the lamps worked at all, there were holes in the pillow cases and bedding, there was a tiny blood stain on the sheet, I went down for the continental breakfast at 9:30am (it ends at 10am) and they already stopped serving, the shower was ice cold. I then checked for bed bugs after realizing the shithole I spent the night in last night (coast is clear). I checked out and went back to Baltimore, which seems like heaven on earth compared to Shittsburgh.
BED BUGS!!! Horrible place! DO NOT STAY HERE!! Stayed here for a wedding we attended. Woke up in the middle of the night with bites all over my legs, arms, and back. We flip a pillow over and there it was. BED BUGS. We had to cut our trip short. The man at the front desk apologized and gave us the managers name and number and told us to call back later that morning. We have been calling since 8/10 and have yet to receive a call back. Such disrespect. We risk bringing back bed bugs and spending hundreds on extermination fees and no has the decency to call back.
From reading other reviews and dining guides, it looks like this is very much a hit or miss place. Either you love pizza with toppings thrown on after cooking, or you don't. I fall into the later category: I didn't like it at all.\n\nI ordered a slice of cheese pizza and a grilled chicken salad. For the pizza, the crust was salvageable after I pushed aside a good quantity of cheese (most of it). The salad was...nothing short of horrific. Overloaded with fries and (big surprise) more cheese, getting to the lettuce and other toppings took some digging. Eventually, I found bland tomatoes and shredded iceberg lettuce hidden far below.\n\nI don't get this place.
This \"pizza\" was the worst food I have ever eaten.
Worse than store freezer pizza. What with the cold cheese on top of hot pizza? Terrible. If you want quality; Fiori's is a few miles away.
My husband and I had this pizza for the first time last night.  He suggested it after hearing recommendations from friends.  This was the most disgusting excuse for a pizza I've ever had! We ordered pizza for pick up.  The girl told my husband 20 minutes and he picked our pizza up in a timely fashion.  The best thing about this pizza was the crust.  That was it! It was cold! It was not even warm like it had been warmed up before my husband picked up our order.  We got two extra toppings, which were just heaped in a pile on the middle of our slices.  These were cold too. And mushrooms from a can!!! Why am I paying extra for disgusting canned vegetables.  The sauce had absolutely no flavor and was completely cold. I would never go to this place ever again.  It was a lazy excuse for a pizza.  Who gives someone a COLD pizza for pick up?!?!?
I've never, EVER experienced such poor customer service before at any beer distributor.  Yes, I called them and asked for a price on ordering a case of import beer.  When they called me back with the price, I decilned purchase.  I was talking at the same time to another distributor who was doing a lot more leg work for me tracking down the supply chain.  When he informed me he could have a case shipped to wherever I bought my beer, I gave him Banksville Beer's name thinking I was giving them some extra business.  I don't normally get my beer from there.  When I stopped into Banksville to pick it up, a person who I assume was the owner got immediately defensive with me, raised his voice saying \"You told me you didn't want it.\"  I tried to explain what had happened, but he continuously interupted me with a constantly rising voice level barely allowing me to get a word in.  He claimed he did not speak to the guy I had spoken to, which was obviously a lie since he referred specifically to \"that person you (meaning me) talked to.\"  I finally had to cut him off and say, \"Listen, do you have the case here or not?\"  He said they did not, so I left.\n\nI can understand his frustration if what I did caused him any loss or inconveneince, but he did not need to take the majorly unprofessional approach that he did.  I honestly had no idea that I did anything wrong, and on the contrary thought I had actually done them a favor.  Had he explained the circumstance, it would have been no harm, no foul and lesson learned.  And I just would have asked them to order me a case straight out and would have returned for more cases to be orderd in the future.  But because of that reaction, I will NEVER step foot in there again under any circumstance.  No beer is worth dealing with a world class A-hole like that.
Mediocre and poorly made! You can get better quality food from Mcdonalds don't waste your time or money
I would give this eat n park location zero stars if I could. I arrived at 11:15am and was seated quickly but that was about it. My waitress did not come over until 11:41. I did not receive water or any service for 26 minutes.  That is outrageous to me, I've never had anything good to say about this location and will not be visiting again.
My experience here was not good my family and I were seated all the way in the back of the Resturant near an exit after passing at least six tables upfront. We were the ONLY African Americans in the restaurants not even one as a busboy we had some stares but no one was rude just very quiet . The waitress tried to make us feel welcome so we thank her for that but the feeling was uneasy and on top of all that, the food wasn't good it lacked lots of flavor \nI wouldn't recommend this spot to anyone keep driving
This store will not let you photograph their lighting fixtures. We browsed for a while and found a chandelier we liked, and my husband took a picture of it on his cell phone. The salesclerk told us that was not allowed. We were dumbfounded. We are renovating a house and need a number of light fixtures, plumbing fixtures, etc.-- the only way we can keep track of them all (and check if they actually might look good together) is to photograph everything we're seriously considering. We tried to explain this and the clerk said nope, not allowed. We asked why. She said, \"I don't know-- they just don't allow it.\" Well I bet I know-- they don't want you going online in search of better pricing. But hey, NEWSFLASH-- that's how things work in 2012. I'm not going to drop $1,200 on a chandelier without looking it up online. (For the record, I understand that local businesses aren't usually going to have the lowest price available. I don't mind paying a bit of a premium to support a small business in Pittsburgh that gave me great in-person service. But like hell am I going to spend that kind of money without making sure I'm not getting completely ripped off.)\n\nWe tried to press further, though-- what about matching finishes or colors to other fixtures? The salesclerk said, \"Oh, people just tell us what colors they have in their room and how big the room is and we tell them what works.\" I'm sorry, but unless you're omniscient, this is not acceptable. \n\nThe most insulting thing, though, is the clerk telling us \"I don't know\" about a policy that's so clearly the exception to the local norm. If you're going to have a ridiculous, anachronistic rule, at least have the guts to explain why to customers when they ask.
This place is another that is undeserving of your hard earned money!! The following is an email that I sent to the owner, it will shed a little light as to why I feel this way...I will also share his response, and what ultimately became of the situation. I know this one is long winded, but you should be forewarned about giving them your money!\n\nI have been to your bar many times, and I have had both good and less than average experiences, but this past Saturday was terrible! My girlfriend and I came to have some dinner around 9 pm. We knew it would be crowded due to the Penguin game, and that wasn't a problem. When we arrived, there were no seats at the bar or tables available anywhere. We decided to have a beer and wait. After the game was over, some tables opened up so we sat in an empty booth in the back and waited. After about 5 minutes, a waitress came over, cleaned our table, and made notice of the fact that we still had drinks. Sadly, this was the last time that she ever came to our table. We placed our closed menus at the end of the table...nothing, we put our empty glasses at the end of the table with the menus...nothing. We sat and waited for more than 15 minutes. All the while we were waiting, another group of four sat the table next to us, they were never given any attention. They got up and left after being completely ignored. I understand that the restaurant was busy, and that service and wait times may be impacted, but the way we were treated (or lack of being treated) was appalling. It was especially annoying to watch the server that initially cleaned our table giggling and carrying on with two other booths that appeared to be friends with her on the other side of the dining room and then when she was done she just casually walked over to another empty table picked up something off of it and went into the kitchen without even taking a look around the dining room. At this point we were disgusted and got up and left, I was annoyed and made mention of how awful the service in the back was to the doorman. The waitresses in the back were terrible and seemed to have no sense of urgency or seem to care about most of the customers, with the exception of the few tables that they were more interested in socializing with. This seems to be a problem, because on some of my past less than stellar experiences, the disappointment was again with the service from the back servers. On those occasions it was the same thing, they seemed to be more interested in being social butterflies than providing any sort of service. You don't need to improve your wait staff, you need to replace some of them, at least the people working the back dining room on this past Saturday, they were completely useless! Will I come back to your restaurant, I'm not sure. The food is good, but I work hard for my money, and I expect to receive more than good food in exchange for it. \n\nSincerely,\n Matt K.\n\nHere is the response that I got\n\nPlease give me a call (412)555-1212 to discuss the matter. I'm sorry & will make every attempt to make sure this doesn't happen again.\nThank you for making me aware of the situation.\nJoey DeMarco \n\nI promptly called him as soon as I got this email. It went to voice mail , so I left a message. That was it, the guy didn't even have the decency to return my phone call. It is amazing that this is how business owners expect to keep people coming through their doors and handing over their hard earned money. Support local businesses, but make sure they are deserving of your money!
Guy's Jumbot Plate O'Crap - Made a special trip in with my son this morning to enjoy the food at the Dor-Stop.We both made the same order Guy's Jumbot. When the order arrived mine was over cooked , the egg portion resembled the dry pressed paper used in the egg carton. My serving was served without cheese. My son's was fine. When I went to pay and said something I got a vacant stare and I am so sorry. I ended up with a take out for my dog to eat. teh toast was perfect though. I started makeing this hour long trek with family members about a year ago. We would come out about every 4-6 weeks. The last two trips the quality has started to slip a little...but never to this extent that it really mattered.Save yourself the effort ....This is not a Diner, this is not a drive-in...this does not even rank high enough to be a Dive. Denny's would be a better choice.
For what it's worth, dor-stop isn't good as people say it was. People are fanatical about this place and its food. Is their food really tasty or they're popular because the network show? From my perspective, I detest their service, the service is notoriously horrible and unacceptable. Also the food was unpalatable. I order pumpkin flavor pancakes and side order scramble eggs. I was too full and their portion is huge so I left two pieces of pancakes. The waitress don't even bother to ask me if I need a box to take it home or if everything is good. Although she did refilled my coffee once, I barely see her stop by and there wasn't too many people in the diner is isn't likely she is occupied by that amount of customers.I think the waitress was rude because she never say thank you during the entire breakfast even when I tipped her. I should have known, I just feel like they treated me differently that's all. This review is based on my dinning experience and the service. Seriously if they mean business they should improve. Especially waitress was lack of enthusiasm. Do I want to come back? Never ever.
I really, really wanted to try Dor - Stop, but it wasn't open when I went! My wife and I woke up early just to go there, and the diner was closed for the next few days, EVEN THOUGH IT DIDNT SAY THAT ON THE WEBSITE! Such a waste of time. If you're going to go, make sure you call ahead, just so you don't get screwed over like we did.
Pancakes, pancakes, pancakes.  Everybody told me I HAD to try and their pancakes.\nWell, the short stack they served me were lousy pancakes.
Compared to the original Don Campiti Pizza of the 60's and 70's this is not even close. The legacy of a superior pizza in Dormont has lost it. No longer up there with Beto's and area best. Sad to say this pizza was so bad. I have been a diehard customer of the 60's and 70's. Crust was like cardboard. Toppings were worse. What happened to the legacy Don Campitis Pizza ?
When my car died, I originally had it towed to Ruffing because it was close to where my car broke down.  After I saw the good reviews, I figured it'd be worth a shot, and was surprised at how awful the people were.\n\nRuffing originally suggested I take my car to a dealer, since it's an uncommon model and they didn't know what the problem was.  I asked if I could just pay for a vehicle diagnostic, since they're more likely to be honest than a dealership. They said it would take around a day-and-a-half to get to it.\n\nAlmost three days later, I hadn't heard back from them.  Since I need my car on a daily basis, it was frustrating that they were well past their quoted time with no updates as to what was going on.  The repairs are what should take time - not a diagnostic.\n\nMy biggest issue was the attitude I received when I called.  When I called to see why there was a delay, the mechanic became agitated.  His tone became condescending when he told me it's my fault for leaving the car with him -- that I just HAD to have him look at it and I was SO against going elsewhere.  He said he had cars sitting there for weeks that he hasn't even touched yet (?) so he can't bother with mine. Ultimately I had to get my car towed to a dealership anyway, since I couldn't afford to have my car sit at their shop for \"weeks\".\n\nI wished they were more up front with how back logged they were, rather than trying to give me a schedule they couldn't abide by, and then take their stress out on me when I followed up with them.\n\nI wouldn't recommend this mechanic to anyone.  You're better off going somewhere that has realistic wait-times and up front communication.  And you definitely don't want to deal with a mechanic who is going to lose his cool with you at the drop of a hat.
You know it's bad when you get in your car practically in tears because of how bad the haircut is. Having curly hair, I've had my fair share of terrible haircuts. The one I had at this salon was among the worst. I explained to the owner of the salon how I wanted my layering, but apparently because I didn't tell him exactly how to cut my hair - since after all, I figured he's the one who should know how to cut hair, including curly hair - it's my fault that I received such a terrible haircut. Sorry, I guess I was too busy watching in horror as he blunt cut horizontal layers into my hair (exactly the opposite of what you're supposed to do with curly hair). The owner clearly has no idea how to cut curly hair. And he's overpriced to boot. The other stylists may give better cuts, but the owner's attitude (\"It's not my fault\") suggests this salon deserves no one's business.
Short of getting on my hands and knees and begging the stylist to cut ONE HALF of an INCH, I don't know what else I could have done.. \n\nBefore every haircut I explain that I am very particular about the length of my hair -- I want to keep it long, it grows very slowly, that it is IMPERATIVE to only cut a TINY AMOUNT off, etc, etc. I made this extremely clear to the stylist. She promised that she \"wouldn't do anything crazy..\"\n\nLet's just say I am using this as a cathartic outlet for my experience because I went in for a trim but left with FOUR INCHES missing from my hair. I'm still recovering aesthetically and emotionally from this trauma! It just doesn't make sense to me why a stylist would do exactly the opposite of what was requested. I think maybe she is used to cutting children's hair and not listening to them. But either way, what should have been a really quick/easy trim, turned into one of the most extreme haircuts of my life. It all could have been so easily avoided. It doesn't feel fair. \n\nProceed with caution..
This was probably one of the worst places I've eaten at in a while . I'm not sure what was worse food or service . Never again , the coupon we bought and weren't allowed to use left on the table
I have dined at Namaste for the final time.  I am tired of being served by an individual that does not speak: who treats the customer with disdain and indifference.  The words \"thank you\" and \"how are you\" are not part of the lexicon here.  The buffet items reflect economizing.  Virtually no cauliflower is used, thus my favorite dish, aloo gobi, is never offered..  There sometimes is no rice pudding, and in place of the India staple buffet item, chicken tandoori, the cheaper and less appealing chicken wings are offered.  It is s shame that such a beautiufl, comfortable restaurant space is being wasted.  For a mere $1.01 more, I can receive a spectacular and delicious array of the finest Indian food in the lovely atmosphere of All India, North Craig Street, Oakland, where I receive gracious, personal attention from the owners.
Here is our experience on my friend's daughter's birthday party:-\n\nI and my wife attended my friend's daughter's birthday party here recently. My friend mentioned that they finalized the menu for the lunch buffet a week in advance. The restaurant chef at the last moment on the day of party, just one hour before lunch, told that they did not get the \"PANEER/cheese\". They can substitute it for \"MALAI KOFTA\". It was unbelievable that they changed the dish at the last moment requested by my friends as 50% guests were vegetarian and hence need a cheese / \"PANEER\" entree. On the other hand the \"MALAI KOFTA\" was just \"POTATO\" in the gravy. The quality of food in this party was awfully bad. \n\nThis is a humble request to all INDIAN Americans and all NON-INDIAN Americans that please don't throw your money by going to this restaurant. We are not here to misguide you or someone from a competitor restaurant. You can confirm these details with me anytime, I am engineer by profession. I was thinking to host my son's birthday party over here next month but I am lucky to get an experience before hand. I will NEVER NEVER recommend this place EVER.
Shockingly bad.  I know it's Pittsburg so my expectations were low, but there is no call for rudeness.  The old lady should retire.  The young waiter was ok but clearly  scared of the woman.   I went to the dinner buffet at 530 pm, the food was obviously left over from lunch, the rice was so old it was crunchy, all other food was very low quality and mostly cold. I always like to say something nice so the sweet carrot dish was not horrible.  My search for quality Indian food in the 'burgh continues.
I cannot believe how anyone can like this place. May be the service was bad the day I went. I walked in .... then found that the place had a smell that was not pleasant. But, I got adjusted to that in a few moments. I found only 4 or 5 items in the buffet. None of them looked fresh. I tried this place only because of the other yelp reviews. I would never go there again.
Maharaja is located in the Days Inn on Banksville Rd, and we tried it one day for lunch. Not really understanding the positive reviews here, but to each his/her own. I found the food watery, overcooked (even by Indian food standards) and tasteless. There seemed to be no care in preparation of the dishes, so that the vegetables weren't cut into the same sizes, each dish tasted much like the other, and the food didn't even look attractive. I don't mind divey surroundings, but I abhor a smelly old carpet, and they have wall to wall carpeting that was around before most of us were. They offer mango lassi which they keep in the original gallon plastic jug that they bought it in...at least pretend that you made it. There are 2 better Indian restaurants a stones throw from this place...Namaste and Mintt, both across the street.
I actually don't mind the Arby's chain; I certainly don't go to one on a regular basis, but when I do I usually enjoy the treat that is a nice giant sandwich and a side of curly fries. Usually what I get from an Arby's is an a-ok fast food variety sandwich that, while greasy, is still very tasty and doesn't leave me feeling sick to my stomach.\n\nThat said, I never enjoy the food I pick up from this particular Arby's. Firstly, often when I've placed an order in their drive-thru I've found that I've had to sit and wait for my \"fast food\" for 10 to 15 minutes. After waiting for my food - on the days that I didn't leave the line in frustration before placing an order at all because I couldn't even do so in a reasonable amount of time - I've found that what I've gotten has been mediocre compared to what I've experienced at other Arby's. Common issues I've come across include the lack of sauces when I've asked for them, overcooked food, and so much grease that the sandwich begins coming apart AND after eating I begin to feel sick to my stomach.\n \nSorry, guys. I may not expect a lot from a fast food joint, but this Arby's just doesn't impress me.
Hostess was very awkward when seating us. Sat us in the corner in a small booth with a broken seat right up against another large party. The place was by no means busy. We sat and waited for someone to acknowledge us. We watched 4 members of the wait staff each attend to the 4 other tables and not one of them ever acknowledged us or came over. After 15 minutes of being ignored by staff, we got up and walked out. It's a shame too... we liked the looks of the menu and the bar list and specials. Don't think we'd ever come back after that. There are plenty of other places.
pricey, pricey pricey and it isnt that good!
one of the worst steak sandwiches i've ever eaten. there were 7 of us and the only people who liked their food were the kids and the one who had the pizza. \n\ni would never eat here again
We just ate there on a Friday night and the whole experience was a disaster. Rude, unfriendly, just a miserable male server. Drinks were lousy , service was lousy, food just o.k., nothing to write home about, and at 9:00 on a Friday night they were putting chairs on the tables and vacuuming, hinting it was time for us to leave. The whole experince was horrible... and the bill was outrageous.  Save your money and Go somewhere else!!!!
I am not being hyperbolic when I say that my last experience here was the worst food experience I have ever had.\n\n I have eaten at Bado's before and have had pizza that was pretty tasty. So when my roomate wanted to go there, I was pretty excited. There were 4 of us. Two of us had burgers while the other two ordered wedding soup and shared potato skins. My burger was delicious. It was juicy and smothered in bleu cheese. \n\nWhile my food was really good, there were some issues with the other items ordered. Two of my guests cited that the wedding soup had a metalic taste to it while my other friend with the burger found a hair. Being a hairdresser and understanding that it does happen sometimes, she disregarded it and continued to eat her burger. Unfortunately, the hair did not stop there. Another guest found several hairs in their meal as well. We decided that we should let our waitress know. I stopped the waitress and explained how there was hair in two people's food. The waitress got upset and was very rude (it's not like we accused her of planting the hair herself). On top of this, she mistakenly took my burger and walked away with it, leaving the sullied food on the table. When she came back I told her that my burger was not one of the items with food on it and she instantly became defensive. At this point we asked for a manager (who never came) and insisted our meal get comped. Considering she threw out the only good food that we ordered, we didn't feel like that was asking too much. Luckily the waitress did not put up too much of a fight. \n\nI will never eat at Bado's again. A good cheese burger and a decent pie isn't enough when the staff can't even accept their own (human) mistakes. I have been places where there have been food issues before and I have also worked in a restaurant. I completely understand that mistakes happen. However, the reaction that we received was unacceptable.
Had the gnocchi delivered. Absolutely terrible. Gnocci's had to have been 2 years old. Delivery guy was shady too.
I don't like this place at all. The staff here is always rude and has no sense of care at all for their business. A couple years ago I had heard they smoke over making their pizza. All of their employees tend to be shady. I don't recommend at all.
I wish there were negative stars I could put for this place.  One of the most unprofessional experiences I have ever had with a business owner, not even a worker.  I was yelled at, mocked, and generally treated like crap for checking up on a remounting job that was supposed to be done within a week.  Emotional mess the rest of the day.  I have never been treated that way with any owner of a business.   I work with restaurant owners for god's sake!   Unbelievable.   If you want the full story, email me and I will tell you the whole thing.  As it is right now, DO NOT patronize this business.   There was absolutely no excuse for his attitude.
An abomination....the billing department is run by a level of incompetence of which the likes have never been seen.  Ever get a bill 2 yrs late, then pay over the phone with a credit card, only to have the payment never recorded and then receive harassing phone calls?  Well I just did....
Absolutely wretched and incompetent billing department.  Overcharged four months in a row, called every month and was repeatedly told it would be fixed.  I went to American Express to file a dispute and at least they were able to reverse the four overcharges.  Even after that, I was randomly charged for a system upgrade that never happened.  I am considering filing a complaint with the better business bureau and the attorney general.
I tried to go here for the second time today.  I say tried because I sat at the bar for about 7 mins with 3 people walking around behind it and no one even acknowledging I was there.  I ended up going next door to The Map Room for lunch.\n\nThe first time I had gone I had a server come and take my order, a kitchen guy ran it out, and then no one ever came back for 45 mins.  I went to the counter for my check and thought that I wouldn't give it another go.  Well, you can't say I didn't try.\n\n I had the barbeque chicken pizza the first time and it wasn't bad, but its not a place I'd make my go to pizza place.
While awaiting the arrival of your wedding dress, you should feel excitement and joy, not desparation and hopelessness.  The delivery date was \"pushed back\" many times until it finally came in over 3 months after they said it would, and gave me the run-around throughout the entire process.  I didn't think my dress was coming at all to be perfectly honest.  I had un-returned phone calls and was lied to by Donetta, the owner.  Janie was the consultant I worked with the most and she was always pleasant and helpful; however, the store overall struggles and I would never go back.  If you are shopping for a wedding dress run far far away from this place.  Seriously, take my word for it.  I ordered my dress well in advance and no one should go through what I went through wondering when you were going to get a straight answer and if your dress was ever going to come.  I have read many negative reviews for this place and still gave them the benefit of the doubt. Shame on me.  Check out the Better Business Bureau (BBB).  Brides by Candalina is rated an F.  They have unresolved isssues with customers and unfortunately they really don't care. Shopping for a wedding dress should be one of the most exciting times of your life, not a nightmare.  There are many other bridal shops-avoid this one.
I went to pick up my wife's bridesmaid dress (she was the maid of honor) on a very boring Wednesday afternoon around 12:30. From the outside the place looks like a bomb shelter with dresses in the window.\n\nThe show room is upstairs, but you would never know it from the drab, basement-like entrance. As I walked up the stairs I notices ZERO customers in the store, however; two employees were working on the sales floor. I stood there like a jerk for a bit while both employees (one was the owner) kept to themselves. The owner did not respond to me for, at least, 10 minutes even though the store was empty and another employee was just walking around \"dusting\" (the store smalls like the inside of a mascot costume).\n\nWhen the owner, finally, saw me she made a little annoying noise like \"What the hell are YOU doing here!!\". She walked over slowly, like a zombie looking for fresh brains and giving a crap why I was there. She asked me to follow her as she took me downstairs to an absolutely empty storeroom (by that I mean: what was she doing that was was so important that she couldn't wait on a customer) and took her sweet-ass time to get the dress which, by the way, was a second alteration. You see, they screwed up the first time they altered the dress (even after my wife tried it on there and markings or whatever were made!). So everyone is entitled to a mistake even a business that claims perfection; it's important to give them a chance to redeem themselves. But, to my surprise, she handed me a bill for the second alteration!!!!!! Are you kidding me?!!!\n\nI argued a bit, but then gave in; what was I supposed to do? We were leaving to go 200 miles away the next day for the wedding. So I paid. Do not go here ladies!\n\nOh, if you think I'm exaggerating, feel free to Google this company and read the many reviews that make mine look like a compliment. If you have ever needed a dress for a wedding or YOUR wedding, these reviews will scare you!
Last Friday I dropped off my best interview suit at Regency Cleaners and verified that I needed it back by Monday because of an interview on Wednesday. They assured me I could pick it up on Monday morning. \n\nMonday afternoon I stopped by and was told the suit wouldn't be there until 5:00PM. When I insisted that I had been told morning, she went into the back and came out with what I first thought was the suit but turned out to be only the jacket. She told me to come back after 5:00PM. When I asked to speak with the manager, she informed me that she was the only person there. I asked her to have the manager call me - she said the manager wouldn't answer the phone and reiterated the 5:00PM time when the last delivery came and petulantly informed me that none of this was her fault.\n\nAt 5:30PM I called and was told that the last delivery hadn't come yet and I'd have to call later. I again asked them to have the manager call me and she told me she couldn't give me the manager's phone number - which I hadn't asked for. I was again told this wasn't her fault. As of 7:00PM, the delivery finally arrived but not my pants.\n\nI was told the manager would call me after she arrived in the morning. I finally called at 9:00AM and was criticized by the manager for demanding her home phone number and told that there was never any guarantee about when clothes would be returned even when a rush was placed on them. \n\nApparently a *lot* of clothes were missing from the Monday delivery so I wasn't the only person upset about this situation.\n\nWhen I told them they'd lost my business for good, I was told that was fine and hung up on, forcing me to call again to find out exactly *when* I might be able to expect my missing pants.\n\nAt this point I'm still waiting and will be for the next three hours. In the meantime, I have to go out and try to find a suit that I can afford as a replacement just in case. \n\nI absolutely cannot recommend Regency Cleaners. They leave high school kids with no customer service experience or training in charge of the store with no manager available for unexpected situations. And there is no guarantee about when or if your clothes will ever come back.\n\nThis was my first and last time dealing with them.
Worst dry cleaners EVER.  \n\nNot only do they do an incredibly poor job on the clothes, but the staff are particularly nasty and rude.  The kids who work there are fine, but the older ladies are just plain miserable.  I would rather spend more money someplace else than go back to this hell hole.
I have been in this bar many times with a friend of mine (who has been a patron for decades) and I thought the owners were really nice people but now I wonder.  My friend is now confined to a wheelchair and still likes to frequent this bar, however, there are a couple of steps that lead into the back rooms where there are pool tables, dart boards, etc.  She cannot get to this area and has a ramp that she would give to the owners so she can access this area.  They refuse to put in the ramp.  I thought all public businesses had to comply with the Americans With Disabilities Act as long as it does not create an undue hardship.  Tell me, how is putting down a ramp that is given to you for free a hardship!  SHAME ON YOU CATHY!
Let me start off by saying, I HATE the dentist.  It is my worst fear.  I came to Edgewood Dental after stellar reviews.. and let me tell you my first impression was amazing.  They were professional, so nice, easily scheduled me in and numbed me so much that I didn't feel a thing.  Although I had 7 cavities filled (my teeth are horrible) I felt good that they did a good job.  Flash forward 3 months later, I received a bill in the mail because my insurance downgraded and no longer covered white fillings.  First, I was very upset that I was never told of this downgrade.  I was given an estimate and paid on time in full - not sure when this changed or why I was never told by the office or insurance company.  Regardless, I called over 5 times to discuss a payment plan with the office.  When I first emailed them, I was told I could choose the amount with which I wanted to pay to cover the amount owed.  Then, I was told my amount was too low and would get a call back.  NEVER HEARD FROM THEM AGAIN.  I was very upset.  I emailed, and called so many times.  Meanwhile, I have always paid everything on time and as an upstanding person would never not pay a bill.  I have been sending them checks and they are cashing them and just not even saying a word.  Jerks.
This place continues to be a joke.  The service is bad and the attitude of the workers is worse.  \n\nMy order is never right and yet I still go...never again.  \n\nI officially deem this place the worst restaurant in Pittsburgh.
Worst service.  Dirty.  Slow.  Ignorant by the strictest definition.  Do not go here.  Bad!  Real bad.
Inattentive staff.  Dirty tables, I agree with the other reviews here.  I think the \"Manager\" only hires other smokers, and they spend 90% of their time sitting outside smoking, instead of being prepared to serve customers.  \n\nI go there because sometimes it's convenient, b/c of the location, but last week they left their A/C broken for over a week (in 80+ degree weather).  No additional fans, nothing.\n\nThen when it was fixed, I went in, ordered coffee and an order of hummus/carrot/celery (prepackaged).  Not only was the hummus watery from sitting in that container for several days, but the celery was rotting at the ends, yes brown and rotting.  I showed the kid working there, who was probably jonesing to have his next cigarette, and I asked for another one.  Without opening it I could see at least 2-3 of the other servings of hummus were also all watery and had celery that was starting to rot, just like the one I was given.  I asked for my money back.  You know what was the worst thing, though?  The kid (he knows nothing about customer service let alone food service) put the containers with the watery, rotting celery back in the case, to serve to other unsuspecting customers!  Hello, Allegheny County Health Department?....\n\nThen the ultimate insult: 2 kids came in selling candy bars.  I've seen this there before, but this time, I said to them: \"You know, this is a business, you shouldn't be here.\"  Well, the older of the 2 girls (probably 11-12 at most - where is her mother?) put her hands on her hips and said in a smart-ass tone: \"We asked da owner, we is allowed ta be here.\"\n\nWell, that coffee I spent $2 on?  That is the last money I will spend in that place.  Disgusting.
I really want this place to be awesome, because, yet again, I want Regent Square to be an up and coming area.  This place has been here for years, and as I sit drinking my bitter, bitter coffee, and smelling the overwhelming scent of (I believe) dog pee, I wonder how it's even possible.  \n\nThe three times I've been here, I'm greeted as if I'm a colonial space marine trying to fish a child out of a vent.  They always sit in the corner peeking over the top of the counter as if I am terrifying to them, then duck out of the way.  Then grudgingly come when I peek around the counter at them.  If I didn't, I'm convinced that they would just sit there, as if they're not certain of what position they hold in this place, or what the next step should even be.  This is what I like to call, \"The Dance of Shitty Customer Service.\"  \n\nToday (and I write this longingly looking over at Square Cafe) I decided to give it a chance because it never is crowded, and I figured the quiet would be a good thing.  The girl at the counter was on the phone, and that's the way it stayed for two minutes until I said 'excuse me?'.  The charming reply: \"Yeah?\" She grudgingly got off the phone, and after accomplishing the Herculean task of handing me a cup, I pumped this swill that I'm currently drinking.\n\nShe's currently muttering under her breath back in her corner.  I'm not sure if maybe she's having a bad day, or she's just an asshole, but...if I had to bet, I'm going with asshole.\n\nThis place has pretty expensive coffee for how awful it is, and the food...Just don't eat the food.  \n\n(side note: this place isn't quiet at all when somebody orders something.  She stomps around like she's being sent to her room.  Then continues muttering)\n\nOkay, so this place is a travesty.  Bad coffee, bad odor, bad lighting, unbelievably bad, grudging service.  I would beg the owners to put any effort into this place.  As it is now, it's cornered the market in Regent Square, and sits like a middle finger boastfully pointing at the people of Braddock Avenue.
Is it possible to give zero stars?  If so, Katerbean would rate a zero.\n\nBad atmosphere, unfriendly employees, slow and reluctant service, pump your own coffee, dingy interior, dirty tables.  If they only had telescreens which couldn't be switched off, then this place would be a perfect setting to film Orwell's \"1984\".
This place is now closed :-). Best thing that could've been done with it.  Going to opn in a couple of months under new management as the 61B caf\u00e9. I look forward to seeing what some new life does to this place!
This store is so gross that I was almost sick! Onions peeled and half-rotten. Squishy garlic. Dirt everywhere. I will NEVER step foot in this place again.
One of the worst Wendy's I've ever experienced.  Every morning there was a 30-minute wait - after ordering - for food.
Wow. I hope that the one experience I had here was unique and not the norm for frequent customers. All I wanted to do was to buy some thermal socks (which they didn't even have any for men!  ???). I just ended up grabbing the next best thing (Oddly, they did have thermal socks for women which I almost purchased). I go stand in the check out line, and I don't think I've ever dealt with slower people than those who work here (and that's saying something). Not one, but two of the registers I stood in line at froze, and the women had to wait for the manager to fix.  They didn't seem to mind at all, which leads me to believe this happens all of the time. I waited for my beau who bought something after I did: another 15 minute wait.  Needless to say, I will not go here again.
First off, I like family restaurants and avoid chains when possible. Sometimes that's not possible - in the future I'll avoid this one no matter what.\n\nIts always a zoo, the servers are not interested in what they are doing, and do it poorly. Food comes out of order or not at all. The managers don't care. \n\nWe actually had a waitress spill the soup, catch most of it in her hand, and dump it back in right in front of us. Then she gave it to us before thinking to ask if we wanted another. \n\nJust go anywhere else, it can't be worse!
Normally one would think, one chain restaurant is just like the rest but I have had nothing but problems here. The staff appears to be constantly changing as does the managers which should tell you something. I've been there for lunch and dinner and continue to have issues. Here are just some of the problems that we have had: a co-worker had an entire glass of iced tea dropped on him and nothing was comped on his check; we have had to wait a very long time for our orders to be taken; I ordered the pick 2 and was told that the soup could not possibly come out first(even though I've done this before); they have argued with us over what the meal is supposed to come with to the point of us showing them a picture; and staff does not appear to be properly trained.
Another overdone steak and utterly inattentive staff! Still sitting here waiting for someone to give a care.\n\nSo, we finally got the attention of a server who was not our server, Michael. She was kind enough to take my steak back to the kitchen. Michael, our server, finally shows up 10 minutes later with a half-hearted apology and to let me know that my steak was being prepared again. He does not offer to refill our drink glasses that have now been sitting empty for 20 minutes. The manager makes an appearance and brings me a strip steak that looks rare from the sight of it. He informs me that my steak is on him and apologizes. He goes away. I cut into my steak and it's, you guessed it, Pittsburgh Rare. I asked for medium rare. He returns and I tell him that the chef needs to go back to culinary school and learn how to prepare a steak. The manager apologizes again and asks me if I want to take this pathetic piece of beef home with me! Not only is it rare but it's a cheap cut of strip steak that is loaded with connective gristle. I said no thanks. He comped my husband's meal and we left. I never hope for people to lose their jobs but the cook and the server really need some serious retraining! I will never go back to this Applebee's again.
Benihana.  It's just rolls off the tongue, doesn't it?  No, unfortunately not.at.all...anymore.  From hence forth, all mentions of Benihana are likely to cause anxiety in my usually calm heart.  I hate complaining like this. I really do. But sometimes, you just have to, ya know?\n\nTuesday evening I met a group of friends for a birthday dinner.  The reservation for our party of nine was for 7:00pm.  All but one of our party arrived prior to 7:00, but the hostess was curt in explaining that all party members needed to be present before we were seated, as our chef would be ready to begin meal preparation as soon as we were seated.  Fortunately, the final member of our party arrived shortly and we were seated at 7:05pm.  It was not until 7:40pm that first contact with our server was made. Without any apology for the delay she took our drink orders.  She (name withheld because I don't want to be rude) returned more than 10 minutes later with our drinks, but waited another 10-15 minutes after that to take our dinner orders.  As I was waiting I looked over at the table next to us, who were also clearly celebrating a child's birthday.  At one point the mother (I'm assuming) smiled at me and said, \"I hope you get out before midnight. We've been here over two hours.  We're taking our cake and getting out of here.\"\n\nUpon taking our orders, one of our guests explained that due to a shrimp allergy it was necessary to cook any shrimp ordered by our group in another area (a neighboring grill, etc.).  Our server said that she would have to ask the manager, who came to our table shortly thereafter.  When the manager arrived at the table my guest explained her allergy and his response was that it might be in her best interest to leave.  I'm giving him the benefit of the doubt that he meant leaving the table, not the restaurant, but I'm not certain of this. Following this recommendation he mentioned that she could wait in the bar as the rest of us dined table-side.  I asked him why it was not an option to prepare the shrimp at a neighboring table, but he expressed concern that other customers may require the use of the other available tables.  I understand his point, but the restaurant was near-empty as the hour quickly approached 8:30pm.  Finally, he offered to prepare the shrimp portions of our meals in the kitchen.  I'm not sure why this wasn't initially mentioned as an option, but I'll leave it at that.  \n\nOur chef Tom eventually arrived at our table. He was very pleasant and efficient during the course of our meal preparation.  During his time at the table my Emperor's Salad was delivered, as were the majority of my table's sushi orders.  However, two of our guests that ordered sushi were not served at this time.  In fact, they were not served until a full 10 minutes after the rest of our party finished our meals.  At one point, they inquired about the delay to she-whose-name-shall-not-be-mentioned, who responded that they were \"waiting for the rice.\"  When she delivered their food there was not a single mention of the delay.  \n\nTwo hours and thirty+ minutes after we arrived at Benihana, we left.  From start to finish, the entire evening was a terrible experience.  It was ridiculous to the point that there was not even soap or toilet paper available in the restroom.  Were it not for the kindness and professionalism of Tom (and the awesome company of friends), the night would have been a complete waste.  \n\nMy final thought is this. The food was fine, but because I was feeling particularly piggish on this Tuesday evening, I enjoyed two California rolls from my stash of Costco sushi at home before departing for the restaurant. The difference between Costco's rolls and Benihana's...a toss up - just sayin.  The good news is, this will give my friends something to whine about for YEARS to come...
Many great memories and great experience at Benihana BUT last night WAS NOT! Horrible service! Took 15 mins to even take a drink order...then when I had a question about a speciality wine the waiter says he didn't know so ok no big deal, could he go find.. NO! Told me to go the bar and ask the bartender. Really?!? Then the chef came out and was pretty good although cooked everything separate starting  with only onions and zucchini, where's the veggies?? From start to finish it was about half an hour! If we ate the dinner as a whole it would've been cold.. So we ate as we went. Also drink refills were a tough task too.. the chef had to keep asking other servers to assist. few and far between!! We had 3 birthdays at our table.. Not one song , which I didn't care, not one complimentary picture, no dessert was offered until another customer said something. Then the bill.. Oh the bill... That took another 15 mins!! At this point I told my family to go ahead home and I will wait considering this overall experience was almost a 2 hour ordeal. I was double charged on two items. At this point I was DONE dealing with this incompetent and appethetic waiter!!! Went to settle my bill with the manager who was nice and accommodating. Rectified the errors. And was generous with a $20 refund! I told him about the experience and all he said was \"I can take picture now for you\" UM... I was by myself!!! No thanks! One last thing, the male greeter needs some drug intervention.. He was high as a kite and made my daughter & I feel very uncomfortable to the point of invading our personal space and staring with those glazed over eyes as he staggered to and from his post. WOW & BOO!!! And sad : (
This is by the far the worst hibachi restaurant I have eaten at. The food is very bland from the onion soup to the fried rice (which basically was white rice with chopped onions) to the chicken (which was so pale it looked like it was boiled). Hibachi food typically has tons of flavor and tastes good because it has some grill marks and char, which none of our food had. I question whether it was even cooked on the hibachi table (we ate at a regular table but ordered from the hibachi menu). Not only was the food bad but the service was terrible. Our waiter didn't even know that hibachi dinners should come with the two sauces, he acted confused when I asked for them. Additionally, we ordered a sushi roll for an appetizer and instead of getting it before dinner, we received it after our dinner even though we saw it sitting at the sushi bar for a good 15 minutes beforehand. This restaurant may have been around for a long time but it doesn't even compare to other hibachi restaurants and was more expensive than any other I've eaten at.
This place is crappy the only veggies u get is onions and zucchinis took the server 30 min to serv us drinks then took them 20 min to take orders by the time the chef comes out already an hour just for the food and the show after we ate our waiter didnt even recommend anny desserts just gave us the chek and leave with out saying anny thing els o i for got we were still eating like wtf im still eating and so was mi family and u just give me the check the chef just left like five min ago . I recamen go sime where els n eat
This is the WORST Hibachi I have ever had.  We came here for a friends birthday, and I will never be going back. Service was mediocre, but the food was the real travesty.\nYou go to Hibachi for a show, but it's not fun when the cook makes the SAME Giant Eagle joke the entire time.  He also couldn't perform all the tricks that are pretty standard from Hibachi chefs.  The food. Not good.  My boyfriend ordered tofu and it was cold in the middle.  He didn't bother to have the guy heat it more, b/c it would have just been a hassle.  The chef forgot one friends meal completely and got rude with the server.  Then after everything was cooked, he looked at me and asked did you eat all your shrimp. I replied \"no, you never served me any.\" (I had ordered the chicken and shrimp.)  He then sends the server back into the kitchen to get more. By the time they were cooked, everyone was finished eating.  Come on.  To make matters worse, when we left we saw that he was the head chef. That doesn't say too much for the rest of them. \nI don't know how people keep coming here.  There is WAY better hibachi in Pittsburgh, for a lot less money.  I mean honestly, I paid $9.50 for a glass of Kendall Jackson. No. \nThe best part of the meal were the cupcakes that my friend brought.  Do your wallet and your stomach a favor and go to a different Hibachi place.  Benihana is not worth your time or money.
We went to the Mad Mex in Cranberry Twp and won't make the mistake of going back. \n\nThe food was horribly hot, like they just toss in heat for heat's sake, rather than for taste. I ordered the mole chicken enchiladas and that was NOT any kind of mole I've ever had. The sauce was more like a weak, thin ranchero sauce and both the sauce and the chicken was too hot. Even the guacamole was too hot. \n\nI recognize this restaurant chain is trying to be a trendy \"fusion\" of Tex-Mex and CA, but they failed. Luckily, they are in the same parking lot as a pharmacy so I was able to walk straight over for some Tums.\n\nIf you want GOOD Tex-Mex, go to El Campo in Monaca or El Paso Mexican Grill in Chippewa. Both restaurants are excellent examples of good Tex-Mex, similar to the styles typically served in Central California.
This afternoon I took my 4 year old to this mad mex for lunch after a great morning swimming and doing a yoga class.  We had to send back our food because the chicken was stone cold (even though surrounded by sizzling veggies on a skillet).  It seemed like it was yeterday's chicken.  They brought out fresh food and I'm kicking myself for having eaten it.  The rest of our day has been spent cleaning up food poisoning accidents and in the bathroom.
While I LOVE Mad Mex, this one is to be avoided.  For whatever reason, they always seem to manage to mess up orders and on a couple of occassions, I've just not felt well after eating there.  Because it's a BB, I just keep thinking I had to be wrong about that.  But after waking up in the middle of the night with all sorts of unpleasant stomach issues, I've had to write this location off.  Go to Robinson instead... (Or BB, please, please get a new KM for this location!)
Dirty and small.  Not laid out well.  Expired items on the shelves.  Rude cashiers.  Self check out usually broken.  Horrible experience more than once.  I don't shop here unless I have to.
The worst pulled pork sandwich I have ever had.    Their watermelon mixed drink was very good though.  I won't be returning.
Obviously, you aren't coming here because it is in any way cool, or because of the 80's decor. You got kids with you or others whose palette doesn't extend past burgers and fries. These limitations can be overlooked. What can't be forgiven, however, is the shabbiness of this place. It looks like it gets vacuumed once a week, and the bathrooms are disgusting.
Stopped for dinner there while traveling on business.  Greeted by a friendly hostess, seated and ignored.   After 25 minutes without a server, I left.  Will not recommend to anyone else passing through.  I don't know if all the wait staff didn't feel like serving one person because tips are smaller for one than a group or if they were just incompetent or just rude.  Extremely dissatisfied.
Went there on my first day in Pittsburg. Wasn't the best experience. My waitress was to busy talking to her coworkers that she couldn't even give us any sauces. The food was ok but nothing to great. When I go back to Pittsburg I will not be going there again!!!!
Absolutely horrible service, when we entered the hostess gave an audible sigh like we were inconveniencing her with our presence.  We were seated for over 10 minutes and never had a server come to even take drink orders.  Needless to say we left, and we will not be going back.
Frequently get take out from this place. Food usually fairly decent. Except we found some type of flying bug in the bottom of our rice container. Called to complain and they offered 20% off our next bill and did not sound surprised by our find. Considering the money we have spent there over the years I was highly upset. But they seemed to care less. Guess I have to drive to sesame next time.
Consumer alert... rats!
A while back my Mom bought some donuts from here and they were really stale by the next day.  She called and mentioned something about it to them and they didn't even seem to care.  I like to try and support local business but with an attitude like they showed I have no use for them.  Doesn't seem to be any real set hours so you never know when they will be open.
Darren's recent review of Kmart got me thinking about this place. I was out this way recently and I stopped to look for a place to eat. Man, talk about a dead mall! Parkway Center Mall even has its own listing on www.deadmalls.com I'd only been here once or twice back in its heyday. Back then it had Chi-Chi's (where thankfully I never ate. A hepatitis scare did them in), David Weis, Pharmor, CompUsa, Syms, etc were all here. \n\nNow the mall is mainly deserted. Only one floor is still open, and even that's got a vacancy rate of about 50%! Surprisingly what remains seems to be doing good business. Kmart is doing okay as is the Giant Eagle. Phantom of the Attic is alive and well and so is Pittsburgh Sports Deli. That's not an eatery either. It's a sports memorabilia store. \n\nThere wasn't much reason for me for me to linger here though.  I soon left and went over to Olive Garden for lunch.
What a depressing shell of a mall... \n\nI remember when it was *the* mall to go to... CompUSA, Pharmor, Kmart, Playless, Joann Fabrics, ChiChis, Giant Eagle... \n\nHell, CompUSA, ChiChis and Pharmor don't even exist anymore... I'm not sure if Kmarts are still in business. \n\nDead malls are sad, for some reason. Walking through this mall just creepy though.
Truly the worst mall in America.  Going here is like being in a time machine though.  There is a store called \"90's Nails\" for goodness sakes.\n\nHow is this place even still standing?  For one, I'm pretty sure it's built on an old mine or dig or something.  My mom has told me you can feel the ground move when you are here.  Yikes!\n\nThe Sports Deli is actually a gem of a store though.  Man, the rent has to be so cheap!\n\nI got to give a shout out to Petland (I think that's what it is/was called) the pet store in this mall where we got our Maltese pup Sno-Flake 17 years ago!  What a great dog!  :)
Honestly I don't consider this place a mall. I consider it to be the entryway I have to use to get into K-Mart. Sadly there are a few stores left still lingering around but hey, I'm sure the rent is reasonable considering the land is falling apart. Calling it a mall is like calling me an athlete it simply isn't true. When you can lists off the name of the stores on your fingers and still have a few left over then you need to go somewhere else.
Oy vey! Stay away, there's nothing here to see. Kmart, Phantom of the attic and a lottery place. This mall is dead! Deader than dead, dead dead!
I ordered food that I believed was gluten free.  Within twenty minutes I started to have symptoms and was sick for two days.  I believe that my food may have been gluten free but that cross contamination caused my problem.  I had the same experience at another Pittsburgh Olive Garden restaurant and so am concluding that they may not be careful with cross contamination.
Avoid at all costs!  They diluted my wine with water, the food was mushy, they charged me $3.25 for marinara sauce from A CAN (without informing us beforehand this injustice would be taking place)!  Typical big corporation: cut costs down to last nickel and inflate the prices so the CEO can fly in his private jet (after landing, eat at a REAL Italian restaurant) and purchase a new Bentley each year.  \n\nVisit DeBlasio's Restaurant for twice the portions; it is MUCH CHEAPER, as well.\n\nWorst experience at a restaurant... EVER!
Ten minute wait and easily most tables are open!!! Surprise it's lunch time!!!! I just passed six tables empty and clean. Beyond me...
This used to be the Holiday Inn and now it is the Clarion Hotel & Conference Center.  We needed to find a place not too far from Heinz Stadium for a reasonable price. We paid about $90 per night for this place, and the experience started poorly. We walked in and the two lobby TVs were tuned to Judge Judy (for the front desk employee's viewing pleasure). Employees watching reality TV during business hours really puts me off. It was hard to get the attention of the front desk staff because they were in the middle of a pizza order.  Two of the staff was working the front desk with a third suggesting toppings. It was pretty funny as one of clerks started to set up our room while another on the phone to the pizzeria kept interrupting the process with pizza questions. To the side the third clerk assisted with the pizza order. My wife pointed out her extreme cleavage, but I did not want to get lost there. We had a hard time understanding our clerk setting up the room. She tended to mumble, but did assert herself better when responding to pizza order questions. We finally got our room and headed up the very scary elevator to the 4th floor. In a way I felt as if we were at some sort of slum. I kept looking for gang tagging. The room was adequate (and I believe this was a renovated room), but a Motel 6 would be an upgrade. Whoever is doing the renovation has really poor taste and the quality of work is terrible. The swimming pool was a swamp (I am not kidding), but I am sure the frogs living in it were having a good time. The next morning we went down to the front desk again. This time the morning clerk was on a personal call and gave me an angry look because she felt that I was interrupting her call.  She did not even hang up; she just put the phone to her side, answered my question, and then continued her conversation. \n\nPersonally, I think this hotel would be great for a horror movie and Hollywood should contact this place. It needs to be knocked down, or management should tighten up the staff and improve construction quality. If construction is on track (and I suspect something is wrong), get staff that really is gracious to customers. There are people that need jobs out there and I assure you with proper management they will do a great job. Don't stay here for over $45 per night (the price is due to the breakfast offered). Personally I would not stay here until they fix the place, but for some reason I don't feel that it will ever happen. Something just feels wrong. Perhaps Clarion has stopped the remodel due to the economy.
Umm lol so seriously I read some reviews about this place and was like NOOOO it can't be that bad. HA HA....DUDE! So this spot is like mad cheap but REALLY? \n\nFirst we check in and notice the are undergoing some much needed renovations. Checkin was seamless as it should be. We get to out room #122 and after reading the reviews I know to check the beds immediately. The first bed legit has hair under the sheets...strike 1. As I'm pulling the covers back on the second bed I find two quarters...that's right folks! Obviously left by the last guest intentionally to warn the next occupants that the SHEETS HAVEN'T BEEN CHANGED...let alone checked. I mean really? You couldn't at lease have made it look like you did your jobs?\n\nWe go to the desk and make them aware of the issue. They apologetically get us another room. This room is better its evident by the way these beds were made that the room has been cleaned. The elevator by the desk is stuck on the 3rd floor lol death trap so we take the stairs. Thank God for yelp....You've all been warned lol SERIOUSLY!
This was technically the Clarion hotel so I think the name is wrong on the page. \n\nI'd like to start by saying that I'm not much of a complainer, but if could have given 0 stars, I would have. \n\nSo we are on our way up to room when we passed a vending machine with water underneath it. I assumed it was leaking and brushed it off. I don't care that much about little things like that especially since we were just sleeping there. After a great hockey game and a bar crawl, we came back to the hotel and got ready for bed. There was absolutely no hot water for my shower. So cold I wouldn't even consider hopping in really quick. It was late so I let it go and decided to try again in the morning. When I woke up it was the same thing. At this point I was fuming. I NEED a shower man!\n\nSo I put on my angry pants and headed down the hall towards the elevator. Right in front of the elevator door there is a water fall pouring out of the ceiling from the third floor. \"What the hell....\" is pretty much what I was thinking at this point. Well there was my shower considering I had to walk through it to continue on my quest. As soon as the elevator doors open to the first floor, I see the hallway is flooded. The carpet is squishing beneath my feet all the way to the front desk where other angry people had beaten me to. Apparently a pipe had burst the day before and they had neglected to tell us that when we had checked in. I was so mad. I managed to get 70% off our bill and I made her call to check us in at another hotel. I would have insisted the whole bill be paid for but I'm really bad at being mean to people. All in all, I will never stay here or any other branch of this hotel again.
we checked out 4 rooms just to see what it was like, moldy ceilings,  musty smells, unclean rooms, and such a huge renovation job it should be shut down or discounted by 99%! thank god hotwire gave us a refund.
Nightmare.  It's a ghost town. Needles in parking lot. \"Lobby\" is a hotel room with undesirables hanging around. Asked to see our rooms before checking in, given the key, room was filthy.  Saw a sticky note re: bedbugs.  Bolted, as fast as possible.
I'm not sure I can even give this place one star. To be fair, the room we had was clean and comfortable. It did seem as if we had entered a time warp, though. Furnishings and bedding from the 70's...if not 60's! I've seen this place rated up to 3 stars on some websites. I'd like to know their qualifications!!\nWhen you first approach the hotel, it looks closed down. (And write obviously, it should be!!) You enter through a side entrance with hand written signs. The\"office\" is a room right inside the doors. The hallway looks a wreck! (Oh yeah...they're under construction!!) Dirt, filth, and stains everywhere. Electrical wires exposed, smoke detectors hanging down. You look at all this and wonder how in the world are they passing codes?? (Or are they?!? Hmmmm)\nLike I said...the room was better..although not without faults. The lights over the bathroom sink did not work, and the shower did not work well. The tv was definitely a 1980's model. Wireless internet?? What a joke!! \nWhen we reported the bathroom issues, they said they would move us to another room. Since we were only staying 2 nights, we thought we would stay and just have maintenance look at it in the morning. We were informed maintenance would not be in tomorrow!! (Our ever??)\nWe told the lady working the \"front desk\" that this hotel was pretty scary. Her reply was, \" yeah, we get that a lot!\"
Ah, yes, what has yet to be said about this Clarion in Greentree, which is commonly known as the hotel of perpetual construction? Check the reviews folks (I sure wish I had) and you'll see that this place has been under construction for at least four years!\nMy family, and I'm sure countless others, initially had trouble even finding the place and had to humble ourselves to ask directions at the nearby Doubletree Hotel. But even with directions, we drove right past the Clarion because: 1). There are no hotel signs; 2). We were arriving at night and the building was completely dark; 3). There were no parked cars visible from the road; and 4). The entire front of the building was boarded up.\nWhen we located the correct driveway and approached the construction zone, which once represented the entrance to the hotel, we saw a tiny sign directing us to the \"Temporary Lobby\" in the back of the hotel. The makeshift lobby consisted of a hotel room with a clerk sitting at a desk. The clerk initially could not locate our reservation on her computer, but found it as soon I had dug through my luggage to find a copy of the confirmation email.\nWe were given a room on the second floor, thus we walked past stairwells that were closed (because of endlessly drying 'wet paint') and an out-of-order (and leaking) ice machine, until we located the elevator. Well, let me tell you folks, Disney's Tower of Terror ride is less frightening than this elevator. It looked like one of those service elevators that the public never sees. The floor was covered in dead bugs and the ceiling had holes in it, leading to the conclusion that someone must have taken the globes off the ceiling lights and just dumped the dead bugs onto the floor.\nWhen we got to our room, the carpet was so covered with nasty grease stains that we wanted to keep our shoes on. We did the preliminary check of the beds and found some stained sheets, but thankfully no bugs. We also checked for the free Wi-Fi signal and found that it was completely useless (maybe that's why the desk clerk couldn't locate our reservation).\nFinding the complimentary breakfast in the morning was like a scavenger hunt, where you look for clues on small paper signs in the hallways. The adventure actually took me outside of the hotel and then back into another part of the building (thankfully it wasn't raining like it had been all night). I then realized that I had just entered the main construction zone and the outside route must be the only passable route to the dining area.\nThere was yet another sign outside the dining room which said something about Complementary Breakfast and the strange phrase \"Gratuity Included.\" But inside the dining room there were at least two clearly-marked 'Tip Jars.' Now, I've been at some pretty trashy hotels in my travels, but I've never seen a tip jar in the dining room. I've also never been in a hotel dining room where it looked like a bomb had gone off, but there were drop cloths, power tools and all sorts of debris everywhere.\nWhen I got in line for the grub, I learned how the attendant earned her tips: she was there to help patrons identify the food. The person in front of me inquired about the gray-looking sausage-like links and was dutifully informed that they represented turkey sausage, adding, \"Because Clarion cares about your health.\" I'm not kidding (who could make something like that up?). Anyway, I tried this so-called health food, because the only other hot alternative was French Toast and I did not want any syrupy food that morning. Guess what? The sausage had some kind of sugary additive to make the links taste like syrup! Real healthy, right? Thus, I ended up just getting a cup of coffee and returning to my room to pack up. The coffee was okay, by the way.\nIn conclusion, I would not have stayed at the Greentree Clarion had I not made prior reservations and had not been coming back after midnight following a music festival where it rained all day. Plus, we used our loyalty points for this room, so I couldn't even request a discount.\nBelieve me, HUD would shut this place down if it was an apartment building and the Dept. of Homeland Security would never even consider housing immigrants there. But, of course, you and I are welcome to pay upwards of a hundred bucks a night to stay there.
This was by far the worst hotel experience I've ever had. It wasn't just that there was MASSIVE construction going on, but they did nothing to accommodate for it. They put us in a dirty floor with exposed ceilings, spackle, and sheetrock everywhere. The lights were broken and the room was filthy. \n\nThe second room they out me in had an air conditioning unit that wouldn't reach the outlet, rendering it useless in the middle of the summer, had no toilet paper and water all over the bathroom floor. \n\nThe CHILDREN working the front desk, which was located in a hotel room, gave the worst customer service, greeted me with an attitude, and couldn't manage to pull themselves away from their own conversation long enough to even check me in in a timely manner. \n\nThe worst. Do not stay here.
Wish I could give this place negative stars. Where to begin? It begins with no signs saying where the hotel is at. And then it goes into their \"temporary lobby\" which is a room turned into an office. The whole place is under construction which wouldn't be so bad, but my gosh they have crap EVERYWHERE!!! That leads us to the elevator. Norman bates would even say it's too creepy for him. It's marked with two different hotel names on top of that, holiday inn and ramada. Then the room. Not the worst of the worst, the decor is nice, the bed is as hard as a rock and the shower isn't even properly installed. Really wish I would have looked at yelp before booking here. Buyer beware. Oh yea! AND I knew they were under construction before we booked in June, and we were promised that the construction would be done before hand. Extremely disappointed.
What a crock!   The thin bagel (with asparagus/mushrooms, swiss)...you get mostly cheese...it doesn't look at all like the picture on your website depicting a load of asparagus smothered in mushrooms...so full of it; definitely not worth the price. \n(this was the one in Greentree)
Worst effin Starbucks on the block and their baristas suck at making drinks. Horrible customer service and they ALWAYS screw up our orders. I just don't understand why they're so lazy. I understand their comprehension level is low because of the lack of education though. But, if you hate your job, don't take it out on the loyal customers! Your life sucks, we get it, but you have ONE job at Starbucks, so do it right. It's not hard.
Came here for a \"quick\" breakfast on our way from the hotel to Fallingwater, and regretted the decision immensely.\n\nExtremely long lines, and poorly trained staff. As a former employee, I know about staff roles and approximately how long it should take to receive your drink. This staff was not trained at all, and it was clear that they were overwhelmed with the crowd. It took me 32 minutes for me to receive my order (there were 7 customers in front of me), and my order was incorrect. I ordered a small coffee, medium latte, a croissant and a sausage breakfast sandwich. I know that the sausage sandwiches heat up for about 40 seconds in oven, so I can't comprehend why it took so long to get my order. Would never come here again. I also received a WARM cheese danish instead of my croissant. First, the warm, creamy colored goo in the middle is extremely unappetizing, and second, they looked so dejected when I pointed out that I ordered a croissant I almost just left.\n\nDo not recommend.
I guess this will be my last good review for Princess nails. Unfortunately the worst possible thing has happened. I have one eyebrow! Its slowly growing back but the idea of having to pencil in my eyebrow everyday is starting to get to me. \n\nUnfortunately I don't know what happened? Michelle are you going blind? Are you okay? Obviously you left me with completely a mishapen eyebrows which I had to have someone else fix because you botched mine. I cried, I weeped, i found myself in the fetal position. I'm no longer going back. \n\nI know some people have off days but this was BAD.
By far the worst Shellac manicure I have ever had. I went down on my lunch break for a quick mani. First the woman rushed through my \"manicure.\" I'm not sure they have any type of sanitizer for their instruments as she kept pulling things out of her drawer. The manicure was very quick and not at all thorough. Once she started to paint my nails she kept having to fix them because she was in a such a rush. She took off polish that was on the nail and then pushed my hand into the UV dryer. When she went to put the top coat on my Shellac she put the Foundation coat on 2 of my nails before she realized and wouldn't fix them saying they will be fine. During the entire process she did about 6 eyebrow waxes and then would forget where she was in my process. She also kept forgetting to turn on the UV dryer to the point where she walked away and I had to turn it on.\n\nDo not go here. If I could give it 0 stars I would.
I got a good haircut here a few months ago, so this one-star review is not intended for the stylists.  It is a response to a strict no-returns policy on salon products, which makes me pretty mad: I couldn't have known they recommended the wrong product without trying it, and now that I tried it, they won't refund my purchase.  Catch-22.  I came in to buy a replacement for my normal bumble and bumble curl creme for thick hair, and was told by the receptionist that bumble and bumble's \"defining creme for fine curls\" is the new packaging of that product (which seemed weird to begin with...thick hair..fine curls...) Nope, it's totally different and it doesn't work for me.  I used it twice, figured that out, and now I'm stuck with an expensive product I can't use. I called bumble and bumble and they told me that the product I use has been discontinued.  All my previous salons in other cities would have honored a return in this situation.  I won't be back to MCN.
I have been sitting here looking at the poor quality of my shellac manicure and I just had to write. I walked in to Kenny's nail salon this afternoon and was pleased that there wasn't a wait. They also provided very friendly customer service.\n\nHowever, my manicure looks terrible! It looks like I painted my nails myself, only even I could do better. The paint and clear gel is all over the underside of my nails and baked on, no less. I'm even finding paint on my fingers now. The nail technician, a female, didn't even touch my cuticles, but she did use an electric file to shave down the nail bed. I guess that's supposed to count for the cuticles? No frills, no hand massage, not even any moisturizer or cuticle oil or anything.\n\nI am horrified I was charged $25 and then I even tipped 20%. Now I'm wishing I would have asked them to start over, perhaps with a different nail technician. I won't be going back, however. At least I was in and out in 25 minutes. But what a terrible job.
Very sloppy! No attention the polish is all over my fingers so disappointing and aggravating that now I'm going to have to pay more money else where to get them redone
They suck!! First of all not even 24 hours after I got acrylics one broke, then they painted on the french white tips which is fine, however they did such a poor job. When I came back to ask for a refund they were very rude about it and refused to help. I have gotten my nails done almost for a year and I have never seen such a poor job. DO NOT GO HERE.
The worst experience ever. I have never complained about my nails bc im pretty laid back but this was insane. The man that was doing my nails had an incredibly shaky hands, cut me more times than I can count, and have the nails literally one and a half times the size of my nail beds. I got pink and white and the white was not uniform among any of the nails and usually wasn't even uniform from one side of the nail to the other . . On 1 of my nails the white was 3 eights of an inch on 1 side and 1 eighth on the other. The equipment to scrub the nails was unsanitary and in a dirty cup. I have never had such a negative experience anywhere and I kept trying to explain what was wrong to the man and he just wouldn't listen. He did not smooth down any of the nails until the third time I complained about it. I spent $85 at the salon and have to go and get them redone by a different technician tomorrow because I don't even trust them to redo their mistakes
I wish i could give this place no stars! we sat for lunch after a lunch rush there were 2 other table in the restaurant besides ours, we ordered a blt with chili and a cesar salad....1 hour latler a stale BLT and chili that looked like it had been sitting there for 2 hours comes out. I was still waiting for my cesar salad. The chili was cold and the blt bread was so hard you couldnt bite into it. When we asked to speak to the manager the waitress got very defensive... the manager came over and explained that is their food and how its made so he wasnt sure of the problem. After an argument going back and forth ensued he agreed to comp the meals. Here is the kicker haha...we were going to leave the waitress a tip because clearly it was not her fault however, she came over and asked if our problem was resolved we said yes and then she rolled her eyes and walked away. No tip for you my friend. This is not how you do business especially when there are other options BESIDES SOHO to choose from for lunch.
Nice looking place and the worst service i've had in the last 20 years.   After waiting 10 minutes to have a bartender at a less than half full bar acknowledge us we then ordered and the drinks arrived.  Hope you only need one round because after waiting 30 minutes to try to order a second round we paid with exact change to save us from wasting another hours of our life.   It is hard to explain how oblivious the bar tenders were.
No redeeming qualities here. Schwill on tap. Food was terrible - had the pizza, mac & cheese bites, and spinach & artichoke dip.  It was hardly edible. Stay away.
Stayed @ the hotel. Ordered sirloin steaks. No steak knife, no mashed potatoes, no asparagus as ordered. So, Check your order. I mean for a 2 person $50 meal with tip I would hope the waitstaff would deliver on what was ordered & asked before we left. \n\nBut skip the 20%, $10 room service fee & http://www.sohopittsburgh.com. walk downstairs.
Terrible.\n\nI visited this restaurant for the first time yesterday to use up a Groupon.  Thank God I didn't pay full price for this slop.  \n\nFirst, lets talk about the decor.  Others have commented about the outdated 80s look of the place. I concur.  The chairs are ridiculously heavy and uncomfortable.  And don't even get me started on the hideous glass constructions hanging from the ceiling.  \n\nSecond, let talk about the staff.  Unprofessional to say the least.  When we were waiting for our table, I witnessed the hostess yell at a man from across the restaurant, instead of walking up to him and guiding him to his party.  \"Hey Anthony, your party's over here!\"  Ridiculous. \n\nThis restaurant has an open kitchen, which is usually a good thing - but not when everyone's yelling at each other.  We were seated near the kitchen and, I'm not exaggerating, heard someone yell \"order!\" approximately every 30 seconds.  Staff yelled at each other from across the restaurant constantly.  I felt like I was on a playground.  \n\nOur waitress was a nice, sweet girl, and she did the best she could considering the environment she was in.  I have no complaints about her.  \n\nThe food, though... Jesus.  We started with the \"margarita shrimp cocktail\".  Imagine tiny round pieces of popcorn shrimp floating in a glass of lime flavored water.  These were served with tortilla chips, which you'd think were meant to be used to scoop up the shrimp from the glass.  But, the shrimp are solid round balls, not a scoopable salsa.  We tried picking up the shrimp with the chips, but they'd just roll off and end up on the floor.  My date and I just laughed as we TRIED to eat this concoction.  When it finally made it into our mouths, it was gross anyway.  \n\nMy boyfriend ordered a sushi/sashimi combo platter.  I'm being generous by giving it a rating of mediocre.  Take out sushi from a grocery store is better.  \n\nNow, I admit, I made the mistake here - I ordered the fried fish platter.  I'm used to getting a variety at seafood restaurants.  At a place like Mitchell's Fish Market, you can get a dish with a piece of fish, a few scallops, a few shrimp, and a vegetable.  The Original Fish Market has no such dish.  The only dish I could get that had more than just one piece of fish with some plain steamed white rice and steamed spinach, was the fried fish platter.  So, I ordered that, with a side of green beans (vegetables were $5 - $7 extra).\n\nThe description said I would get a piece of tilapia, scallops, oysters, shrimp, and french fries.  I didn't realize this meant that the tilapia was fried, the scallops were fried, the oysters were fried, and the shrimp was fried, all on top of a giant bed of fried french fries.  It's just not what I pictured.  Like I said, it was my mistake for not reading carefully and not asking the waitress, but lets say for argument's sake that this is what I wanted.  \n\nIt was still disgusting.  The batter/flavor was exactly the same for everything.  The scallops tasted like the french fries.  The shrimp tasted like the french fries, the tilapia tasted like the french fries.  I didn't even try the oysters, but I'm pretty sure they would have tasted like french fries.  I ate barely a quarter of this dish, and I'm pretty sure I consumed an entire week's worth of saturated fat.  If you ate this entire plate, I think a heart attack would interrupt your dessert.\n\nThe green beans were good. \n\nOther people commented that you can't count on hotel restaurants being worthwhile.  I have to agree.  If everyone's just passing through, you don't have to worry about actually impressing anyone and getting them to come back.  And with business travelers, they're usually paying with their company's dime, so they don't bother to complain or expect much.\n\nI have learned my lesson.  I'm not coming back.  And I seriously question the sanity of people who gave this place more than two stars.
I have never had such awful, inedible food at such an appallingly ridiculous price. It's not only a failure in execution, the plates are very poorly put together, and the flavors of the sides and sauces with the protein do not marry well at all. I was severely disappointed by plating, and then just got mad when I started eating.\nYou would think for 44$ your steak would at least be properly cooked. What was supposed to be medium, came raw. The steak was tough and tasteless. \nAhi tuna, asked rare, was overcooked; also bland, even with the sauce. The oshinko side was laughable. Seriously. I laughed. \n\n pasta was overcooked, and by the time it got to us, the sauce was laminated with coagulating fat. \nThe sushi was an amatuer attempt at best.  There was too much rice, and presentation was sad. \nAmbience is tacky. Ugly 80s-reminiscent wallpaper covers half the room and framed sketches of fish plaster the other half.\nService was the only redeeming quality. \nTo put it in perspective, my neighborhood Houlihans seems gourmet next to this place.
We were staying at the Westin and it was late and the Original Fish Market was right on site. Well the experience at both the hotel and the restaurant was dismal. We waited too long to be seated and the hosted seemed to have attitude when we asked one of the servers to find her. A simple \"Sorry for the wait\" would have been nice. We were about to leave after waiting 15 mins for a waiter. Unfortunately we did not.  The food was all bland and tasteless. Oh! Except for the bold taste of Obay on the fries. I had blackened rainbow trout.  I expected a bold favors but yet nothing. It was not even blackened.  Looked like paprika for color, but that was it.  Mash potatoes were dry and tasted gritty like it came from a box. We skipped dessert for obvious reasons. I am not adverse to paying top dollar for a great meal. I hate paying top dollar for a lousy meal that I could have done better myself.\n\nDo yourself a favor and avoid the Original Fish Market.  I was generous to give one star.
Terrible crab bisque. My husband liked the fish stew though.  It had lots of beans, was thick and chili-like. The rest of the lunch was so unnoteworthy, I can't remember what I ordered, though almost all of it was still on the plate at the end of lunch.  I do remember the bad taste in my mouth for the rest of the day.
Literally the worst restaurant experience that I've ever had, including McDonald's and 24-hour scarf-and-barf diners.\n\nPittsburgh is undergoing a bit of a food renaissance, yet the Original Fish Market continues to put out an inferior product in a horrendous atmosphere at an obscene price.  \n\nOur fish was tasteless and rubbery, my white wine came out at room temperature, the restaurant was extremely dirty, and our server was clearly apathetic.  \n\nThe Original Fish Market opened in 1998, and quickly found a place in the market in a city where Red Lobster was still considered \"good seafood\".  As top-notch restaurants entered the market, the local palates grew up in a big way.  The Original Fish Market seems content to remain frozen in time competing as a mediocre option in an under served market space.  Unfortunately for them, their market space is now flooded with options offering a far superior product  at a fraction of the price.
This place really should be much higher quality for first the prices and second the only food option at the Westin.  I stopped by here two nights ago on a work trip to grab some food.  The wine that I ordered was out (which was fine) and substituted - but for a place with a giant wine cellar I wouldn't suspect that should be an issue for the glass wines.\n\nWhen I went to order I asked the server how the scallops were - and asked her to be honest.  She said that they are the most well done in Pittsburgh.  Well I think she meant that literally because the scallops were as tough as a tire and there presentation was poor with a pile of over salty spinach and some kinds of blobs smeared around the plate.  I was a little bummed about my experience when the 55 dollar bill came for one entree and a glass of wine.\n\nAlso a one off thing but the overhead light on the table was like a 10K watt surgical spotlight.  It actually hurt my eyes to look at the table it was so bright.  That should be an easy adjustment for the management.  Food quality on the other hand - you need a new chef.
DIDN'T EAT HERE...this review not about the food.  We went on Friday night around 8pm, there seemed to be about 25% occupancy.  The hostess asked us if we had a reservation, we didn't , and she told us that they were somewhat behind and that we would have to wait 20-30 minutes.  WTF?  We IMMEDIATELY left and frankly its not worth going back again.  shame, the fish was good there. Crappy hostess for sure.
Stopped in for lunch. No greeter so we weren't sure where to go. Super expensive for the portions. My salad had dressing only in the center. The rest was dry. My sweet potato fries that came with breaded shrimp tasted BBQ-ish  weird. But the worst was that my breaded shrimp actually had a curly hair cooked into the bread ing. It was disgusting. The waitress apologized and offered to replace but my appetitive was gone by then. She however did not offer to comp the meal. I would absolutely not return nor recommend it to anyone. Way too overpriced and the hair was a disgusting unwanted bonus :-(
Not good. I suspect the servers are over worked or spread too thin b/c the service sucked. The food was ok, but nothing special. It's a shame b/c better service would have made the experience decent.
Never been before and went on a Thursday night at 6PM before a show. Upon arriving, all the good seating near the windows was blocked off for private use (and remained unused). The \"host\" told us to go find our own seating wherever we wanted. The setup is interesting with a large open bar area and a small number of tables around the perimeter. We took a seat at a table. The bar seating was fairly full with some milling around in the area and standing, and probably a total of 30 people there. We saw at least 5-6 staff, a couple sitting around playing on their phones.\n\nWe sat at our table for 20 minutes and never had a single person come by, not to say we will be there shortly, not to take a drink order, nothing. We could tell this wasn't going to be good so left and no one even noticed.\n\nIt was a little more bar than restaurant, so we weren't sad to leave.
Extremely disappointed.    My wife and I walked into the restaurant to have the hostess tell us that is was open seating.   Okay, that's fine..... as we walk to find our table I'm wondering 'why don't the just have a sign there because she wasn't  very friendly, nor timely with the direction.'    That said, we sat down at a table set up for dining that was nicely presented.   Unfortunately we sat at the table for approximately five minutes without recognition from any employee at the restaurant.   At this point, we decided to dine elsewhere.   As we walked out, there was still not one bit of attention given, again.   The hostess never lifted her head from whatever she was reading.   I think that a sign would have served a much better purpose.   On the back side it could have said \"thanks for your business\" .....or lack, there of.
The menu was small and underwhelming. The flatbread pizza most likely came out of the box. They didn't have the sauces, so the gave us ketchup to go with over cooked shrimp/bacon and extremely greasy fries.
I ... don't know why I keep going back to Olive or Twist. Seriously, you could check my Foursquare stats and see that I've been to this bar more frequently than any place I've ever called my favorite spot in Pittsburgh. \n\nWhy? I moved up here from Orlando to be with my boyfriend who I had just started dating. I moved because Orlando on a whole sucks and I was ready to get out. My boyfriend used to play in a band as does one of his best friends now. This was their favorite spot to hang out out because all of the (female) bartenders know and love them. They used to get free or greatly reduced drinks, could be as loud and obnoxious as they wanted, etc. etc. - the ush. \n\nI tag along now because I didn't know many people in this city at first, obviously. The bar is way too small for the number of people who try to pack in at night. I've had several items off of the menu and they all left a lot to be desired. The drinks are poured strongly. At first I thought this was because the bartenders knew how the boys liked their drinks, but now I realize they're just heavy handed. \n\nNothing here really sticks out for me. I can get the drinks properly made elsewhere for the price. Same with the food. I guess the only reason I agree to go back time after time is because of two of the bartenders - Amy and Linda. Those two are the most kick ass bartenders in Pittsburgh. Considering I currently live in Heinz, it's also pretty damn close, which works in its favor (can't wait to move ... ). \n\nOlive or Twist has a great location and, if Amy and/or Linda are working, you're sure to enjoy yourself. Just keep those expectations low.
We were in Pittsburgh for one night and Olive or Twist was near our hotel.  There were many other restaurants, but this place looked nice.  The atmosphere was nice, and if I was rating only for atmosphere I'd give it 4 stars.  However, I'm mainly rating their food and service.  We were greeted promptly, but after that the service was spotty and it took awhile to receive our drinks/food even though there weren't many people in the dining room.  \n\nI ordered the Traditional French Dip Sandwich and Fries.  I enjoy a good French Dip and have tried many of them at all types of restaurants and this one was the worst I've ever eaten. In fact, I couldn't finish it.  The meat tasted like old lunch meat and the bread was nothing more than a cheap, glorified hot dog roll that was soggy.  It wasn't soggy from the Au Jus, but it tasted like they steamed the roll for some reason.  \n\nOverall, if I was going back to Pittsburgh in this area, I would stay far away from Olive or Twist.
I've actually had OK experiences at this place in the past but this trip was especially bad. \n\nI tried to stop here with my husband for an appetizer and a drink before heading into the theater district - bad move.  Upon being seated the server explained that they were no longer serving food because of a water leak or something unsanitary-sounding. Klassy. \n\nFor reasons I truly can't explain, we decided to stay for a beer before heading to our destination. We both threw down a brew nasty, paid and left. Unfortunately for Olive or Twist, the visit would probably be our last.\n\nOn a positive note, there was an interesting man setting up for what looked like a live acoustic set. His warm-up sounded good but we left before he really got started. \n\n\nWhen it's all said and done, we should have just went to the Sharp Edge down the street. Probably a much safer bet for future endeavors.
Owner or manager was very rude when we presented our yelp deal.
This bar is cramped, overpriced, and the service is unbelievably slow. Happy Hour runs 4-6, so you'll show up at 5, have no place to sit or stand, and will only be able to get *maybe* 2 drinks during happy hours You'll then be told that the upstairs (which is actually not bad) will be opening at 5, even though you're asking at 5:20 (this has seriously happened all three times I've been there).\n\nSeriously, avoid this place. When one of your co-workers suggests a work happy hour, direct them anywhere else.
Very disappointed.  I had been to Olive or Twist for drinks and really enjoyed it but had never been there for a meal.  I was going to a show at the Benedum with a friend and made reservations about a week and a half before the show.  We arrived about 15 minutes early for our 6:00 reservation expecting we may not be able to be seated yet.  The problem is that even though I called and made a reservation (including the person answering the phone taking my name and phone number and repeating the date and time) we were told there was no reservation for our name.  The hostess said something along the lines of \"are you sure you called here to make a reservation and not somewhere else\"  Yes, I'm pretty sure I called the right restaurant...  She kept looking at the room of empty tables, looking at the book and then looking at us.  After a few minutes of back and forth, she told us the lounge upstairs was open and we were welcome to grab a table up there.  So we trudged upstairs.  All that was available were small high top tables.  Being a Friday night, it was packed with the happy hour crowd and was pretty noisy.  Not really the environment we were looking for but we decided to make the most of it.\nWe started with the Buffalo Chicken Dip appetizer.  It is served in a martini glass with toasted/fried pita chips.  It was tasty and we were surprised at how much dip there actually was.  \nThe problems with food began with the pacing of the meal.  We had our appetizer for under five minutes when our entrees came out.  It may not have been a big deal if we were at a real table in the restaurant downstairs, but being at the high top bar tables, we had no room for our drinks, appetizer and meal.  We found ourselves stacking stuff and pulling things off the table in order to fit everything.  It was frustrating.  Not to mention that we would either have to let our entrees get cold as we finished the appetizer or let the appetizer get cold as we ate our entrees.  \nWith as much as we enjoyed the appetizer, we were looking forward to our meals. Unfortunately, they were very disappointing.  My friend ordered the french dip sandwich with a side of mashed potatoes.  Her potatoes were ice cold and sandwich luke warm.  When she mentioned it to the server, the server said \"so would you like me to take them back or are they ok\"  When would cold mashed potatoes ever be OK?  When her potatoes were brought back warmed, she was disappointed because they were called \"garlic mashed\" but she said they were pretty bland with not much garlic at all.\nI ordered the Caribbean Jerk Chicken.  It was described as \"grilled chicken seasoned with jerk spices, pepper jack cheese, garlic mayo and pineapple chutney on a Kaiser roll\"  No mention of a tomato.  When I got the sandwich, there were three tomatoes on it.   Thankfully I just dislike tomatoes and it wasn't an allergy issue.  There was also no pineapple chutney.  When I asked about it, the server told me they use a sauce and it must have been soaked into the roll.\nOverall, very disappointed.  I wanted to love Olive or Twist because I really enjoyed the time I had visited for a drink, but the dining experience was sorely lacking, especially for a dinner that was supposed to be a nice laid back start to our girl's night out.
At the request of a friend, we had a brief girls night out at Olive or Twist. My first impression was the outdated decor. The restaurant has carpet which I find off putting. The drink menu is extensive; but, with the exception of one person in my party, we each found our drinks far too sweet. I ordered the cucumber basil martini, which was so sweet I had to send it back. The food was mediocre. I ordered the burger medium and it was over cooked to nearly well done. And then there was the cheesy lounge singer who sang a mishmosh of singer songwriter tunes from the 80s. The music was so loud and so bad that my friends I left and headed down the street to Butcher and the Rye.
I stopped in last night for a drink with a group of friends... we were in town visiting and I had been wanting to try this place out since we walked past it on the last trip... what a disappointment.  The server was prompt to greet us and drop off drink menus, but then she failed to return to take our order for at least 20 minutes.  It would've been different if she had been slammed, but the entire time she was standing by the bar, just talking to her coworkers.  By the time she came to take our order we were ready to leave... and we should have... the martinis were not good and the server's disposition left much to be desired.  When we were ready to leave she made us feel like it was a bother to split our tabs between the five of us.  The one positive of the place was that I liked the ambiance, but it wasn't enough to make up for everything else being lackluster.  What I was hoping to be a great ending to the night turned into a dismal experience that put everyone in a bad mood.
Completely agree with Deborah: decent sandwich on absolutely horrible bread - mealy tomato and brown lettuce, too.  I know it was only $4/$7 for a 6\"/12\" sub, but it was pretty bad.  (I bought a 12\", intending to take half home for later, but I wound up throwing the second half away, and I NEVER throw away food.)  \n\nAs a Italian grocery, it seems okay, but the attitudes are a little snippy, and it's a pretty grungy-looking place.
The italian coldcut sub was a travesty! Lots of STALE bread with skimpy meat portions, and no hots or flavor. Bread better suited for pigeons than people. I can find better Italian sandwiches back home in Baltimore. We'll feed these to our dogs when we get home.  You get what you pay for. Avoid this tourist trap!
First time in Pittsburgh, from Chicago. \n\n1. NO ONE SEEMS TO KNOW HOW THE PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION SYSTEM WORKS.\n2. What is with the silly system of paying on your way out sometimes? It seems like the dumbest idea ever.\n3. Where are the reloadable transit cards?\n4. Why are the conductors so incredibly angry?\n5. Why do I need to request a stop on the \"T\"?\n\nOf the public transportation systems I've used, this is definitely the most confusing so far. Even if the website had an easier to understand fare explanation.\n\nLearn from the CTA. I have a new appreciation for Chicago Transit Authority.
Last night marked the second time in a week that I waited 30 minutes or more for a 71B in the freezing cold rain.   I was 5 minutes early for the bus I was trying to catch.  I can understand a delay during rush hour, but this was not.  The bus was running every 20 minutes both times, according to the PAT schedule. When I gave up last night and went into my apartment, it was an additional 10 minutes before the bus went by...So let's review: I waited a total of 45 minutes for a bus that was supposed to be coming past every 20 minutes.  For shame!\n\nFrom now on, I'll be hoofing it across the East End instead of buying a bus pass.  It will be cold, but at least I'll be moving.
Don't ever get too comfortable with PAT--- they end up swiping everything out from under your feet, and then charging you a crapload for it.  I can't believe they're slashing more routes, and charging more!  Why would I pay you for continual service downgrades?!!?  You're not even offering a bus to the airport anymore here soon--- Do you know how many people ride that bus to WORK at/around the airport.  I tell you what.... Whoever runs your company is A DUMBASS to the 10th degree.\n\nGet your shit together.  Seriously.  Id rather walk from my work downtown, to my home in Oakland (thats an hour walk, and MORE than a mile) while Im 8 months pregnant,  than pay you assholes to take me home. \n\n\nP.S. I didnt even want to give it ONE star.
I don't understand why Pittsburghers routinely put up with the idiocy that is our public transportation system.  Port Authority of Allegheny County is public transportation with massive, severe, permanent brain damage.  Unreliable, buses routinely don't come at all during heavy commuting times (like when you're trying to get to work on time), many of the drivers are assholes, the fare doubled in a decade and the service was cut in half.  The county refuses to fund it.  Getting on and off is confusing.  When to pay is confusing.  The schedules are hard to read.  The service isn't frequent enough.  The subway system only goes to one neighborhood from downtown.  This is horrible and it's one of the main things keeping Pittsburgh from being as great a city as it can be.  Call center people are sometimes rude and mostly unresponsive.  What else?  The buses smell like urine.  Sucks, sucks, sucks.  I live 3 miles from downtown and I commute by walking every day, to and from, because Port Authority of Allegheny County buses suck that bad.
Port Authority of Allegheny County employs some very, very bad drivers.\n\nA driver deliberately cut me off a few minutes ago on Liberty Avenue downtown. Further, the driver did not express that he was sorry for cutting me off and forcing me to swerve into oncoming traffic. \n\nThe driver is a middle-aged man. He was driving the G2 bus. The bus number is 5525. \n\nI will call the Port Authority in a few minutes to lodge my complaint; however, I wanted to lodge it here too for two reasons. First, the complaint bears on the Port Authority's ability to keep its riders safe (because the driver almost caused an accident, which could have resulted in injuries to the riders of the bus). Second, if this driver causes an accident in the future, I hope this complaint will help injured parties make a case for negligent retention or negligent supervision against the Port Authority.
First off:  I'm a picky eater, so take this with a grain of salt.\n\nOkay, I'm not from pittsburgh.  I am not overweight, not a hipster, not on any of the plethora of drugs, I own my own home,  Probably most of all, I've never heard anything about this place before walking in, so I had no idea what to expect besides \"Lets get breakfast.\"\n\nIf you are the opposite of any of these points, this place is probably worth a try for you.\n\nWe had a horrendous wait, but I think that was a complete fluke:  we had a huge group and there was an event that weekend...I don't think anyone with less than 3-4 had that long of a wait at all.\n\nThe waitresses are ornery, but not rude...just clear.  They aren't going to make nice or kiss your rear, they're not there for that.  I found this respectable, and liked it.\n\nBut the food?  Oh God.\n\nPros:  Portions are massive, all the other reviews will tell you that.\n            1) Prices are reasonable, cheap even, but I suppose that has something to do with the fact that the first pound or two of your meal is pure potato.  Seriously...I think I had at *least* three idaho russets in chipped form on my plate alone.\n            2) ....uhm.  ....  Nothing was dry?\n\nCons:  There was no color anywhere.  Absolutely everything on every plate I saw in the place was some blend of beige.  Potatoes, egg white, pancake, sausage...after you tilted the whatever-grease-that-was out of your dish, everything was the same color.  \n             Half my dish was potato.  \n             The egg was not over-medium, it was still-runny, even the whites.  I presume this was because they were slammed, and didn't have time to cook what were almost certainly factory-chicken eggs.\n             The sausage was not identifiably sausage.\n             I had my entire day's required calories in butter alone on the toast.\n             There was seriously nothing remotely healthy on this menu.  Nothing raw, nothing green, nothing fresh, not even as an ingredient. Even McDonalds has a fruit cup, ffs!  TACO BELL has better quality food!\n             \n\nTake one look at the clientele when you walk in.  It attracts exactly the kind of people you would picture in a dingy greasy-spoon truck-stop.  If you are not one of those people, Do Not Bother, this place makes Denny's look classy.
Clearly based on other reviews, I should try this during daylight hours. \n\nWe went after a long night out, landing there around 2:30. I've been to plenty of late night places, after-hour bars, etc, but I've never been as scared as I was at Jo-jo's. \n\n2 fights broke out while we were there. First a group of guys, then their girlfriends. Then a guy at the next table threw up on the ground -some splashing on my leg. \n\nThen we heard police sirens and the fights were escalating - so we bolted. Maybe this is a rare experience? Anyway - I won't be heading back anytime soon!
This was the worst service I have ever gotten, the employee at the airport avis center stole money from us. We were trying to rent a car in the airport and we thought the price was too expensive, so we asked her not to swipe the card while we confirmed that we wanted this price while we leave she swipes our card. And what happened we are 3500$ short. \n\nAlso the prices are really bad here, for one car the price with insurance was 3500$ while at enterprise is 1700$. \n\nWe still haven't gotten our money back and now we have no money in the middle of nowhere Pennsylvania. Avis customer service says we have to wait 72 hours. Thanks for starving us avis and making us sleep in our cars. \n\nNever go here.
i find i can no longer be a customer at salon christine. christine's conduct/attitude toward me regarding my valid question about aveda products possibly reverting back to animal testing was rude, unprofessional, and insulting. not only did she not respond to my facebook question on her salon's page, but only after an email to her, did she reply with a curt answer, and to add insult to injury, she's banned me from further posting/commenting on the salon's facebook page. i didn't realize an inquiry regarding a product for which i'm paying wasn't permitted. instead of setting the record straight (which should've been done), she elected to ignore my question, delete it from facebook, and then ban me from the salon's page. wow. that said, i'll really miss katie, as she's a great hairstylist and colorist.
I purchased a gift certificate up front from them only to find out that they were never going to let me use it.    I kept calling to try to make appointments and each time I called, the staff was rude and said that they had no appointments.    My gift certificate expired because they never had any appointments available (or so they said) and when I explained my situation to them over the phone, they were extremely rude.    I said that I would tell my friends and family about my awful experience there and about how they took my money but never provided services to me.    The staff said something extremely rude to me over the phone and then hung up.\n\nI will never give this salon my money again.     It's a shame that I'm out 50 bucks and have nothing to show for it.     I was scammed.
The food was just OK. Soggy french fries on a greasy cheese steak pattie.  The service was awful, noise, and not helpful for a newcomer to Primantis and Pittsburgh.
We ate at Primanti Bros based on the reviews on Yelp, hoping to get a real taste of Pittsburgh. What I ordered was a sandwich labeled Pittsburgher Cheese Steak. What I got was an inedible slab of overcooked mystery meat, cole slaw, and mediocre fries, on white bread. The sandwich was very small, but I only ate 1/2 of it anyway, and I have a pretty big appetite. I recently ate a 20 oz cheeseburger at a local burger joint.\n\nI was truly shocked. That was the worst meat that I have seen since Junior High School. We would have been much better off at Burger King. Luckily we had a nice lunch at Salim's to wash the taste of this junk of our mouths.
Worst sandwich on Earth.\nI'd rather eat a dead whore.\nPlease...never come here.
GROSS!!! Many people told me to go here and I was totally disappointed! It was bland, the coleslaw was too tangy (and only contained cabbage) and the meat was scary! Good thing it's super cheap. Do NOT get the cheese-steak sandwich if you go even though it says #2 best seller, it's awful! \n\nOkay on to service... Everyone seemed like they hated their job. Someone at my table asked for no tomatoes and add onions and of course she got tomatoes and no onions.\n\nMaybe I ordered the wrong thing and maybe they were all just having a bad day... Who knows.
Everyone knows that that if you go to Pittsburgh, you go to Primanti Bros. (My friends and I were in town for a Pirates/Phillies game, and the PNC Park Primanti Bros was packed the entire game.) We visited the Market Square location, and if you eat on the patio, it's a fun place to hang out and drink some Iron City beers. \n\n I got the Black Angus Sandwich. It was quite large, cut in half, and brought on a piece of wax paper. As it turned out, I'm pretty sure the wax paper would have tasted better. It was really, really, not good. I did eat the first half, but the bread was so tasteless, I thought maybe it would be better if I ate the other half piece by piece. The coleslaw was OK, but the french fries were awful, and the little bit of actual meat had little taste. We had little to no contact with employees, but a cab driver told us about a young couple who dared to ask for a sandwich at another Primanti Bros without coleslaw, and were treated really rudely. Because you know, people being rude is hilarious. \n\nSo I guess if you want an authentic Pittsburgh experience then go here. But if you want actual decent food, avoid at all costs
After sitting there and being ignored for 25 minutes we just left!
Clearly should have read a few reviews before going here. Whenever I go to these types of iconic regional dining establishments, I order the house specialty to best judge the place on its supposed merits. Since it was 11 in the morning, I chose not to order Primanti's #1 best seller, which the waitress told me was beer, but perhaps that would have made my experience better. As it was, I ordered the #2 best seller, the cheese steak. It was heinous. \n\nThink a grimy, mechanically separated Salisbury-style steak with a meager slice of provolone on sliced Italian bread served signature Primanti-style: with coleslaw, tomatoes, and fries.\n\nFirst, the steak was disgusting: terrible flavor (smelled and tasted like hippie armpit, which I'm not necessarily opposed to as long as it's not involved in something I'm trying to eat) with a gross, processed meat texture. Secondly, the fries easily overwhelmed the sandwich, with their old fryer grease taste. Additionally, the sandwich was unwieldy and threatening to fall apart at every turn--a trait I don't hold against decent-tasting sandwiches, but this lack of structural integrity just added insult to injury. \n\nMy dining partners were equally disgusted by their choices: corned beef and ham & cheese sandwiches, respectively. Easily the best part of the meal was the Smallman Street Fries, and those were equally lack-luster. The \"bacon\" was simply bacon bits (oh, the humanity!), the chili was uninspired, and the cheese sauce and sour cream did little but soggy the fries. (Did I mention they tasted like old fryer grease?)  \n\nI will never go back and I will immediately disregard the culinary opinions of anyone who thinks Primanti Bros. produces decent food.
Wildly overrated.  I compare it to Pat's and Geno's in Philly, good when your drunk, but only when your drunk.\n\nI went to Pitt for 4 years and I have to say I never understood the Primantis hype.  I dont know how you get famous for putting fries on a sandwich when the fries suck.  They are soggy and tasteless, maybe the worst I've ever had.  I will say the coleslaw is pretty good, and I'm not usually a coleslaw guy, but it doesnt make up for all the other shortcomings.  \n\nHalf the sandwich falls out while your eating.  The \"cheesesteak\" might be the most tasteless sandwich ever.  You have to use a whole bottle of hot sauce just to get a little flavor.  \n\nPrimantis sucks...go to Fatheads on the Southside or Uncle Sam's in Oakland.
I realize it's a sandwich shop and I dared to order a salad - but their menu is limited - so why put something on it if you're not going to do it right? Ordered a grilled chicken salad, take out. Got back to the hotel and found it had a pile of tasteless, cold french fries on it...so cold they never melted the shredded orange cheese-food underneath them. Also no salt or ketchup was included, so even if I DID want to eat stone cold, unseasoned fries, they would suck. The balsamic dressing I ordered was replaced by (fake) raspberry vinaigrette, so repulsive it required a trip all the way back  to the restaurant to get the correct dressing, which they were out of. Would have been nice to have been asked, since they did have Italian on hand - seems like a closer match. The iceberg lettuce, olive, and tomato salad, oh yeah, it did have a bit of chicken on it too, was okay once I scraped all that orange congealed \"cheese\" off.  That and all the smokers hanging around the place (and Pittsburgh in general), I would say this place is a totally over-rated dump.
Really bad service. Make sure to get in the face of the wait staff or count on being ignored
ate at the one in North Versailles. floor filty, all young kids running the place, poor service, poorly made sandwich, very bad overall. The should have a manager on duty. I wont be back. thanks
So this is a Pittsburgh instiitution??  Am so underwhelmed.  After waiting more than 20 minutes for our sandwiches (in the end these are still just sandwiches), they came out cold - and I'm not just talking about the meat, lettuce, tomatoes - everything was cold including the fries.  What a disappointment.  Head to DiBellas - much better service, subs and sandwiches.
Well, it finally happened: I had to give a place a single star. And it kills me that the place I gave it to had to be Primanti's. I'm an awful Pittsburgher.\n\nI don't give low ratings easily or often, so believe me: this place pushed all of my buttons to earn this awful review. In fact, the single star was only earned because the place is cleaner and more comfy than some of the other Primanti places I've been too. It kind of has an old diner feeling to it and I liked that. \n\nAlas, that's all I liked.\n\nSo, why such a low score? Well:\n\nThe service was terrible. After spending twenty minutes sitting without anyone coming to refill my water or ask for my actual order - note, the place was almost completely empty - I went to the register to ask for something to eat, which I'd started to think I had to do after watching a couple people do the same (in hindsight, I probably misinterpreted their actions, but my mistake does not excuse what happened next). My waiter looked at me and went, \"Don't you get the concept of a restaurant? Haven't you been to any restaurants, like, ever? Sit back down and I'll take your order.\" \n\nAnd not even in a joking manner that made me feel like I could smile about my mistake - this guy was being a condescending, rude, arrogant person. It was unbelievable. Utterly, totally unbelievable. If I hadn't met company there that night, I would have walked out right then.\n\nTo make matters worse, this was not a good night to order anything at Primanti's. The coleslaw was way too sweet and there was far too much of it, the fries were bland and had no texture at all, and there was barely any meat on my sandwich at all. The result? A big pile of carbs that really didn't taste great after the first few bites, rather than a delicious sandwich.\n\nBefore you all kill me, please note: I LIKED my meal at Mt. Lebanon's Primanti location. They also have a more diverse menu, which is always a bonus for me - I like having more options. I think in the future, I will stick to that location in this local chain, where even on a busy night I managed to get food in a decent amount of time. I certainly will not be coming to the downtown location if I spot my previous, downright awful waiter working there again.
I can't for the life of me figure out why all the hype. I was warned by others that this is mainly where tourists eat. But I'm a tourist here, and wanted to try it.\n\nIt was a sandwich mostly of slaw and fries.  \n\nThe thick white bread was dry and boring; too crusty. \n\nThe fries on the sandwich overpowered the taste! So I dismantled it. When the rude server asked how I liked it, I was honest. He gave me big time attitude and commented that I took it apart. I told him, I took it apart because it was a horrible sandwich (the pastrami, by the way). And that, sir, is why you got a $0.35 tip! (never give a zero tip, they'll think you forgot, always leave just a small amount of change)\n\nIf you have to put all that hot sauce on the sandwich to make it palatable, why bother?  (The server, as he walked away, told me it's really good with hot sauce, which was just Tabasco, which I don't like, any way!)\n\nThey left off the tomato that supposedly comes with each sandwich!\n\nOf the 4 staff members I came in contact with, all but 1 were rude, unfriendly and uncaring. One constantly walked by trash that had blown off outdoor tables without picking it up.\n\nThe fries were good. \n\nNope, won't be back.
I've heard all the hype and wanted to try it.  Tonight was my second attempt here.   First time, new girl on the grill apologized to me at 10 minutes, at 15 I walked.  Not even an acknowledgement from the wait staff.   Tonight, the waiter seemed mad that I didn't know what I wanted to order.  After I explained that I'd never been there, he brought me a menu and then proceeded to ignore me for 10 minutes.  I walked again.  No more tries here.  Maybe I'm doing something wrong?  Haha.
Had lunch here while visiting friends in the area .... After seeing all the hype about this place on various tv food shows I was very excited to eat hear . WOW ,,, what a dissapointment , This place is so over hyped it isnt funny . To compare this place to the famous sandwich places is NYC is a joke . The sandwiches may be big , but only because they are over stuffed with fries and cole slaw . To steal a line from a old TV commercial .... WERE'S THE BEEF .....  A major major dissapointment .
I was really looking forward to a huge tasty sandwich but was greatly disappointed! Everything was bland, nothing had seasoning, not even basic salt. Soggy fries, tasteless meat, average coleslaw on white bread trying to double for Italian bread. Save your time, money and calories and go to Wendy's instead.
Super slow service. They have inside and outside seating which is nice. However, they only have two waitresses outside for about 20 tables. They don't take your entire order they only take your drink order and then your good order. It took 10 minutes to get our drink order. After finally getting our drinks she waited another ten minutes to come get our food. When we ordered our food when I asked for light coleslaw she said they can't do that and for me to just take it off. She explained that they just put fistfuls on it. So why can't they just put less fistfuls on it? \n\n\nOur waitress was very rude and didn't make me feel welcomed at all. She never introduced herself and just treated us like animals. \n\nI would never tell anybody to go to the Primanti Brothers again downtown. The one in Oakland is so much nicer and better quality. \n\nIt's really bad management to have only two people serving outside when there are over 20 tables. It's not fair for the customers or for the servers. \n\nWhile the food was good as always it wasn't worth the wait because it just took to long. The service wasn't nice at all and I wouldn't tell anybody to come here when it's crowded.
I had lived outside of Pittsburgh for a couple of years and have eaten at this Primanti Brothers location four or five times. Their sandwiches were always tasty, worth the wait and the trouble of finding parking etc. So, when my parents came to visit, and we made a trip out that-a-way, I knew that would be a lunch stop. We ended up coming into Pittsburgh on Sunday around 1pm. I knew it would be crowded and anticipated having a wait. We got a table after 15 to 20 minutes and quickly sat down before someone else did. It took the waitress about 10 minutes to come and clear the previous customers remnants, which was ok. \n\nWe ordered our beers and were told that she'd come back and take our order. She came back 20 minutes later, with the beers and took our order. After that, we sat around and waited for our sandwiches for 35 minutes. When we did finally get our food, it was ice cold. The fries in the sandwich were completely soggy and cold, and the meat was barely warm. Our table ran out of napkins, and we asked for some, but they never came, finally, the table next to ours handed us a few. Maybe it was because it was cold, but the sandwiches weren't that great. I had very little meat in mine, and more coleslaw that anything else. Also, the thickness of the bread seems to have increased since I last ate here because about 60% of my sandwich was bread. We were fairly disgruntled about the whole thing, but were still going to leave a tip for the waitress. \n\nThen, my dad went to the bar to pay. He stood there for 10 minutes, behind another customer. The server came up to them and said 'what the hell are you doing up here?', in those words!! My dad was so stunned be just stood there, the guy in line ahead of him told her that he was waiting to pay his bill, so she cashed him out and then turned around to do something else, when my dad said 'excuse me, i need to pay too', she replied to him ' Jeez, you guys are so demanding! Why the hell are you in such a hurry\". That is when their tip went straight out the door with us. \n\nWe were ok waiting for a table, we were even ok waiting for our food; it took them one hour from the time we sat down, to the time we got our food, and then the server had the audacity to behave in that manner. Either Primanti Brothers has become too big for their boots and let things slide, or they need to train their staff to be more polite and efficient. We will definitely not be coming back the next time we are in town. Our money is better spent else where.
Worst service ever.  The waitress and I use that term loosely rolled her eyes at any question when ordering and yelled at someone at the table for asking for coleslaw on the side.  Then she had to come back and re ask the orders again and got mad when we repeated about the coleslaw since she didn't repeat it back.  When she brought out the food she just slammed the food down and just shouted out the name of one of the sandwiches um are you asking who had which sandwich which is your job to remember anyways.  I'm glad I don't live in Pittsburgh to have to worry about avoiding this place.
Can I give this place ZERO stars? They're supposively \"famous\" for their sandwiches so some friends and I go when we are in town. The waitresses all rolled their eyes and glared at me for not wanting my fries on top of my sandwich. (Not to mention the waitress was in the skimpiest tank top with her bra hanging out while waiting on us and grilling food. Gross.) I get that your famous for having fries on the sandwich but regardless, a customer should be able to get what they want. This place was trashy, dirty and probably not even up to code.
This is the most overrated place bragged about in Pittsburgh. My first visit was to the one in South Hills. Waited 90 mins for 4 sandwiches. The coleslaw is gross and I'm a fan of coleslaw. Due to the 90 min wait I was given a gift card which I used at the one in Market Square. This time I got the grilled chicken salad. If you like chewing on rubber bands, I recommend it. It was the absolute worst salad I've ever had, how can you screw up a salad? The chicken was tasteless and rubbery. Got it to go and the girl who took the order over the phone was rude and rushed and was equally rude when I picked it up. She assumed she knew my name and my order and handed me a random bag of food. I told her I was missing a sandwich and she tossed another bag at me without saying a word. I will NEVER go back to any of these locations. I'd rather eat a ham sandwich from Sheetz. At least I can get that without an attitude. If you have friends coming to visit from out of town, take them anywhere but here. And for those who say you have to go to the original one in the Strip, no thanks, it's the same food. If you are looking for an awesome sandwich go to Schmitz Old World Deli in Greenfield.
Service was bad. Server walked away before we were done ordering and then when someone got her attention she had to return 5 minutes later to re clarify which it was wrong. We didn't see her for a good 20 minutes and had to go up to the bar for refills. She did take one of our cups to refill it, sat it on the bar and left it there for 10 minutes, when we finally saw her again had to ask her to grab it off the bar. Highly disappointing Philly cheesesteak!! The meat in it is that of a frozen Salisbury steak TV dinner!! French fries were good.
First Yelp review ever. Not impressed at all! 45% bread, 25% cole slaw, 25% fries, and 5% meat. The bread is cold and not grilled or warmed on the grill. Avoid and eat else where. Don't even think about the wings (dry and no flavor).
Being from LA, I was disappointed with the tacos. The Carne Asada was bland and didn't think this is authentic Mexican food but another street faire.
This review is for the taco stand in front of Reyna's, which is run by the same owner as Reyna's and Casa Reyna. Note that this is *not* the same stand as the one around the corner on 21st Street, across the alley from Pamela's.\n\nI got an order of three tacos from them on a cold day a couple weekends ago. The meat was cold before I could start eating it, and I assumed it had just cooled off quickly. \n\nWithin a few hours everything I had eaten was leaving me in a hurry. I felt sick and weak for the rest of the day, and was better (and completely empty) the next morning.\n\nNever going back, of course. This doesn't directly reflect on Casa Reyna's inside restaurant, but since the same people run it, it makes me worry about their food handling standards.\n\nI'll probably keep getting Reyna's big bag of chips when I need them for a party, but I'm never eating any other prepared food from them again.
OMG what a nightmare. I was there last saturday at 9pm with a group of 10 people in the second floor bar area. The bartenders acted like it was a big inconvience that we were there. ordered drinks and didnt even get a thank you. the bar was dirty and littered with dirty glasses. The restrooms were filthy and didnt even have toliet paper . We left the bar and spent a HUGE anoun of money up the street.. I will never go back.
Another place that I visit once every few years thinking it couldn't be as bad as I remember it.  And the place NEVER lets me down; it's just as bad as I remember.  The seafood is breaded and fried to the point of inedible.  The staff is rude.  The prices are too high for the quality.  Just all around disappointing.
I hesitate to even write this review because technically we didn't eat here.  But after reading the other reviews, I thought \"Eh, what the hell.\"\n\nWe came in and were seated at 5:45pm for desserts/drinks.   By 6:05, we still hadn't seen our waitress.  We decided it wasn't worth it and just left.\n\nI did eat here a month ago, and yes -- the fried fish was fried to the point where it was beyond greasy.  And then to pay around $20 for that?  LOL.  Right.\n\nI won't be back.
Went to this place for lunch last Saturday, party of five. The service was extremely slow and every beer we tried to order, got the response \"We are out of that one\". \n\nFinally when we got our sandwiches (after a long wait) but no coleslaw and fries were soggy and stale. When asked the waitress for coleslaw (which is supposed to be the side with every sandwich), the response was \"I think we are out, but let me check\". And the waitress didn't return until after we were done eating. \nForget about getting a refill for your drink or water..
NEVER AGAIN!!!! Horrible service and horrible food! It took 20 minutes for our waitress to even come to our table! Looking back on it, I don't know why we didn't leave... maybe because we had to wait 20 minutes to even get a table (this was during the summer). We ordered the muscles to start off which were okay but definitely not something I would recommend. My husband ordered the fish and chips and I ordered the crab cakes.... EPIC FAIL!!! The crab cakes were so disgusting my husband and I had to switch meals. The crab cakes taste like fried mayo... I couldn't even taste the crab! The fish and chips looked great but it didn't taste like anything! No seasoning at all! The waitress was so bad that when it came time to give us our check, she was no where to be found. It took 15 minutes to actually get the check (keep in mind we already finished eating)... thank God we had cash! A complete waste of $40. Yes, I remember exactly how much I spent even though it was months ago because I kept thinking how I could have spent that money in a better place! I could have got a mani & pedi... had some great sushi... the list goes on. lol
We had a frustrating and disappointing experience at Roland's, a dining out experience on a recent 4-day visit to Pittsburgh.\n\nFirst, all of the food was extremely overpriced. The quality was what you would find if you were ordering from a bar...but it was twice as expensive. The $16 I paid for fried cod got me two soggy cod filets, steamed bland vegetables and boring roasted potatoes. I couldn't have tried to make food this poor. It was a Sysco food operation gone wrong: runoff from Houlihan's mixed with Joe's Crab Shack. \n\nThe service was so slow that we were cancelling orders due to the delay in bringing them to the table. My dish arrived without any sort of sauce, and we even had to get up and order beer from the bar because our waitress was so behind. It was her \"second day on the job,\" but this is unacceptable. They could have at least comp'd our beers, or offered some other way to make it up (besides coming over to informing us that they had charged the beers to our bill).\n\nRoland's had space available on a Monday night, unlike the other restaurants in the neighborhood. This was really convenient initially, but I now have an idea of why this was the case.
I would give this restaurant 0 stars if I could.  The food was lousy, the drinks were expensive, and the service was awful.\n\nI complained to the manager about my experience and he told that if I didn't like it, there were plenty of other bars in The Strip District.\n\nPlease, please, please go somewhere else.
Yuck!\n\nIt's almost embarrassing having this place exist in the Strip with so many tourists coming here.  That has to be how they're making their money because it's certainly not on their food or service.  Well, maybe it's the booze too...\n\nI don't even know where to begin.  Service was horrible.  The lunch took 2 hours.  On a leisurely Sunday that may be fine, but there was no leisure.  At least not with drinks not in hand until a 1/2 an hour after we sat down.  I'd say lunch was served another 1/2 to 45 minutes later.  \n\nIt didn't matter though, I knew it wasn't going to be anything spectacular.  I'd heard rumors about the food.  I won't go into any details but I wouldn't trust some items on the menu.  I just played it safe and ordered a veggie salad.  \n\nThe salad was in the entree section, so I assumed it would be a full size salad.  It was not.  It was a side salad with a handful of grilled veggies on top.  Nothing spectacular.  And a side salad at almost $11.  Not worth it.  \n\nIf you are forced to stop in because you're dying of hunger, stick to a liquid diet:)
Just awful. \n\nMy companions each ordered an Alfredo pasta and they both honestly thought (through the entire meal) that Roland's had served mashed potatoes on the pasta.\n\nWe thought \"maybe it's a 'burgh thing.\"\n\nNope, we were informed at the end of the meal by the waiter that it was indeed Alfredo sauce and that the chef \"just liked to use a lot of parmesan cheese in his Alfredo.\" This stuff was about the consistently of cold oatmeal with oil poured over it (no exaggeration) and there was a bucket full of it on each plate.\n\nAnybody who would serve what was on those plates has no business whatsoever in any kitchen. \n\nBy the way, my lobster roll was a buttery, greasy fail as well.\n\nWhat a complete disaster.
this place reeks of fish when you walk in and there are fruit flies everywhere.  Good place to dine if you're on a diet since you will surely lose your appetite.\n\nIf you find yourself at Rolands, do yourself a favor and leave and dine anywhere else in the Strip District.  Seriously.
My fiance and I went to Roland's for a \"date night\".  We were both craving seafood, and had never been here before.  When we arrived, we asked our waitress if there was a happy hour going on.  There was a happy hour and she gave us the menu for it and said she'd be back in a minute to take our order.  The happy hour ended 2 minutes after she gave us the menus, and she came back over 10 minutes later to take our drink order.  Needless to say, we were unable to take advantage of any specials.  We both ordered margaritas for our drinks.  They took a further 15 minutes to come out.  Not only were the drinks weak (and this is coming from a bartender), but one margarita was a substantially different color than the other (despite being the same type).  Additionally, we were charged over $7 apiece for those margaritas that were made with well liquor.  If I'm spending $7 on a margarita, it had either better be tasty or strong (or both).  Anyway, we sip our disappointing drinks and decide to order an appetizer.  We got the Raspberry-maple scallops.  There were cooked well, but served in a watery sauce that removed almost all of the raspberry-maple flavor..  Then we ordered dinner.  We both ordered their broiled seafood medley, which comes with a salad.  I had the caesar salad, although I used the word \"salad\" in the loosest sense possible.  There was lettuce there, but only after I uncovered it from a cup of croutons and a cup of parmesan cheese (not the fresh kind).  I spent about 5 minutes just trying to reach the lettuce in my salad under all that other stuff, and even when I finished I still had more cheese than lettuce.  While we were eating our salads our entrees were brought out, and we had the luxury of watching them grow cold while we finished our salads.  I'm sorry, but when I'm spending $30 on a entree I would like it served hot and after my salad.  Additionally, we were not provided a change of silverware at any point during our meal and I kept having to \"clean\" my fork and knife on a spare napkin.  During our meal I ordered a second drink (beer this time, since liquor is apparently too difficult for them) and had to wait another 10 or so minutes before it was brought out.  I had also run out of water and had to wait 15 minutes before it was even noticed, let alone waiting for a refill.  While there were aspects of this evening that were frustrating, I must say that all of my seafood was cooked perfectly (I just wish I had been able to enjoy my entree while it was hot).  When we had eaten our fill and asked for the to-go boxes, the waitress asked to bring our check.  We still wanted another round of drinks and possibly dessert, but she never asked for either.  Despite the feeling that we were being rushed and she wanted to hurry us along, I decided to order another drink.  In my opinion, it is good manners to make customers feel welcome, relaxed, and not rushed.  We did not feel any of these things.  This was supposed to be our date night and there were just so many little annoyances along the way.  Once again, the food was really well cooked, and if I could have left my tip for the kitchen staff instead of the waitress I would have.  They certainly earned it, and she didn't really seem to care.  Also, while our wait times could be expected during a lunch/dinner rush, there were maybe 7 people in the whole restaurant.  It's not like they were busy.  Our waitress was just too preoccupied with chatting with the other servers (in clear view of our table).\n\nIn short, I do not believe we will be dining here again.  We can get the same quality of food for cheaper and with much better service.
If I had to chose between dining at Roland's again, or having to catch running chainsaws that were tossed at me I'd pick dining at Rolands but only by the slimmest of margins.\n\nWhy on earth did I go back to this restaurant?  Clearly, I must not love myself or something.\n\nWant to pay too much money for fish that smells like a sewer?  Dine at Roland's.  The only reason to be at Rolands is to drink there.  they have a pretty decent beer selection.
Roland's was recommended by hotel. Service was terrible. Food was cold. Brick oven pizza cold.... Asked to have it reheated , still came back cold. Steak was way over cooked. Never got appetizer we ordered, but was charged for it.  Was not busy but waitress was hard  to find. Would not go back and would not recommend this place to anyone.
Friends warned me not to eat here. Turns out they were GOOD friends. This was just awful, start to finish. Slow (pitiful) service, nasty food ( and we each sprung for the lobster roll -- if you can call it that!) and a generally miserable experience. And this was an early lunch with very few customers around. The only thing remotely redeemable was that we sat on the balcony overlooking Penn avenue and were entertained by the people below. People watching can be a blast. \n\nI wanted a draft beer and was told that \"we don't serve draft beer upstairs\". What??? There's a bar there!! Are you kidding me?? So water it was and that took a long time to arrive. And without straws - another wait after I had the audacity to ask for them.  The \"lobster rolls\" arrived and looked mighty meager. That's not a lobster roll!! But I pressed on. As I got it closer to my mouth there was a slight aroma. But press on. The \"lobster\" was sparse, tough, and flavorless. How often could you say that about lobster??? Exactly!! It must have been harvested years ago and waited for me to show up so it could make its way out of the freezer. At $15 each this falls clearly into the ripoff category.  And trying to get our check? Ridiculous. \n\nI won't be back. Ever.
Service was great, however, the food was mediocre.  Hostess needs to be more educated about the menu, she was unable to give details on menu items.\nLets start the with fries that seem to be mandatory with each entree.  They had to be cooked prior to us ordering, or even getting there.  They were cold, limp (pause) and over salted.  The burger was just eh.  Grilled onions seemed to be just warmed on the grill, and the beef patty could have used a bit more flavor.  Fat has the flavor people!\n\nOh, the floor at our first table was filthy.  Then the table at the second table was filthy.  What's up with that?\n\nOverall, this joint was not that great.
We wanted to eat there today. Waited for about 10 minutes at the entrance. No hostess coming up. Then she shows up saying that she will be back in another second. After additional 5 minutes we ask her what's going on. She did not apologize and says that it will take another 30 minutes. Really??!! Not the nice way to treat a party of 4 wanting to spend some money.
Last weekend my mother and I headed down to the strip to get some weekly goods - lunch meat and cheese from Penn Mac - veggies at Stans - needed some new spices from Penzeys for a chili I was going to make that day....we were both a little hungry and knew we wanted to have a snack before shopping.\n\nWe parked in front of Roland's and see the sign: Famous for Lobster Rolls and Bloody Mary's!\n\nPerfect. \n\nMy mother got the Lobster Roll, which she said was 'good'. The bread, from Mancini's, was of course tasty - toasted and buttery - delicious mostly because it was Mancini's bread. I had the Lobster Roll minus the carbs on a salad - and the lobster was tasty, no doubt , I mean, lobster is just - good. For the price though, not sure that I got enough bang for my buck. The salad was something I could have picked up at Get-Go in the pre-made section. I just didn't feel satisfied at the end of my meal. I couldn't even drink my Bloody Mary (this is a rare affair), way too much horseradish, and I often like horseradish in my Bloodies!\n\nAnd it was cold - didn't even take my winter coat off. So, needless to say, not the best experience.\n\nTalk about false advertisement...
This was my second time eating at Roland's  seafood Grill the first time I had a great experience the food was excellent the service was great even though they were busy we got really good service and everything was really fresh and good this time the food was needless to say very poorly prepared the service what service we got seemed more interested and everybody but the six people setting at our table. It took a couple of tries to get refills on drinks I asked for a cup of water I didn't even get the cup of water the pasta was more like wedding soup my medium stake was almost completely pink all the way through very undercooked my nieces pasta had more onions in it then it had sauce I will never visit this place again!!! It wasn't that busy tonight but we stood there for almost 15 minutes waiting for them to get us a table. I spoke with the manager and explained my concerns to him I just can't see me spending that kind of money for the experience that I had tonight again.
Rough experience today - had one drink and left. Waited 15-20 minutes for service and it is not busy. When I said something - everyone wanted to blame someone else - waitress couldn't describe beer and didnt iffer to find out or sample it - brought 12 year old son a pop in a little kids cup. Waitress did apologize for cup but it was too late - chose to leave.
I travel quite a bit and always enjoy great food.  I was in town on a business trip and someone recommended Roland's Seafood Grill.  I was seated promptly and given a drink and food menu.  I noticed the beer sampler and thought I would give it a try. I asked the server if I could choose the beers and she said yes.  She went on to explain nearly most of the draft beers I selected were not available as they were having trouble with their taps. \n\nI ordered a flight of beers that arrived after 10 minutes and began tasting them.  They were cold but did not taste fresh.  Next I ordered the famous \"Lobster Roll\" which comes with fries and slaw.  It took nearly 20 minutes for my food to arrive but looked good at first glance.  The fries were plentiful and hot but greasy.  The lobster roll was served in a large piece of bread that resembled two uncut pieces of Texas toast.  It was buttered and grilled to give it a nice appearance.  The lobster inside was a small amount, cold and tough. The slaw was reasonably good and cold. \n\nThe server came back and I ordered a pint of draft beer.  After nearly another 20 minutes she returned, apologized and explained they were having more problems with their tap system and offered me a bottle of Guinness instead of the draft I ordered.  At this point I politely explained I did not want the bottled version and asked for the check.  \n\nI would be hard pressed to ever return.  With other great restaurant choices in the area I don't understand why anyone would choose to eat at Roland's Seafood Grill.
Stopped in on the Fourth of July for evening cocktail and small meal. From horrible service to terrible seafood...would never return. We waited a very long time for cocktails and order to be taken, when there was little crowd around in the restaurant. Then, our oyster order came out on a plate of water, not ice. They were small and shriveled up and warm. Next, the mussels in white wine sauce....hahahah. Um, no...it was more like garbage sewer sauce. Mussels were freezing COLD. Had to search for a server to get the check, took a long time again. Normally, I would complain right then and there for such terrible food and service but it was one of those days that was going so nicely that complaining about food would just ruin mine and my husband's infrequent night out without kids. I did feel strongly enough to write this review. How can a seafood place serve terrible seafood? I have never given a 0 star review and have worked in the food service industry. This place is terrible. Spend your money somewhere else.
The wait staff looked like they were bussed in from a homeless shelter. The strange hostesses seated my party of 4, & it took 25 minutes to get our first beers. Ordered an app & left 25 minutes later, the lobster nachos never came, which sucked because I was quote excited about those. The place is gross! There was food & trash all over the floor & I watched several women exit the restroom with very disgusted looks on there face because the restroom was so nasty. This was confirmed by my wife. Skip this place & go anywhere else in the Strip District
Super disappointed in this place. Came here for a paint nite they were hosting and arrived over an hour beforehand to eat. All I ordered was soup and salad in order to be quick and my friends who ordered a lobster roll and shrimp got their food within 20 minutes. 40 minutes later, and ten minutes prior to painting I still had not received mine. On top of that, there was only one bartender working the whole top floor. When we told him I'd have to cancel my order to begin the event he began cursing about the staff at the restaurant- it was incredibly awkward. When the food arrived it was mediocre at best. Will not be coming back to this place unless I'm dragged.
I would give them ZERO stars if it were an option. No one came to wait on us. I had to ask the hostess to send us a waiter. We'll call him Mr. Personality because he never did tell us his name. I should have known we were in trouble when he didn't bother to write down our order. My Caesar salad came without the requested onions. My grilled salmon was overcooked. The vegetables were bland. The waiter took away my half-empty glass of ginger ale and filled it with water. He never offered us dessert. The rest rooms were filthy. I would never recommend this place to anyone.
Terrible tuxedo rentals! I went here 2 months before my good friend's wedding to get sized and order my tuxedo. The salesman who measured me did not know what he was doing, continued to ask someone else if he was 'doing it right' and made me extremely uncomfortable. At the moment I wanted to give him the benefit of the doubt that he would get it right. When I picked it up, it did not fit!! They go through a third party and did not have an easy way to remedy the situation. They had to ship a replacement to where I was going since it was an out of town wedding. I had to return it to another Jos. A Bank store because I did not want to go back to the RPM location to see the guy that fit me originally. When I returned I wanted to see what they could do for my extreme amount of inconvenience and they hassled me when I wanted a refund! I was going to use them for my bridal party tuxedos next year, but no way now. All the employees there just said they go through a third party so its no wonder their rentals are not easier! Ha! POOR EXCUSE FOR A GENTLEMAN'S STORE. Oh, and its very very expensive!\n\nHowever, Jack from the RPM store was very kind and helped to make a bad situation better.
The owner, Nicholas G Nicholas needs to attend a few driving classes before he kills someone. Maybe too much hp for him. If you see an 08 white porsche with FL plate 917 MNC stay clear. Guy drives like a nut. Almost ran me off the road in Boca Raton by 95.
Sorry, but I stopped in this morning to get my lunch because I knew I would be too busy to go out for lunch.  Got a Greek Salad.  First of all, there was no lid on the salad, it was wrapped in plastic wrap... What??? Anybody could put anything in there without too much trouble.  Second when I went to eat it, I threw most of it away because the lettuce was brown and/or wilted.  Not going back again.  I didn't spend all that money for garbage.
Dirty, unclean, my friend and I went to lunch here.  She went to go to the bathroom. Upon returning to the table had the following story to tell.  \n\nTo get to the bathroom she had to go through the kitchen and down a flight a stairs.\n\n When passing through the kitchen she saw raw chicken left out in the heat congealing in it's own blood. \n\n Christos you get no second chances after a stunt like that.  The food was tasty, but come on now chicken chillen on the counter is a no go in anyone's kitchen.
The food was clearly microwaved (ie the ring around the soup bowl and splatters along the sides). The fish was rubbery. The wait staff, although nice, was very salesy always trying to \"add on\" something in a pushy way. \n\nI asked for my check and barely ate anything. I think the waiter got his ego bruised because he decided to display his \"Best In City\" award right behind my head as I was still sitting at the table... a shame the award was from 2005! I guess a lot changed in 7 years?\n\nDon't bother with this place!
Christos was one of the worst experiences I've ever had while dining in Pittsburgh. They call this a Greek restaurant but they don't even have a normal gyro on the menu. My boyfriend and I decided to split the platter, which was horrible. The gyro meat wasn't off the spick, the dolmades were the worst thing ever eaten in my life and they charged us 4.00 to split it which we didn't even ask for in the first place. The only pleasant thing about this place was the cook who ended up serving us our food after our waiter went out for what seemed like a drug deal. Over all, everything was bad and I would never return and would advice everyone else to do the same.
WARNING. DO NOT GO HERE.\n\nMy family was visiting my sister in Pittsburgh and we had our eyes set on a specific restaurant, not Christos. A gentleman, I presume the owner of Christos, saw my family and I as we walked down the street. He flashed us his menu, pitching to us why his restaurant was the best and why his food was the best. I could barely tell if he was selling food or used cars. I kindly told him we were not interested. My family, however, was indecisive when it came to getting a restaurant. We ending up wanting to go eat at the restaurant next door to Christos so we backtracked. Again the owner flashed us his menu, sensing our touristy indecision. I again declined and pointed to the restaurant I was heading to. He then ignored me and pan-handled to my two sisters, mother and wife. They gave in to my dismay. As they said \"sure...\" I looked inside the restaurant of Christos at peak dinner hours.  No one was inside.  Absolutely no one. As my family walked in and I rolled my eyes, I thought, well let's give them a chance...my whole family seemed to feel bad for the guy and I like Greek food.\n\nAs we got in, it seemed nothing was going on. We had just came back from kayaking so we needed to wash our hands. They didn't seem to have a restroom but they took my sisters and mother through the kitchen and downstairs to find one. The silence was broken when they finally put music on and suddenly a couple of kitchen helpers came out and looked like they were warming some of the kitchen equipment up.  Were we their only customers tonight? I bet we were. Before I could settle in, he casually asked if I liked pita and hummus. Obviously I said yes. He was asking me so casually when I didn't even have a menu, I assumed it was complimentary when he said he would get me some, but as I waited I found his restaurant on Yelp with my phone and the first review gave them one star and mentioned how the owner didn't tell him the pita was extra.  Great. \n\nThe rest of my family later came back from the restroom (akin to going to a restroom at a grocery store where you're around stock items...except you need to go through their kitchen). They started with salad. The waiter asked if I wanted anchovies or something else on my salad. I was going to say \"sure\" but my wife stopped me and said it could be extra. The waiter, looking like he got caught, verified he was offering all extras to me even though earlier the owner said salads came with dinner. I had to say,\"I just want the standard salad, nothing extra.\" I couldn't let my guard down.\n\nWe ordered some food, priced about what you'd expect.  The pita and hummus I ordered earlier was just barely average so I don't know why they thought it was worth $4. My sister ordered \"leg of lamb\" so I expected to see a leg of a lamb. Instead when her plate came out, it looked like sad slices of ham. Really. We all got vegetables but they were soggy and unappetizing. I saw them earlier in the kitchen sitting in a big pot when I had used the restroom. Nothing here is fresh. My lamb was on the chewy side. My sister's \"leg of lamb\" was left uneaten and she asked if I wanted some. I \"tried\" to eat it but it was too chewy. They then asked for dessert. I wanted to say no out of my discontent but again my family members all said yes, even when they were telling me the food was not great.  I don't have their sense of pity. The desert and salad were the best things of the night, which was kind of sad. \n\nWhen we got the receipt and my wife insisted we check it.  Surprise. They overcharged us $7 from two mysterious items. Their receipt doesn't even list what you ordered. I went up the the cashier to ask them what the two items were. He tried to explain one but he really couldn't. He scratched out the $3 item. I then questioned the $4 charge. Again he tried to explain it but he really couldn't. Again he agreed with me and scratched out the $4.  On top of all this we still gave them a normal tip out of pity. I could tell the waiters were just following orders. I could tell the owner had trained them what to say and how to make extra money.\n\nYou've been warned. There's a reason why this place is doing so poorly.  There's a reason why the whole hour between 7:30pm and 8:30pm we were the only ones in the restaurant. There's a reason why the owner is begging customer to come in. They're cutting corners on customer service and food quality in exchange for salesman tactics, overcharging and tricking you to buy things you don't even know is extra. DO NOT GO HERE.\n\nOwners like this will say,\"But I have to or else I won't make it.\" You know what? Restaurants like yours shouldn't make it. Not to be harsh but it was a poor experience. Change your food, your sales tactics and your fake receipt items strategy. Maybe a long time ago when they started they were real but now they are doing every dirty trick in the book to nickel and dime you.  \n\nWARNING. DO NOT GO HERE.
This place is something STRAIGHT out of a David Lynch film. It felt like I was transported to some sort of alternate reality with the help of a smiling, and overbearing greek man outside a restaurant door preying on the weak and indecisive. Something in the air of this place comes off as so fundamentally strange, and almost, discomforting and nightmare-like. You are going to feel uneasy, is what I'm trying to say. \n\n- They overcharged us, probably intentionally. They don't have itemized receipts. \n- The waiter kept giving us options as if they were... free options that you're supposed to choose. We caught on when we specifically asked if they cost extra.\n- The elusive bathroom felt like we were descending down the staircase to hell. Better than nothing, I suppose.\n- The food.... oh my god. None of our food was good. In fact most of it was outright gross/uneatable. The hummus was decent, but... I can also get decent hummus at Trader Joe's. \n\nWe initially felt bad for these guys. A struggling business is always sad to see. But with all of the strange behavior, attempts to scam us, etc. that sympathy turned into a sense of understanding as to why this place isn't doing so well. \n\nIf the owners are reading this-- I'm sorry if my review came off harsh.. but really, please, rethink the way you are going about your business. I don't want you to fail, I want you to overcome this. Do it the right way, not the scummy way. I know you're trying, but try differently.
Ordered take out from Christos.  I ordered a diet coke and it was in a cup.  THANK GOODNESS I took the lid off first.  There were HUNDREDS of large white particles in the diet coke that looked like paint chips,  eggshells or paper and did not dissolve in the liquid but remained floating around.  This is a health hazard and needless to say, I will not be ordering from this establishment again.  As for the food, mediocre at best  The baklava was average, the mixed grille kabab (chicken and lamb) was okay, dry and chewy at times but overall edible.  The salad that came with the mixed grille was decent in flavor but did have some brown old lettuce in it.  As for the cold combination, the tzatziki, one grape leaf, and hummus were fine but the tarmasalata had some ingredient which was clearly spoiled.  The cr\u00e8me caramel (greek version of flan) was floating in water, really strange texture; my guess is it was frozen then defrosted, but a dessert should absolutely not be floating in a large pool of water.
Why come to this place when you have a tasty world of Italian restaurants right at your hungry fingers in this town!\n\nThe place is essentially a tourist-trap that seeks to reel in folks who are looking for a \"fun\" looking italian warehouse (now...how would this be fun? Apparently it is to some.)\n\nDon't get me wrong...the food is not atrocious. But it certainly is sub-par. My chicken parm was quite un-tasty and seemed as if the spaghetti had come out of a can. The service was mediocre.\n\nKeep driving to Bloomfield!
We have been coming here since it opened, but will not go back after our three last visits. It has gone downhill badly. Three visits ago we were seated in the trolley and then completely ignored for 30 minutes. There was a waitress, but apparently she was new and only had the front half. I finally went out front and demanded the manager who finally assigned a waitress for us and comp'ed our meals. The lasagna was very disappointing with hard noodles and definitely not oven baked and barely warm.\nTwo visits ago to use the gift cards we intended to use on the previous visit, service was poor and food was fair.\nThe last visit last night was the third strike and SW is OUT! Very poor service and food. The drinks were all ice and refills were not timely. The server past our table many times, but she flew by each time like we were not there. The zucchini appetizer was good. We only got one loaf of bread which was barely done and came with almost no butter. No ranch dressing...really! This is the Strip District after all with many stores for crying out loud. The food was very poor. The spaghetti and meatballs had about a tablespoon of sauce. The fetticini alfredo was almost devoid of sauce, as well. My Wild Mushroom and Chicken was not warm but tasted okay. We will NOT be going back. Olive Garden and Bravos in the North Hills will be getting our business from now on.
Didn't think this was possible, but it's worse than Olive Garden...food was horrible and extremely overpriced, service was decidedly lacking....  Neat location with fun and interesting decor but I wouldn't eat there again.
Yes-the food is good and the portions are big.  Our waiter was very speedy and attentive.  That being said, I cannot ever go back to this place again because of the amount of bugs I saw in such a short period of time.  All gnats and thankfully nothing worse but who knows what's going on in the kitchen?  Not just a stray gnat or two but dozens just swarmed our table.  I killed one with my bare hand on the table and another one bit me and drew a (spec) of blood. Disgusting. A \"manager\" (looked like a bus boy if you ask me but what do I know) did come to talk to us about it after my waiter noticed me covering my food with my napkin but it didn't accomplish much, no free meal or anything.  I noticed other people moving to other parts of the restaurant to avoid these bugs too.
There has to be better Italian food in Pittsburgh -- I don't know why anyone would come here.\n\nI had an overnight field trip with my students to Pittsburgh & the tour company took us here for a murder mystery dinner show.  They had us sectioned off which was great for privacy & also since the students were loud.\n\nTheir service is a hot mess!!!!  They only had 2 waiters serving our 50 person group & it was not organized at all.  Just getting our drinks out was confusing.  The waiters just came out with any drink & then asked -- anyone order this??  This is why my table sat drinkless, breadless, & saladless for the longest time.\n\nFor our dinner, we were given a salad, entree, & tiramisu.  The salad was definitely straight out of the bag & doused with some cheap dressing.  It didn't taste fresh at all.  There was a list of 8 or so entrees we could choose from.  They came out quite haphazardly.  I unfortunately ordered the fettuccine alfredo -- worst ever.  I could make better alfredo using the sauce from a supermarket jar.  I tried to douse it with pepper & cheese but alas it did nothing to help it.  Some of the others said the chicken parm was alright but some said theirs was undercooked.  The tiramisu also was gross.  It definitely was made & cut awhile ago & just kept cold in their fridge.\n\nThe redeeming parts of this dinner was the decor & old fashioned coin operated games AND the mystery show.  I've never been to one & was really excited.  They started after we ate our entrees & intermissioned during dessert.  The actors were super funny & interactive -- my students loved them which of course makes me happy.  Seriously though, their food is so bad.
This was the first time my husband and I have been here. We went with my sister-in-law, her boyfriend, and his sister as it is a tradition to go around Christmas for the boyfriend's family. Well, we were not impressed at all. Even the bf wasn't happy this time. We didnt have the best waitress as she would run off too quickly.for us to say much and we thought forgot about us the drinks took so long. She finally showed and said she had dropped them and had to make them again. We ordered and the wait wasn't too terribly bad for the food being a Saturday night in Pittsburgh though it was after 7 when we arrived. I didn't care much for.the garlicky butter that came with the sourdough, but the bread was hot and fresh.\n\nA balloon artist came around and made a flamingo that had to be 4 feet tall for the bf's sister and a little penguin for the SIL. He later came back, unasked, and gave her a 2 ft penguin with a hockey stick and puck in its \"hands'. \n\nWe finally got our soup, which did take a while to come out. Three of.us had the wedding soup and none of us liked it. The SIL's bf said it didn't even taste like wedding soup, but like chicken soup with meatballs. Granted I've been a little stuffy lately, but the broth barely tasted like wedding soup broth to me either.\n\nI had the fettucine alfredo, which was ok. I ate more of it than I might have were I not eating for two right now.  I added pepper because it was rather plain...not even a garnish. My husband said his spaghetti and meatballs was just ok. The bf had ordered an Italian Margarita I believe it was called and drank the first one though it wasn't mixed right as you could taste the tequila and there was no salt. He even added sugar trying to improve it. The second he gave back and the waitress didn't even apologize or take it off the bill. She went into the kitchen and started complaining loudly and our table was near the kitchen. Then she shows up with the check and we had to wait for her to come back to split it 3 ways since there was 2 couples and one other at the table. The bad drink was still there and my SIL was thoroughly pissed by then and went to talk to the manager and told him about overhearing her and all he did was take the one drink off. I noticed while reading our check that the entrees were correct, but that she had us as having a salad and minestrone when we both had wedding soup. I didn't say anything since the price was the same.\n\nThe balloons artist was great, but we won't be going back just to see him.
This place is dead, but they just don't know it yet.  \n\nArrived on a rainy Wednesday around 7PM.  20 minute wait for a table, so I guess they are doing well, right?  We should have known better when we sat in the bar area to wait (me, my spouse, and my eight-year-old son) after the rather apathetic front-desk person took our name.  A couple tables taken, but no sign of staff in the bar.  Every table was dirty, covered with plates, glasses, and the remains of others.  We took one that had just a couple of glasses and an impressive amount of Parmesan cheese scattered about.  Took 10 minutes for any sign of a bartender, who promptly spent five minutes getting caught up on drink orders before wandering over.  No smile, no welcome, just \"what do you want, and are you waiting for a table\".  And certainly no \"let me clean this table for you\".  We had a beer and a wine and a root beer for the little one.  The pinot grigio was vile, but, hey, thanks for charging us for the more expensive version: lord knows how disgusting the cheaper version would have been.   Finally, after 20 minutes we were seated.  Not a table in the bar area had been cleaned in that period.\n\nAnd the restaurant is empty!  Maybe 20% full!  They made us wait simply because they can't staff correctly.  Acres of empty tables.  So we sit, look at the menu, check out the surrounding (few) tables and made the only good decision we made this night:  we left and found another place in the area.  A place that actually worked to seat us and made us feel welcome.\n\nThe most amazing thing:  between the greeter, the bartender, and the seater, there was not a single smile.  Not a single sign that they actually are happy that we chose their establishment.  And not a sign that that they gave a damn whether we ever wanted to come back.  No wonder it is 80% empty but still makes people wait.\n\nThe other reviews compare this to Olive Garden and the like.  As my review makes clear, I can't compare the food.  And I am certainly not a fan of the Olive Garden.  But the few times I have gone into one, I was made to feel welcome.  Certainly not here.  \n\nThe place is living off memories:  I don't think it is creating any new (positive) ones.
I went to the Spaghetti Warehouse on a Sunday afternoon.   It was for a late lunch (about 2:00 p.m. when we arrived).  We were greeted by the hostess who took us to our table (which was in the trolley car).  It's a visually interesting place to dine.  However, our chairs were rickety and appeared ready to collapse. \n\nThe restaurant was mostly empty (which was not a surprise as we got there after the prime lunch hour but before dinner).  And yet although there wasn't a lot of other customers there all vying for the attention of the servers, it took an unusually long time for our waitress to arrive at our table.  (A pattern which continued throughout the duration of our stay).   \n\nOn the back of the menu, there is a section for lunch entrees.  I ordered the \"Amazing 15 Layer Lasagne\".   The three other people in my party all ordered the spaghetti with meatballs.   The food was...okay.  Nothing to write home about.  I've been eating Italian food for almost five decades.  And this is average - at best.  I'd say on par or slightly below Olive Garden.  It wasn't the worst food, but certainly not the best.  And again, I cannot overemphasize how below par the service was.   \n\nBut the thing which really upset me was when we got our check.  They charged us dinner prices for each of our meals.   Again, there is ONE menu, and the pack of the menu has the lunch section.  It reads (until 3:00 p.m.).   What I failed to see (because it's in fine print) is the part where they only offer lunch prices Monday through Friday.   Really?  REALLY?   Are you kidding me?   That's B.S., no matter how you view it.  At no time did either the hostess or the waitress bother to explain to us up front that the lunch pricing wasn't in effect.   \n\nI HATE being ripped off.  And any restaurant which does that kind of crap is RIPPING PEOPLE OFF.   So congratulations, Spaghetti Warehouse.  You got the better of me.  And I will never, ever go there again.
I wanted to like it here... in fact, I have in the past. We used to come here for college events and schedule ahead of time for a large group - then again, this was always on weeknights... when they were slow... thank goodness. I always loved the food here (then again, these dishes aren't anything scientific - they are basic - comfort food), and I thought the gigantic restaurant could handle large groups well... until I brought 10 people here for a birthday dinner on a Saturday. \n\nFirst of all, we had reservations but still stood awkwardly in the waiting area for a while to be seated. Not terrible. Then we were seated - the server was flustered and irritated before we had a chance to speak. Long story short, we waited 1.5 hours for our food (pasta... yes - the stuff you make at home for an entire family in 10 minutes), the waitress spent all her time coming to her table bashing the kitchen staff to us (not exactly professional), and the manager was no where to be seen. C'mon, manager! It's your job to sail this ship - get it together. From my line of vision, I could see about 7 servers running around like chickens with their heads cut off doing nothing but throwing the kitchen staff under the bus. Dear manager: if you have this many employees standing around doing nothing but complaining, put a few of them to work in the kitchen. \n\nThe place is cute and I really want to like it again, but I probably won't return until the management learns how to... manage. True, this isn't Capital Grill, nor was I expecting 5-star service. In all honesty, I'm from the middle-of-nowhere Ohio. I didn't even know what fine dining was until college. It's just that I've had better service at Arby's on a Friday at 12 noon when they have a line 20 people deep and cars wrapped around the building 3 times in the drive-thru. \n\nSaving grace: the sangria was good... thankfully, because that's the only thing we consumed for 90 minutes while waiting on our luke-warm dinners to arrive.
Arrived at 7:15 on a Saturday night, there was a 20 minute wait although although empty tables were visible.  Got seated at 7:30, put order in shortly thereafter.  We got bread and our soups fairly quickly then sat for an hour without any signs of food.  We looked around the restraint and it was obvious other tables had been waiting and we're getting frustrated.  The waitress apologized the kitchen was slow, so we gave it another 15 minutes before we finally walked out at 9:15 still hungry.  The food I saw looked good, but I would never recommend this place.  It doesn't take over an hour and a half to make a friggin salad and pasta.
This is a one time visit. The worst service ever. It was almost empty and twice we had to have someone find our waitress. The food was mediocre at best. The bruschetta appetizer for 4.99 had 4 tiny pieces of bread with some tomatoes on top. Not even shaved cheese, nothing. Total waste of money. The lasagna that they claim is so great in my opinion was diner quality, and that might insult some great diners.
DO NOT GO HERE! They are understaffed, incompetent,  and slow. It was like getting waited on by 1st job people. The place smells like bleach. It's tacky too hot. They play pop music and it's supposed to be an Italian place. Not one person there ever smiled and I was treated like a body in a chair not a person wanting to enjoy a meal. Very very slow service and no authenticity in the meals. I suggest eating out of a seafood dumpster if you plan on going here.
Took two and a half hours to get our food. All our food was the thrown together in the same pan. Not worth the $55.
Ordered delivery. The food showed up 2.5 hours later-which is acceptable, as it's (just) within the delivery window specified. However, the food had apparently been prepared within 15 minutes of receiving our order, because it was cold by the time we got it. I didn't listen to the other reviews and paid the price (literally)... if someone else is saved a crappy SW dinner by this review, my meal (or lack thereof) will not have been in vain.
Worst place ever.  I took my friend there for the first time and my son.  We waited a hour for food.  The waiter got us out water not our sangria  30 min later out salads and after  another 40 min of my kid begging for his pizza we decided to go.  The reason they messed up the order.  We talked to the manager I'm assuming which didn't really care.  Said hopefully we come back because service isn't usually this bad. Never again. Unprofessional and rude
We went here with sixteen people. The only good thing about our visit was having dinner with a bunch of our friends. The service was pretty good to considering the large party. My wife and I got the Sicilian Sampler Appetizer and The Ultimate Feast for two, as our dinner entree. The Calamari was uneatable and the Ravioli was just down right nasty. The wedding soup was the worst I have ever had. The meat balls had absolute no taste, kind of like cardboard. The Pork Sausage tasted burnt. The Spaghetti tasted no different than Boxed pasta. The Lasagna might have had 15 layers but 12 of them were noodles and sauce, you had to search for any meat or cheese. Our garlic bread came out literally black. I can't even believe somebody would serve that. We will not be back.
I stopped in here with my family the day before Thanksgiving. My sister, niece, and parents were at the Children's Museum and were struck by a fit of nostalgia--my mom used to take us here when we were kids. Either the whole operation has gone severely downhill, or I was too young to notice how bad it all is.\n\nBetween all of us, we ordered chicken Alfredo, lasagna, and cheese ravioli. Every dish had several things wrong with it. The chicken was likely cooked the week before in a dirty cafeteria then shipped to the Strip District. It was dry and looked reconstituted. The ravioli were lukewarm at best, and my sister said the lasagna tasted microwaved. Even the bread was stale.\n\nOur waitress was also forgetful and a bit cold. I didn't get a salad I ordered, dishes stayed on the table fifteen or twenty minutes after being empty, and water refills were inconsistent. As a former server myself, I'd like to think I know what is in one's control and what is out of one's control. This woman was simply not up to snuff.\n\nWith Lidia's right down Smallman Street, I have no idea how the Warehouse is staying in business. Spend a few extra dollars and go there. It'll be worth it.
We've eaten a number of superb meals at the Morton's in Cincinnati, and were eagerly looking forward to a sumptious dinner at Morton's in Pittsburgh. Oh boy. The ambiance is more like a Wendy's that tries to be upscale: cramped, busy, somewhat noisy. Of the two filet mignons we had (different sizes, medium rare) one was horribly overcooked, the other one a little on the rare side. The meat wasn't special. The deserts were OK but the Creme Brulee was bland in the extreme. Service was OK but occasionally inattentive. For two adults, one child, a check of $150 would have been reasonable for the quality provided. It ended up being $350 or so. Oh well - I rounded up the check to $400 and left with the intention of never coming back again. Imagine my shock when I found that my credit card had been charged with $600! I'm sure this will turn out to be an innocent mistake, but if this restaurant thinks it provides an experience worth $200 per head, they need to call Chef Ramsey.
We made a reservation and were told that seating was on time, we waited 15 minutes past our reservation time to be seated. The food was awful, my pregnant fianc\u00e9 ordered a filet medium rare that came out medium well!  Who cooks a filet medium well?  My father-in-laws strip was so over seasoned he could barely eat it.  But since we waited over an hour for our food, he had to eat it.  Our reservation was for 8:15 and we did not eat until after 10:00.  We all ordered medium rare steaks and one lobster tail.  It should not take over an hour to prepare.  The filet was taken off the bill, however, that does not help the fact that a pregnant women had to wait so long to eat and when it came out she didn't even eat.  I shared mine with her as did her dad share his, but as mentioned above, his steak was awful too.  My Cajun ribeye was good and so was my mother-in-laws lobster.  We ordered chocolate souffl\u00e9 for dessert and it didn't even have chocolate on it.  It tasted like scrambled eggs with whipped cream.  I have to tell you that was by far one of the worst dining experiences we have had.  The four of us eat out together once a week and tend to go to more \"pricey\" restaurants.  This was terrible and I am sure we do not plan on returning.
I am the dork-ie kid from your kindergarten  class. Who has been wearing glasses since I was 5 years old so please take this review seriously.  I know my way around a pair of eyeglasses.  Wow am  I getting old , that would mean I have been wearing eye glasses for 20 years.  \n\nDo me , you and everyone you care about a favor and avoid this location.  The service is here so incredibly inconsistent.  I have nothing,  I mean nothing good do say about the service that I have received here .The eye glass assistants are rude.  The way you are treated is sub par.  America's Best (I even hesitate to use that name because it's obviously not the best in America) just sucks.  \n\n Due to my terrible eye site I have to spend EXTRA money for thin lens.  So normally what I do is,  once a year I shell out $200.00  no insurance to buy two pair of glasses, paying cash.  The frames are alright but nothing that great. \n\nBesides my lens not being great another thing I  have a problem with is the poor customer service. On more then one occasion through out the years I have been talked down to. \n\n I have been wearing my current prescription from AB for about 10 months. This prescription is not good for me, before I had a magnified prescription that made everything BIGGER. My poor little blind self I have an astingamstism in both eyes. Two years ago I got good lens with nice frames but in 2012  I got shit lens with an okay frame.  I don't plan on returning to America's Best , it's just not worth it.
Edit:  A customer service representative from the central office called me and was able to arrange a refund with the manager of the Pittsburgh location. Still, I think this location only deserves one star, considering one of their employees actually lied to me about the return policy, saying all sales were final, while another one said \"I don't know what you're talking about\" when I tried to explain my problem. Very poor customer service at this location. \n\nDespite what it says on their website (30-day return policy), this location refuses to take returns, even for a defective product. I got a set of eyeglasses here which have reflections all across the field of vision. They're barely usable due to this. If I sit near a bright window, I have three reflections which show up in each lens.  These reflections go directly across the center of my field of vision.  $200 down the drain. Buyer beware.
Don't waste your time.1- they dont sell regular paper and hardly have poster paper.2- its really hard to find any thing of use. Most things are archaic and not in a cool vintage way.3- the owner is a bitch. During park(ing) day 2010 she waited 3 hours before coming out and telling the artist \" i find what you are doing is discussing. I dont support your tree hugger shit....\" extraordinarily rude.
I went here around noon one day in search of an ink pad, which I thought would be a pretty standard item for a stationery store.  (Turns out I was wrong.)  The store was such a cramped, crowded mess that I had to ask for help to find what I was looking for, but was hesitant to do so because I felt so awkward interrupting the four employees sitting at a table in a corner, eating leftover pasta and engrossed in conversation, ignoring me and the several other customers who were browsing.  When I finally got the courage to ask about the ink pad, the workers all looked at each other as if to say \"Who's going to handle this?\" before one of them grudingly got up to search for an ink pad that, as it turned out, \"didn't come in with the shipment\".  As if Pittsburgh was a hot market for ink pads and they go through their entire supply every week.
I stopped in because they have knitting supplies. I immediately saw a beautiful cat (they have several in this shop). Being a owner of several cats and extreme lover of all animals, I went over to see the cat. The cat let me pet it and followed me around yowling for attention. I picked up the cat to hold and the man that works there was very rude and ripped the cat away from me. I will NEVER NEVER go back to a store that treats animals or animal lovers that way. The shop isn't that great anyway.
Such a shame because this place has so much potential for being a cool little local business. But the owners/managers are the rudest, most disdainful people who seemed almost gleeful for me to leave without purchasing something. I went in to purchase either some classy paper or a unique card to write a note to a homeowner to whom I was considering placing a purchase offer for their house. It's a stationary store, so I didn't think my request was unusual. The products there were outdated, in many cases even dusty, overpriced (which honestly, I would have paid a local business if the product had been unique and quality), and disorganized. I was asked if I needed help, to which I replied yes and explained my situation, and a very curt man stood in a back corner and pointed to various corners of the store and said, \"Look there and there and there and there,\" AND THEN HE WALKED OUT OF THE STORE.\n\nI'll seriously never step foot in Weldin's again, and felt it necessary to post publicly about the experience. Such a shame.\n\nBTW, I found a delightful card next door at CVS. It was made of wood. Very unique. Go figure. ;)
I went down to the strip last week and thought a mocha sounded great. Well I can't write a review on that drink because the employee dropped a dime in my drink. I was expecting her to offer to make me a new one since she was the one the dropped it in there, but instead all I got a was blank stare. \n\nThe coffee shop down the street had great coffe and they don't drop anything in there as well.
Out of 200 reviews, I've written only 14 1 star reviews.  that's .07%.  That means I never really write 1 star reviews.  La Prima Espresso in the Strip District gets one.  :(\n\nThey've got a good coffee but I will never be back, bc the older woman who is the barista in the morning was unforgivably rude, without reason.\n\nThe coffee is good, I would have liked to become a regular, but I dont want to start every morning dealing with her nasty attitude.  Yesterday she rolled her eyes at me when I asked for lots of room for cream.\n\nI am a former barista.  I *know* asking for room for cream is not one of the more difficult special requests she gets!  If you hate the public, you shouldn't work with them.\n\nThis morning takes the cake, and I just won't be back.  Here's what happened:  \n\nI walked in, and she was talking to a gentleman who was obviously a regular.  Because she was busy and bc I've barista'd myself, I waited patiently.\n\nAnd waited and waited.  It was a few minutes, but an eternity when you really need coffee!\n\nShe never even looked at me.  Then all of a sudden she goes, \"Okay lady are you going to stand there or do you want coffee?\"  \n\nWTF.  I liked her sense of urgency, but seriously?  Rude.\n\nI asked for a medium coffee in a large cup, or if that's not possible, a medium coffee with lots of room. \n\nNot hearing me, she goes, \"What was that?\" and the older gentleman said, \"She wants a medium sized coffee in a large cup.\"  And the woman turns to me and snaps, \"And you couldn't repeat that yourself?\"\n\nEven the guy she was talking to, her regular, was like, \"Whoa.\"  He tried to make some excuse for her, like, \"She's just fired up today!\"  Then the woman slams my coffee down on the counter.  \n\nWas she having a bad day?  Am I the doppleganger of someone she hates?  I dont know, I don't care.  I believe she may be the owner because surely she should have been fired by now, as there are other posts with complaints about her. \n\n\"Do not go here during the week if you expect them to open on time. I was there today and it was 615am and there was no employees at all. Managed very poorly. The older lady with a short hair cut is the one who doesn't open on time when she is scheduled. Please move this lady to a different time. 6am is too early for her.\"\n\n I won't ever be back.  If that's just her spunky personality, well, her personality sucks.  \n\nSeriously lady, you're not a morning person.  You should ask for later shifts.
I'd had a nail appointment set for several weeks - a first time customer.  Less than an hour before the appointment I got a call canceling it.  Not from the owner apologizing for the cancellation or trying to correct the situation somehow, but from the nail tech.  She told me the owner insisted that SHE call her clients herself to tell them she had \"personal problems\" that day and couldn't make it.  Wow.  The lack of professionalism astounded me.  \n\nOn the positive side, I'm glad I had the experience BEFORE what may have been the worst nail experience of my life.  Imagine how the \"personal problems\" may have affected the work.  I called the salon to let them know of my disappointment in being left high and dry.  They simply didn't care.  They lost a customer....not just for nails, but for all the other services they offer.  Not the best way to run a \"service\" business!
Worst Brazilian wax I have ever gotten. Extremely Painful and inefficient, still had a red welt 3 days later. She also used the same stick the entire time which is not sanitary. Eyebrow waxing is significantly overpriced at $18. Do not go here for waxing!
If I can give haft a star I would. Never shop at this Asian grocery since Many more open. Owner and employee alike no manners and nasty. Sorry guys it's the truth.
As Lindsay's best friend and maid of honor, I went with her to Jim Ludwig's a few weeks before her wedding to go over the final order for the flowers.  We sat down and Jim pulled out a list of what they had discussed.  I very clearly remember her confirming dahlias and peonies for the centerpieces.  Not only do I know that she wanted these flowers from the moment of her engagement, but I was also at the consultation to witness the discussion.  The centerpieces were definitely not what she had requested - no peonies OR dahilias and they looked like flowers picked from the side of the road on the way to the wedding.  In no way did the flowers manage to ruin her beautiful day, but they were absolutely not what she requested or confirmed.  I don't understand how there was a \"miscommunication\" as I saw the paperwork.  I just know that I won't be using Jim Ludwig's for any of my own special occassions.
Specialty Luggage misrepresents customer service, does not make good on product warrantees, makes promises they do not keep and charges a premium for luggage that they falsely sell with lifetime warranties. I purchased a piece of luggage worth around $100 for almost $300 because the salesman convinced me that the luggage had a lifetime warranty. \n\nHe looked me in the eye and told me my luggage would be supported or replaced by them at any time.  He's a really good salesman - he smiles, makes you laugh and makes you feel like he's really honest. He'll go on for 10 to 15 minutes on the craftsmanship and quality behind the bags that they sell. \n\nHe'll make promises and guarantees to sell you a piece of luggage but in reality falls apart like any other luggage you purchase elsewhere without their excessive price \"service\" premiums. \n\nWhen I went in with \"lifetime\" warrantee luggage that he sold me that had defective wheels and a defective zipper that began disconnecting from the seams - he looked me in the eye and told me that I had a \"convenient\" memory. He laughed at the idea that he told me there was a lifetime warranty on this luggage. I told him I was insulted that he misrepresented the craftsmanship behind this bag and overcharged me for a product that was not worth the premium he collected - he offered me 10% off another piece of luggage and said he was insulted. \n\nSpecialty luggage is staffed by slimy salesman who lie and misrepresent facts to sell you over priced products that do not justify the premiums they gauge customers for.
I'm sorry, but as cool as Andy is, I just don't like the sushi.  The tuna tasted metallic and mealy, definitely not fresh.  I actually spit it out in my napkin upon first bite.  The portions are large, yes, and the prices are good, but I'd rather pay a little more for sushi that is less suspect.
First, do not call me sexy and then give me the two most sinewy pieces of toro possible. That pissed me right off. \nSecond, the rolls here are sloppy. Not only did it fall apart very quickly (and was about 4 times too large to eat: a piece of sushi should be able to be comfortably eaten in one bite), but it seems there isn't much thought given to flavors as far as the special rolls go. After my experience with the toro, I don't think I will be giving any sashimi or  *sushi* sushi rolls a try. While the rolls are large, the prices were quite steep, not what i was expecting for someone based in a market that sells seafood.
As of July 25, 2014, a sign on the front said that it was closed permanently.
Ew! Ew! Gross! I know that's not the most mature thing to say, but that's what comes to mind when I think about this place! Sad thing is, I've been here a couple times. Every time I kept thinking it would somehow get better, but no, it doesn't! The Miso soup they serve has this weird after taste, and to be honest, doesn't taste like any Miso soup I've EVER had! So on to the sushi, oh yeah, it's gross too! I think I kept going back because the size of the rolls are humongous. The thing is the fish does NOT taste fresh at all! It's always luke warm and....just.not.good. Oh well, I tried. But I'd suggest you not!
Absolutely the worst sushi my husband and I have ever had.  It was Gross!!! I don't know why they use so much rice or why the fish wasn't cold.  You couldn't pay me to go back to this place!
If you're in the mood for fresh, tasty sushi, this is not the place for you. The food that was delivered to us was simply inedible. Point blank. \n\nMy husband and I ordered a bunch of sushi for dinner with the plan of having tasty leftovers for lunch the next day, so we splurged a little, spent like $60 on various rolls. The presentation was pretty pathetic - wilting nori, leading us to believe these rolls were pre-made; hot pink ginger, meaning it's the MSG-soaked kind; glue-like rice, where you can't see the individual grains - but what really horrible was the smell. When we took the lid off the tray, the stench of rotten fish knocked both if us back. I honestly gagged.\n\nIt was so awful, we just stared at each other, amazed that we just spent our money on a pile of stinking rot. Determined to not waste everything, I picked up a piece of spider roll to sniff/inspect/try. IT HAD A HUGE HAIR IN IT, all wound around the crab. Totally disgusting. My husband attempted to try the inari - just tofu and rice, right? It tasted like rotten fish, as it had absorbed all the smells from the other fish rolls. \n\nWe had also ordered a vegetable and tofu soup, and a green salad with ginger dressing. Can't even believe this, but the salad leaves were brown and slimy on the ends! They actually screwed up a green salad. The soup tasted like the inside of an aluminum pot, all metallic and burnt-flavored. Horrible, horrible, horrible. We literally dumped everything down the garbage disposal. Total waste.\n\nWe tried to call and complain, but by the time our order was delivered, the place was closed. We will be calling again today to get our money back. Maybe they will earn themselves another star if they do the right thing and refund our money.
Don't bother with the sushi, can't speak to the Korean BBQ.\n\nLong story short: I ordered delivery. Never had sushi delivered before, so maybe this is just the way it goes, but it took almost two hours to get to me. There was condensation inside the sushi container from the rolls sitting on top of the other entree I'd ordered (which was hot) and being held against it in a small bag. Assuming that the rolls were made long before I got them, I just threw out the tuna roll, which was warmer than room temp anyway. Vegetable roll was good, but not exceptional. Fried rice was...just not what I expected, not exceptional either. In short, I paid almost $40 for a cucumber roll and two bites of rice. \n\nMaybe this is better when you dine in. Still, would not recommend. Pricey and doesn't live up to it at all.
Being Korean and my kids and I visit all the Korean restaurants when we are out of town.  Since my daughter goes to PITT we wanted to treat our daughter to Korean food.  My family including my wife who is non- Korean always order    and if this is how they want to represent Korean food to others they are doing disservice to our heritage.   was the worst I have ever had.  Their  had lettuce as one of mixing choices and their meat was hamburger meat?  Will not go back.
I am sorry to say that this place still STINKS.  I work in the strip and often get temped by Sushi Kim.  I stopped in for lunch today and I was the only person in the whole place.  That should have tipped me off.  The last time i was there i had a bad meal, but i wanted to give them another shot.  \n\nI ordered the spicy chicken off of the lunch menu.  I believe is was L1......Numbered menu items.....Another tip.   My food was terrible.  The miso soup was horrid and old, the sides were awful and everything seemed to be microwaved.  AVOID THIS PLACE AT ALL COSTS!!!
Pittsburgh has a shortage of riverfront dining, so this place wins points for ambience on a nice warm day. Have a drink and enjoy the deck, but save your dining budget for somewhere else.  The menu is blah and the food is also.\n\nI recently had lunch here, and the waitress first forgot my meal entirely, bringing food to everyone else at the table.  When I reminded her, she returned with my clam chowder, spilled it, didn't apologize, and didn't clean it up.  All that would have been forgiven if the soup had been any good.
Awful service, overpriced food. Don't waste your money! On arrival, waitress seemed lost.  Ordered food for 3 adults, one kid, food came for adults, after a couple of minutes my mom asked when my sons food would be coming, waitress said she would check, came back and said his pizza hadnt been cooked yet. Cancelled the pizza, paid $4 for a little bowl of white lettuce with some cheese thrown on it, fried shrimp was expense, but looked like cookie cutter frozen shrimp. Spoke to manager, who had a horrible attitude and found out that the waitress never put the pizza order in for my son and then lied and told the manager he wasnt at the table when we ordered our food. If you give these people your money, it would be foolish!
The only reason anyone goes to this restaurant is to sit on the deck and drink.  I want to like this place so badly I keep coming back and hoping that it'll be awesome and it just never is.  Like dating someone who is very very hot but also very very stupid, it's amazing how much patience one can have if there's a really good atmosphere.\n\nOne year I took my father here for his birthday.  I don't usually call people names but our waitress was just a complete idiot to the point we felt bad for her and that was the ONLY reason we didn't freak out on her completely.  She forgot my dad's food order.  She brought out mine, but then neglected to notice that my dad was sitting there with nothing.  The manager came out and took our drinks off hte tab, btu that didn't help very much bc we'd only been able to order one round in an hour of waiting bc the waitress had only come to our table twice.  Then when they brought my dad's steak out, the waitress dropped it (I felt bad for her), and apparently that was their last steak.  I just paid the bill and we left and went to Eat n Park.\n\nThe second time I came back the service was equally as terrible, but also it was late summer and our table was literally attacked by wasps.  Seriously, attacked by wasps.  My friend got stung.\n\nAnother time I'd made a reservation for my friends 30th bday and they said htey didn't do reservations but could put tables together.  When we showed up, it was like I'd never called.\n\nThe last time I was there it was ok, but after being attacked by wasps my friend and I opted for the patio and only ordered burgers.\n\nThe service here SUCKS.  Getting attacked by bees and then having to wait for your server to bring you ice sucks (holding a cold beer bottle against the sting helps).  It just sucks here.\n\nBut the atmosphere is fantastic!  When your waitress comes ot hte table, just order a whole bunch of bottled beers nad you should be ok.
Dear Redfin Blues,\n\nI can't begin to express my disappointment in your establishment. Such high expectations were set when we were greeted at the host stand and sent of for cocktails on a 20 min wait list (which apparently never existed). After 30 mins and seeing literally 4 parties that noticeably came in after us be seated, I reminded the host who directed us to the bar that we were still waiting. After 20 more minutes and 2 more parties getting sat (one who sat themselves) I approached a blonde woman seating and cleaning tables to let her know that we could be removed from the \"list\". To which she replied \"what list?\" And didn't even bother to apologize... nothing was offered to assist us in our search for sustenance nor was there anything offered for our inconvenience. Fortunately, for us, the disaster at your restaurant lead us to discover a new place, that we have decided to frequent. So, thank you for f**king up.
This store has great stuff in it and we all complemented the woman working on how great the store was when we were leaving. I was with 3 white people and 1 black person. When we left, the worker pulled the black person aside and demanded to check his pockets. She did and found nothing. In the middle of the Strip District, this store can still be racist?
I hate to write mean reviews, but I really did receive the worst haircut of my life (no hyperbole) from this place, one that really can't be fixed now until I wait for it to grow out.  I walked in with long hair and normal-looking bangs that all needed significant trimming.  The stylist said he would need to take a couple of inches off of the length due to damage.  I said that was fine.  I did not ask for any other style changes.  I somehow walked out with bangs that take up most of the front part of my head, much like a small child's haircut (to serve the purpose of keeping hair out of the child's face).  He also took almost five inches off the length, instead of the \"couple\" promised.  I feel like my haircut looks like a cross between a bowl cut, a female mullet, and the futuristic look of Mia Wallace from Pulp Fiction.  I'm pretty open minded to different haircuts, but this one is truly awful, and it's too short now for me to even pull it back easily to try to make it look better.  \n\nI'm going to a place in Shadyside today to see if they can maybe do extensions to remedy the mullet look, or implement some kind of other cut to make it look a little better.  It's a shame, because this place is downtown and so convenient to my workplace, but I certainly will not risk it again.\n\n:(
